/lit/ is for the discussion of literature.If you want to talk about politics, go to /pol/.
Recommended literature:http://4chanlit.wikia.com/wiki/Recommended_ReadingAsk for recommendations only once you have browsed the wiki.Looking for books?http://encyclopediadramatica.se/Bookz
itt we give tips on how to write genre fiction that is will not only woo your publicist and the general reader but also the highbrow armchair critic, go
by writing literature
Okay then , smart ass, how do you write literature that'll both sell popularity and be critically acclaimed.
Either you can't, or make it really edgy and try to ape GRRM/Neil Gainax/Stephen King, and hope for the best.
You don't. A great writer is like a tall building, stand too close and you can't see how tall it really is. In other words, a great author is typically recognized some time after their life.
Include some fairly accessible historical, mythological, or religious symbolism as an ongoing undercurrent in the story.The key to writing genre fiction that is seen as having literary merit is to include some deeper allegorical meaning than just the plot, so that the reader can feel smart when he "discovers" it, and has something to discuss about the book with other readers on forums or whatever.
Just finish La Peste by Camus. What do you think about this book?
What was your opinion?
I enjoyed it. Camus did a good job showing the effect of a plague and a closed environment on his characters. I think I liked l'Etranger more, though.
It's an anti-fascist allegory.And by "fascism" he didn't only meant the right-oriented one, just defeated, but also the left-communist that was menacing europe at the time.I don't really like the way Camus write, but it was an incredebly straight and coherent person, a very good one, and for that I share with him some concerns toward the forma-mentis of the masses.
I enjoyed it, the sense of distress really creeps up on you. I read once he had the idea of another character abandoning his sick wife outside the city, I think he should have put that in without making it too maudlin.
Am I the only one who think that he hated oran so much he decided to eliminate its inhabitants by that infectious disease ze absurd
tfw I waste my life in altered statesback it up
kill yourslerf
please explain
Escape weakling the rest of us will suffer but at least we will have more pride then you , me thinks , not know.Who cares? Good for you . Share drug s now.
OP is already dead.
You will never savor the pussy of univers.
He means he does too many drugs.
pot is excellent, but only if done once every couple months, alone, with a heroic dose
ThanksRead the concept of the hedonic treadmill. Don't chase the dragon anymore, joy is a vicious concept, it is the root of all evil. Be a stoic my friend.
Tfw no budNo opiatesOnly shitty lsa seeds and ayahuasca ingredientsI just hate being me so much I want to escape it if only for a few hours.
I'm trying to cut down on alcohol and hard drugs. I'll still drink once or twice a week and intermittently pop a pill or something, but for the most part I want to stick with weed
No dose of pot is heroic. Marijuana is child's play. 1000ug of LSD, 700mg Mescaline, or 8 grams of Liberty Caps dried or nothing.
Weed ruins lives as well, it's just more subtle about it. Sobriety master race.
Large oral doses of hashish can be just as heroic as any other psychedelic.
Yep. I used to run with the drugs crowd, through some weird temperamental congeniality and a willingness not to judge, in highschool. Anybody who doesn't see booze, weed, and harder drugs as the occasional diversion is going to end up degenerate. People do have emotional breakthroughs sometimes, but it's an uncommon experience. I know lots of people who've wasted years away because they lowered their stimulus threshold to watching-paint-dry-is-fun levels with daily pot use, only to wake up and wonder what the fuck they're doing. I know several people who have found delusion in drag as Enlightenment and now think their lives are being effected by beings in the fifth dimension. I know one who is totally fried and cynica; from blasting her brain with E.
potI'm not a degenerate
I GOT THE FEVER FEVER
same, bout to hippyflip in a minutemfw
Sounds boring, I'll stick with drugs.
It's ultimately less boring because you get to experiment with what you're looking at rather than constantly obsessing over the glasses you're looking through.
Things boring people tell themselves
AYE AYE KNOW WHAT I'M SAYIN ?
Things boring people tell each other: acid trip stories, omg I smoked so much weed, etc.
idiot
You're both in the wrongStop glamorizing drugs and insulting those who don't want to do itStop insulting those who do it as lesser human beingsThere's nothing wrong with drugsunless its weed because fuck that what are you 16?
unless its weed because fuck that what are you 16?Pot makes people lazy and forgetful
Are all sober people boring ?
implying druggies aren't the most boring people on earth
Weed, alcohol are for pussies.
thanks terrence
He was daily pot smoker his entire life and admitted to addiction later on. His last interview is a sobering look at long term drug use.
Only shitty lsa seedsMorning glory seeds have an extremely disgusting and foul taste. Ingestion of the seeds themselves will likely result in vomiting.A proper extraction using ethanol and methanol is required. Have fun.
Drug induced altered states have their place, at the right time and attitude going in. But it's a destructive habit if you make it a pivot point for normal activities. I like Alan Watts advice-- when you get the message hang up the phone
Watts died an alcoholicAnd then do what ? Fuck, eat sleep ? They way we live is mind altering. There's no supreme way of doing things.
True, but he he said it was best enjoyed once in a while at the highest dose possible.
don't make me consider the reality of my decisions
, 
Is it okay to listen to music while reading? What should I listen to while reading The Brothers Karamazov?
if you do both at the same time you're wasting your time reading. But if you insist on being a moron, at least use something without any lyrics.
Is it okay to listen to music while reading?Why in the world would you need to ask permission from a random bunch of pretentious retards?If you like listening to music while reading, just fucking listen to music while reading. Who the fuck cares what other people think of you when it comes to your reading habbits, just do what feels best for you.Ok?
Personally I love instrumental Celtic and Lounge music for reading.Otherwise, the singing of birds.But I've only ever read Dostoevsky to the sound of people arguing :[
, 
/fit/32636862thoughts?
all those people that think nietzsche ubermensch is overcoming the self in a muscular wayall those people who doesn't realize that the overcoming itself in capitalism is pure ideology
Is Evola a meme yet.
redpill me on Evola
Why does he wear the wheelchair
For jew
I don't get it
At least you can talk
I'M RIDING THIS TIGERWITH NO SURVIVORS
tfw missing out on bane posting because have no idea who Evola is
Well, he's a pretty good philosopher ...
What should I read to become acquainted with Hindu Mythology
The Rig VedaThe MahabharataThe Ramayana
Vedas? I'm no expert.
Those are really long. Is there any sort of short version
You should read some academic works on the subject. Primary sources are going to be incomprehensible and boring.
Wikipedia articles about whatever hindu deities/mythological figures you're interested in, I guess?It's a shit substitute but that's all there is if the actual stuff is too long for you.
Go find this you pleb:The Ramayana: A Shortened Modern Prose Version of the Indian Epic Penguin ClassicsAlso the Bagavad Gita isn't that long and probably most famous, but I'm not sure they're all pretty well known.Is right. I suggest finding a reference book and reading some wikis.
Read the book Many Many Many Gods of Hinduism.
What are the best vampire novels? Recommendations please. Pic related, it's the only one I've read.inb4 twilightinb4 vampire diaries
Salem's Lot, but based on your image I'll assume you already familiar with it.The Keep spoiler alert: there is a twist that the villain isn't actually a vampire, but something else

It's not a novel but the short story Camilla from the collection In A Glass Darkly by the Irish writer Sheridan Le Fanu is considered the first modern vampire story. The whole collection is pretty good. Was written a bit before Dracula
When is it coming out, concerned-anon? I know he's here somewhere, he's always here somewhere.
'Salem's Lot is probably the best, honestly. I've heard good things about The Delicate Dependency, but good luck finding a copy.
 Hahahahjajajajja it's funny because the sword looks like a penis good one anon hahahahahahahahahahahahahahaha
mfw when Dracula isn't mentioned.no Good Lady Ducayneor the Family of Vourdalakno Vampire Tapestryfuck Lit, read some Lit.
vampire academy
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3WdCvGDpM9kblindsight
Why should one study philosophy? What are its benefits?What is the point of studying philosophy in the modern era?
If you study philosophy, you can be better at pseudo-philosophizing plebs, so when some pothead tries to talk about philosophy when he's only learned about it from those "philosophy for idiots" videos on youtube, or when some fedora man tells you that reading Plato is useless because he's not scientific like the real smarties in the world, you can tell them how full of shit they are and that they've got everything wrong.Studying philosophy will make you a better person.
you must more live philosophically, than to learn philosophy.-to live the good life-to create new conceptsyou will question thoughts, speeches and actions of every body, yours included.what are the difficulties/problems ?why are they difficulties/problems ?what are the solutions ?why are they solutions ?What are the necessities ?what are the sufficiences ?what are the causes ? what are the effects ?what are the means ? what are the goals ?And it appears that, without even discussing the solutions nor the logics and motivations of the causes and the effects, most of the problems that people discuss IRL or in their books, are vapid, incomplete, foreign.To learn philosophy is to learn why such or such philosopher created such and such concepts against such and such problems.
For fun
to become a better Human Being
To get a better perspective and breadth in your view of everything around you.Its pure curiosity.Its beyond science, beyond a career, beyond the goals dictated by whatever society you are living in.Its also a way to shed propaganda and certitudes.Its a tool for more constructive thinking, for being able to make sense of everything around you.
Including your desires and why you desire what you desire.Why you want what you want. Why is this or that problematic. Why is it that on some topics you seem to be able to agree and disagree with both sides?Its a way of becoming more conscious of everything, including yourself.
Only right answer
but how does it make someone a better person?
These
This
To distract yourself from the nagging thought that you're perhaps just a little bit too stupid to understand science
This b8 is too bad m8, nobody actually finds science too hard. Most find it too plain, too easy and too understandable to get interested on it.
This. Someone tell Kripke to take a biology class. Idiot.
what is the point of studying philosophy..?How can you proclaim to think when you don't even know how to frame your thoughts?
There's no end to the benefits. You'll understand much more and be able to see through much more bullshit. You'll also realize that virtually everything is posturing and nobody really knows all that much about anything
Study philosophy if you are interested in philosophy, it will be fun.
i kekd
Feel and look smart.
The relevant questions in philosophy have been handed over to physics and sociobiology. Philosophy as history of human understanding is interesting though.
How can you learn to frame your thoughts when you can't think?
How can thought be real if our ideas aren't real?
The relevant questions in philosophy have been handed over to physics and sociobiology.What physics and sociobiology say about meaning of life?
That's not even a relevant question in philosophy
What is the meaning of spiral galaxies?
implying your opinion of relevance is relevant
implying it isn't
Are you mentally ill? Have you ever read philosophy?
No one gives a fuck about it anymore. Philosophy has moved on from circlejerking over shit ethics.
There's no benefit from studying philosophy, thats why you need to study it
For someone that can translate between arabic and greek, this is a stupendous question
so that you can genuinely type 69deep420me ironically on a Liechtensteinian lithography image-swapping board
Is he right? Is scientism right?
Is scientism right?About what?
science doesnt tell anything, it is there to be interpreted by sound metaphysics
our belief is not a beliefour belief
/thread
weird imageAnd yes, "scientism" is correct.You can masturbate if you want to, just dont pretend its equal to observed fact
observed factobservedfact
equalnot in fact better
CELESTIAL NORTH KOREA
Tell me how the idea that the scientific method can answer non-empirical questions is any sillier than the idea that a bit of bread can magically turn into a man's flesh.
HOW DARE YOU
I hate that face so much; I want to grind it in asphalt.
non-empirical questions are not real questions
he thinks non-empirical questions have meaning
brothers and sisters
Then tell me how scientism is nowhere near as dogmatic as organized religion.
realmeaning
non empirical questions don't have meaningI'm going to have to ask you to prove this empirically.
daily reminder
Can you back this statement with empirical evidence?
you must find the 'right' religion first
Yes. Read some analytical philosophy faggotPopper, Kripke, Wittgenstein, Russell, Quine etc.Youa're a cuck
QuinePopperKripkegogged hard fwiend
christposters should be killed
Can you empirically verify that? :^
mfw Wittgenstein called Kierkegaard the most profound thinker of the 19th centuryLooks like you'll have to read some continental philosophy.
tfw bug STEM friend with 'prove 2 + 2 = 4' every day
I already have anon
4 is only equal to itself, that is why it is termed 4.2 + 2itself is simply an impossibility, since 2 is 2, and there are not other 2's to sum.math is an impossible circlejerk.
CONTINENTAL ARE FOR WOMEN AND GAYS AND LIBERALS AND FEMINISTS AND CUCKSREAL MEN READ ONLY ANALYTICAL PHILOSOPHY. THAT IS WHERE YOU FIND RATIONALITY AND NOT MUH FEELS
Why doesn't he just show you the proof?
remove ANALytic
There are plenty of manly continentals.
Is that even falsifiable?
Cause you can't.
wittgensteinnot a gay cuck
no, obviously everything I make up is equalliy valid to things people have painstakingly proven over hundreds of years.
NO HE'S A LIBERAL FAGHIS GENEOLOGICAL METHOD INSPIRED FEMINISM AND POSTMODERNISM
I know you're trying to be a parody or something but the all caps gimmick was already taken.
I don't really see a reason why we shouldn't believe in, say, Newton's third law. There's always the chance that our human perception of things is flawed, but using our senses we can basically agree on certain things.
You are literally retarded. This is why people with a real education actually accomplish things. People like you have no use.
http://www.cs.yale.edu/homes/as2446/224.pdfSurely you jest.
what use have i in your math?
ISLAMSLAM
I'm gonna need some proof of all that.
You wouldn't be able to use /lit/ without math, and then your social life would be over.
It's all there man
i'm not using your math to shit on you, i'm using my butthole
scientism is either self-refuting or trivial
Get out of my face
That statement cannot be proven scientifically
What about math?
doesn't respond to an actual pointstep your game up, feminist cuck
Your lack of evidence is utterly unscientific.Trashed.
Because math is a priori
i didn't respond to your post because i was doing exactly that, i was walking away, it was directed toward the room we're ini'm doing it again, hopefully you catch on
this whole thread is unfalsifiable.
only thing not unfalsifiable is your mum riding my dickhole right now
So is everything else.
I'm going to need some evidence of that.
Dogs aren't

Epic bait bro, well-done bait image on a well-done bait thread. Hook, line and sinker. Bravo.
Very good.

YOU HIT MULTIPLE OF THE NUMBERS IN A ROWTHAT'S AMAZINGTHAT MAKES MY ADRENALINE RUSHI HAVE SUCH A GREAT LIFETHANK YOU FOR HELPING ME WITH MAKING ME HAPPY BY GETTING DOUBLESHOPEFULLY YOU WON'T SAY 'THE GAME' HEHE BECAUSE THIS MEANS WE ALL LOST IT HEHE
Thanks, I've been doing this for years. Old enough to be your father ;
I find this guy's posts to be extremely adorable in a good way :
Sure are.
I think you need to just chillax man.
Prove how dogs are a priori
Salutes
putting the cart before the horse
Reification fallacy you faggots. Abstract mathematical models do not describe the way the world really is
do you have any scientific evidence for that statement?
i don't care about what anyone says 99.9% of science is boring as fuck who gives a shit how many degrees it is on venus and the name of neptune's moon thanks for some of the technology and the medicine but please quit making me update my phone i miss my old weather widget
I'll bite. It really just boils down to the classic realism vs. instrumentalist debate. If science can't even agree with itself on whether or not the entities it proposes actually exist, why should it be taken as the sole bearer of knowledge about the world?
implying empirical questions have meaning
how do you explain the constants/natural laws or whateverwhere does nothingness cOmE fRoM
does this question have any practical application?
Wittgenstein does not claim that non-empirical questions lack meaning, only that they go beyond the limits of language and therefore discussing them is meaningless. Please refrain from namedropping what you don't understand. Everyone else on the list tried to reach far beyond their cognitive abilities and made a fool of themselves, similar to you.
From a purely practical perspective, probably not. The purpose of science, most physics, is to describe how things work, not what things are. But this is precisely why Scientism has never and will never function as a tenable belief system. If the scientific method can only give us abstractions, then it's useless when it comes to getting down to the real essence of phenomena.
can this be empirically demonstrated?
namedroppingr/philosophy
Hitchposting is the Baneposting of /lit/.
Spacetime is a pretty good example of this. Most popularization present it as an actual substance that bends and warps in the presence of matter, but if you press a real physicist on the matter they'll tell you the curvature tensor is purely mathematical and that spacetime is a clever invention used to rationalize the phenomena we observe. So yes, it can be :^
daily reminder reminder
God does not exist.Can you please get god to confirm it for me?He does not subscribe to your religion, therefore this is the equivalent of your conversation. Empiricism has been refuted in numerous ways, it is not logically consistent, extremely limited is the highest possible standing it could hold. In its essence a circular argument - what I perceive is true because I perceive it. It even refutes itself by empirically demonstrating how obvservably limited and unreliable sensory experience is, even without philosophically questioning it. Treating it as a religion is sickening.
objectivism
In a physical sense, this is right since the scientific method is based off of empiricism thanks Mr. Bacon. However, in a metaphysical sense, you have just blasphemed.
HOW
That's not empirical evidence though, that's just you namedropping. Also it's funny that you mention Russell since his whole deal was basing everything on the certainty of mathematics and logic, not empirical experience. But what about Kripke ?, let us look on the Wikipedia page."Kripke is an observant Jew.[17] Discussing how his religious views influenced his philosophical views in an interview with Andreas Saugstad he stated: "I don't have the prejudices many have today, I don't believe in a naturalist world view. I don't base my thinking on prejudices or a worldview and do not believe in materialism."[18].Hmmmm. Have you ever read any analytic Philosophy have you just been on reddit a few times ? did I just take the bait?
Vive les francs maçons et le temple de la raison
DARE
you
Russellnot a humanist, anti-racist, sjw cuck
https://youtu.be/KZTS6iVpSPIwhat do you guys think about c. hitchens' views on circumcision
what an asshole. He's just shitting on the beliefs of this rabbis' spirituality. He has no argument aside from his feeling that 'mutilation is bad guise'.He seems very angry and that rabbi was doing a good job of being calm about it.c hitch needs a little DFWIn the day-to-day trenches of adult life, there is actually no such thing as atheism. There is no such thing as not worshipping. Everybody worships.

Even the most baby mathematician knows that you need to base the entire field on axioms. You need to take whole numbers as a set of whole numbers. Math is different from all other sciences in that you have to take base principles for granted. Some of these may be common sense but unprovable, since math can't be 'observed' in a satisfactory manner
Not useless at all. You probably haven't kept up with the current interpretations of quantum mechanics or holographic principles. There are now current theories in place to test these ideas. Like, is the nature of our universe actually a hologram, a 2d sphere that projects a 3d space. There is an experiment right now testing the granularity of information in spacetime to see if this is true. That is actually a step to discover the nature of realityBut yeah, physics should get more help from philosophy, it may have smoothed over some of this quantum mechanics interpretation bullshit.
In the day-to-day trenches of adult life, there is actually no such thing as atheism. There is no such thing as not worshipping. Everybody worships.Yeah but that doesn't justify being a Christian
Even the most baby mathematician knows that you need to base the entire field on axioms.Er, no, the most baby mathematician knows that math is intuitive and we invented axioms ad hoc to justify those intuitions.
God's salvation justifies being a Christian. Praise the Lord!
I was referring to the rules of base arithmetic as the parent poster was talking about. Some of the basics can't be proven, because you need to take some axioms.But you are right that for a lot of theorem s they take whatever they need
The most baby mathematician knows that "intuitive" axioms can lead to bizarre results le banach tarski meme theorem, well ordering principle, that some intuitively obvious ideas are contradictory AoC and AD both sound pretty reasonable, don't they? and that some of the great geniuses of humanity have spent their lives formalizing and analyzing mathematical ideas and the logical thought process for these reasons.
The rules of base arithmetic are easily defined "proven" from the Peano axioms.
muh scientismmuh bullshit strawman for people who won't accept that magic is real like meDaily reminder that Christfags are a cancer
muh magic strawman/womb/
That is actually a step to discover the nature of realitynot it does not. Science supposes realisms/physicalism/naturalism and describe via many mechanisms which can be nece several phenomenon as well as predict quantities and qualities. There is no reason to say that physics discover the nature of reality. There is no reason to say that to predict some phenomenon is to know the world, to discover the reality.Even if we have a mechanism which leads to the most accurate predictions that the humanity as ever seen, there is nothing telling us that there is not another model with different mechanisms which leads to the same predictions.
But you people literally believe in magic. It would be a strawman if there was any other way to describe it. Unfortunately, you people literally believe in unobservable, supernatural forces that can be commanded to give you anything you want. Which is literally a belief in magic
Mathematics is the activity of the mathematicians consisting in-a choice of logic developped by the logician by the mathematician, where he chooses what is a proof, what is a theorem, what are the quantifiers...-a choice of axioms which are devoid of direct ontology since what matters is now the axiomatic relations between the symbolsthis is key in the language : you no longer ask what is a plane, but how it interacts with other concepts in geometry, such as a point or a curve. In natural languages, some stronger degree of ontology remains, but this ontology could well be removed and some mathematics in a natural language would remain.Naturally, there are mathematicians who are against the axiomatization of the mathematics. See, the finitists.The task of the mathematicians is thus to derive as many theorems as possible, with the definition of theorem belonging to the choice of the logic. Hopefully, soon, we will have the computers to carry all our proofs, all that will remain for the humanity will be to seek new logics and new axioms. However, even this last task will be done by some machines sooner or later.OFC, most mathematicians denigrate the logical aspect and choose the classical logic. My bet is that they love the law of excluded middle since it is too difficult for them to carry mathematics constructively, for they were not trained to love weaker logics. The choice of the logic is crucial for both the pure mathematics and their applications.
Hitchens is the last guy to speak on 'science'. All he has been doing is talking politics and antitheism.Anti-theists always tend to claim 'science' on their side. Science has nothing to do with belief/or lack thereof
Physics is the activity of the physicists consisting in providing some models of the phenomenological world, models called objectivity, once assumed the metaphysical stance of the realism.In physics, the predictions can be done qualitatively, instead of quantitatively. All our apparatuses are now quantitative, but every rule and prediction of every physical model can be formulated in a natural language. In physics, nobody knows if the the equations derived by the humanity concerning their experiences do hold in others parts of the universe. This is a mild solipsism, a humanist solipsism, analogue to the old question on how to know whether China exists, if I never have been to China. Any other kind of solipsism would be frowned upon socially in our times, anyway. In science, there is a choice of many things, in the department of philosophy, loigc, mathematics, physics: of postulates/axioms/principles/methods for induction/methods for collection and treatment of experimental dataThe output of the scientific method is a variety of models, more or less overlapping, which describe and predict, more or less broadly, more or less accurately, more or less quantitatively, more or less qualitatively, some phenomenon assumed to be repeatable within a framework determined by each model.What are the absolutes ? They are the predictions, the outputs of the models. Each choice of model, by a person, is a matter of affinity, of belief, of ''I like, I do not like'', of preferences.For instance, I can measure a thing with a ruler, ruler1, I get the number X. I choose another ruler, ruler2, I get the number Y. The number Y will always be gotten, in the process of applying the ruler2 to the thing to be measured, if the ruler2 is used.But there is no necessity to use the ruler2, nor even the ruler1. There is not even a necessity to measure anything. Why do you want to measure something ?
unobservable, supernatural forces that can be commanded to give you anything you wankeki bet you say they're "fairy tales" too
Beforehand, though, each model describe, more or less partially, the phenomeon. If you venture on the WHYs and the HOWs, you engage yourself in metaphysics literally, what is beyond the physics, the phenomenon and its acquirement by the senses.Here, the objectivity is the numbers. The objectivity relates to the repetition of the procedure as well as to the prediction. We believe that the quantitative data aforementioned are more objective than qualitative data, precisely because we believe that numbers are more objective than qualities, because they are derived from some algorithm. The point of the person choosing this algorithm, over some others, is to convince/persuade the other people that her choice is right/better/relevant. Then each person chooses her models that she likes the most and endlessly debates politically with the other persons in asking which method is better than the other, which must be applied in such fields, in such social doctrine. You see that the physicists is always at the frontier of the explainable in terms of mechanist models. The physicists is interested in the domain where its favourite models DO NOT work, while the domain where the physical models do work is left to the engineer throughout the industrial technology, in order to solve some material problems.We see with all this that the tragedy of the scientific method is its inability, so far, to advocate/prove scientifically its necessity and its sufficiency towards the goals that the humanity sets it up, that is to say, towards acquiring knowledge about the phenomenological world.Indeed, under a monist stance, especially physicalist/naturalist, where everything is --- the physical realism starts here--- and is nature, the humanity and its thoughts included, the sciences must explain then what the humanity categorizes today as metaphysics. THe first questions is
-why do the human models which predict accurately or not do predict ?how come the maths are so useful in physics ?, Einstein asksIf we answer this, we can thus say why the physical models are necessary and sufficient to predict the quantitative and qualitative results.Nonetheless, these predictions might not be all the knowledge to have.These questions lead to the philosophy. The philosophy is nowadays the activity of the philosophers, those who love the sophia. With the greeks, It means that the philosophers are not sage themselves, but only that they love the sophia. At the time, in their perspectives, the philosophy is the activity to live the good life.The philosophers put back the ontology in the language natural, contrary to the mathematicians who try to impoverish the mathematical symbols beyond the logical symbals, such the quantifiers. The phisophers do not hesitate to talk about what is not real. let us take the concept of the idea. An idea is not real, but it is pure being. An idea is pure ontology. It is a thing that is not another thing. The purity defines the idea. The traditional question is the one of the justice. What is justice ?But why do we think Plato talks about the concept of idea. Plato talks about this concept, put it higher than anything else, for it was important in its time. Plato was looking for the selection of the pretenders to the magistracy, let us say since there is the competition, as established by the Greeks. THe concept of the idea solves the problem what gives somebody the right to something or not the right to some thing.
In Deleuzian terms, The task of those people is to create some concepts, through the creation of problematics. They must identify, at their time and location in space, what are the problems in their societies. This step is incredibly more difficult than what it appears. What matters less is the solution to their identified problems. For instance, the typical problem of the modern democracies is the question of the knoweldge, as exposed below:-why does the humanity hold the human predictions from scientific models or not as authentic knowledge about the world as if there are two worlds, the world of the phenomenons and the world of the thoughts/predictions ?for instance, if you can predict the output of some game, everybody on earth will tell you that you know about the world-is there knowledge that is not about prediction ? why do we assume that there is a reality ?If you replace maths with one philospher's doctrine, it works all the same. For each philosopher, we choose to follow the deductions that he makes according to the logic he chooses. Since philosophy is done in natural language, there is more vagueness and circularity than in maths, because the words of the natural language has more ontology since it is the job of the philosophers to do this.At some point in the deductions of the philosophers, we will disagree, or we will be surprised or will not follow the deduction.This where we stop believing in his doctrine, or stick to it and continue, or learn another one or explore your own philosophy.
Then please tell me what you believe and how it's in any way different from a belief in magic
i'm sorry, i didn't know what i was talking aboutit's ok :
Nice dodge
find a passage from the bible that talks about people controlling supernatural forces lol faggot
Peano axiomslike I said axioms, not proofs
Didn't Moses open seas by commanding it so? Couldn't Jesus multiply loafs and fishes with a flick of his wrist? Or was that all sleight of hand?
Yes, science is all about models, but the models themselves tell us about reality. Like, does free will exist? No, it does not fucking exist. Science is answering fundemental questions
both were works of god lol faggot
Oh, so you named your magical entity. That's indeed very different. Alsolol faggotYeah, great wisdom there, O wise elder of Zion
refering to God as "magical entity"The fact that you would disbelief to such extent is indeed evidence of Him. SWT
the fuck definition of magic are you using, faggot?the power of apparently influencing events by using mysterious or supernatural forces.are you retarded? yes you are
good postsBut I can't help to think philosophy has misstepped in taking itself so far away from science. I think philosophers should really be more involved in the cutting edge of Comp Sci, AI, and Quantum Theory
Why?
There is only one definition of magic that is not a science. That would be something that, when tested against the laws of physics can not be made to fit. Since physics can and has been changed to fit contradiction this means by definition it can not exist.
because it would help those fields immensely. Quantum Mechanics interpretations has floundered for decades, especially since the Bell experiment. And after that experiment all the teachers just said 'shut up and calculate' rather than dealing with the problem. Only in the last decade have physicists admitted that this is a problem that needs to be dealt with. If philosophy was more involved this problem would have been addressed much earlier.
Science has not yet answered the free will question lol, get the fuck out of here
nothing in science is fully answered. It's a model with parameters. And as far as science models have shown free will does not exist. It's not like it's the final say in the matter but currently that is the answer
You're conflating logical models and metaphysical speculation drawn from scientific observations with science itself. It's impossible to employ the scientific method to answer questions about free will, and the current state of science in fact seems to be against determinism, despite what Sam Harris says. It doesn't answer the question one way or another and as far as most educated people are concerned, the debate is still open.
It's impossible to employ the scientific method to answer questions about free willHow is that impossible in any sense of the term free will? It's testable, has predictive outcomes and has a base theory. Any way you look at it, it's provable. Maybe not 100% right now but in the future it will be 99.99.... provable
Are you actually claiming that the existence of free will can be empirically tested?
Yes, because the brain is a physical thing with cause and effect. how is that not something that can be tested?
how do we find out the nature of reality then? is it impossible?
is it a naive and fruitless inquiry?
In a physical sense, we don't have the equipment and know-how to conduct such an experiment that will prove definitively, beyond all doubt, the existence/nonexistence of free will. If you're referring to the 'readiness potential' experiment, it only showed that the brain is electrically primed for decision-making a split-second before the actual decision, not that the outcome of the decision is predetermined.In a metaphysical sense until we have a working model of consciousness - including a scientific solution to the hard problem of consciousness something many, myself included, would argue is ontologically impossible it would be foolish to think of the brain as simply some monist Newtonian bundle of atoms - I'm not even arguing for dualism or an immortal soul here, but there exists consequently huge, empirically observed and unaccounted-for uncertainty in the purely physical realm. And of course, see https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Problem_of_induction
This is the are we a brain in the vat argument. Which can't be solved by philosophy and only by science. If science can find out something crazy like is our universe a hologram I think it can eventually solve this.Whatever you think of the Many Worlds principle of QM it is actually getting close to provable theories.
re: science solving brain in the vat, really? you realize that it is impossible for the inhabitants of a simulation to empirically prove that they're living in a simulation, because the informational limit of the universe is necessarily less than the amount of bits needed to define that universe? i.e a computer can never truly define itself.
actually many experiments have already been preformed that say the outcome is predetermined. People keep leaping to the 'randomness' of QM to explain free will but it just doesn't hold up.I see your problem with Induction and that's the only thing I see wrong with my origional point. But probably not for your reasons. The brain isn't always cause and effect, it takes time as chunks rather than linear. It's why people can read a word and not know the middle letters are all mixed up. Since the brain works in chunks, is there a possibility for free will to be saved in this? Seriously wondering cause I want to write on this
actually many experiments have already been preformed that say the outcome is predetermined.Could you post some links?
Information theory is proving that wrong. It is possible to analyze the granularity of information within space-time and test these theories.
I didn't want to wait too long too post you something, plus, I'm tired. Here is a like from io9 which generally gets their sources right.http://io9.com/5975778/scientific-evidence-that-you-probably-dont-have-free-willHope it answers your questions cause I haven't read it. There is a lot of stuff out there though that supports this idea.
That's irrelevant because the nature of the question of simulation requires perfect information of the universe - it seeks a container for the universal set - which according to information theory and perhaps more importantly non-naive set theory cannot be stored in the set itself. If you have evidence to the contrary then please go ahead and present it.
I'm not saying it solves the Brain In the Vat or Matrix problem. I'm saying it is a reason to think that science CAN solve those problems. IF we can look into the face that we live in 2 dimensions +1 time, why can't we solve the issues of whether we live in a vat? Science is challenging questions that philosiphers are still battling with so why is there any reason to think this won't continue? I still wish there was more cooperation in the two fields
IF we can look into the face that we live in 2 dimensions +1 time, why can't we solve the issues of whether we live in a vat?Nice quads. All extra dimensions exist in this physical universe, we just can't perceive them, as opposed to a possible simulator which would be external to this universe.
Has not read Hume
# well it is the traditional problem of the is epistemic solipsism and the one of induction.the first step is to ask why do you believe that there is a reality, that you are not what you feel, that you are not what you experiment
I understand where you are coming from. But it is a great example of how science can solve multiverse problems. Another example is the proposed theories of testing the Multiple Worlds theory. Which every quantum result ends up with a new universe. This is a more philosophical argument but it is very close to a physical test. Science is far more ahead than you think at this shit
Yes, science is all about models, but the models themselves tell us about reality.the models are nothing but a bunch of stories which the humanity grades according to what suits the humans.
Congratulations OP. This may be the first time I've felt my personal space violated by a digital illustration of a deceased sophist.
the models are nothing but a bunch of stories which the humanity grades according to what suits the humans./lit/oh wait.The models are testable by you and me.
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Speculative_realismCan we even go beyond Humane and Kant ?What do you think of this speculation ?Speculative materialismIn his critique of correlationism, Quentin Meillassoux finds two principles as the locus of Kant's philosophy. The first of these is the Principle of Correlation itself, which claims essentially that we can only know the correlate of Thought and Being, that is to say, that what lies outside that correlate is unknowable. The second is termed by Meillassoux the Principle of Factiality, which states that things could be otherwise than what they are. This principle is upheld by Kant in his defence of the thing-in-itself as unknowable but imaginable. We can imagine reality as being fundamentally different even if we never know such a reality. According to Meillassoux, the defence of both principles leads to "weak" correlationism such as those of Kant and Husserl, while the rejection of the thing-in-itself leads to the "strong" correlationism of thinkers such as Wittgenstein and Heidegger. For such "strong" correlationists, it makes no sense to suppose that there is anything outside of the correlate of Thought and Being, and so the Principle of Factiality is eliminated in favour of a strengthened Principle of Correlation.
Meillassoux follows the opposite tactic in rejecting the Principle of Correlation for the sake of a bolstered Principle of Factiality in his post-Kantian return to Hume. By arguing in favour of such a principle, Meillassoux is led to reject the necessity not only of all physical laws of nature, but all logical laws with the exception of the Principle of Non-Contradiction since eliminating the Principle of Non-Contradiction would undermine the Principle of Factiality which claims that things can always be otherwise than what they are. By rejecting the Principle of Sufficient Reason, there can be no justification for the necessity of physical laws, meaning that while the universe may be ordered in such and such a way, there is no reason it could not be otherwise. Meillassoux rejects the Kantian a priori in favour of a Humean a priori, claiming that the lesson to be learned from Hume on the subject of causality is that "the same cause may actually bring about 'a hundred different events' and even many more."[9]
That picture is disturbing as fuck
I agree that the multiple worlds interpretation is promising, and I am personally a fan, but it's unfortunately not taken very seriously among scientific circles. Note that if true, the MW interpretation would open possibilities for metaphysical libertarianism, or at least a form of it, and would strengthen the case for not against free will.
actually a recent poll put it at the top 5 interpretations. The work on it is being done and now supported by many scientists. Granted, this poll had no interpretation above 15% and that's why I think phil's needed to get involved earlier. But these things aren't unanswerable questions like they like to pretend
what models have you tested ?
/sci/ here, and going through physics university, you test nearly all of them. Save for general relativity you test them all. There are some really clever lab experiments you are needed to do.Physics isn't all pen and paper, it's actually testing things, and they teach you this in undergrad studies.
mutilation is bad guiseYou mean it's not?
okay, so what models have you tested ?I bet you did some Michelson stuff, but besides this ?
wave/particle duality, specifically electron wavelength was my favorite. Also statistical radiation. Both these have various methods of testing them to prove that they are correct.Oh, and I forgot, tested the weight of electrons. God damn was that a terrible experiment that made my eyes water. But it worked.
# so you have witnessed some phenomenon, described them quantitiatively and qualitatively. You also have gotten from the current modelssome predictions and verified that they are correct, in the sense that they correspond to your observations, as you said. What makes you say then that you speak about reality ?
They have actually made me question reality, which led me into papers of people far smarter than me. These experiments, however, gave me the info about these ideas that I can understand them. The Wave/particle duality is something that you really understand a lot better once do you the experiment. I still doesn't make sense, but you can understand the reasons why people battle over interpretations so heatedly.
163 replies and 26 images omitted.about a meta-narrative talking about a meta-narrativewow
T-mack always related:https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=7OX77Qv66qw
what an asshole. He's just shitting on the beliefs of this rabbis' spirituality.It's called "Metzitzah b'peh". The mohel has to mutilate the penis of a child by slicing off the foreskin and then orally suck the blood from the circumcision wound."In New York alone, at least 11 boys contracted herpes from the practice. Two died from the disease and two others suffered brain damage" -- NY Board of Health report, 2011.I think it's perfectly reasonable to request that a boy waits until he is old enough to consent to having part of his penis cut off and a blowjob from an old Jewish man with potentially fatal STDs.
It's called "Metzitzah b'peh".
the year is 208411 kids die in new york from genitle-sucking incidentthe mayor will have no more of this intoleranceshe bans all religion in the state of new york
But only when scientists don't fuck up and both gather in a way that doesn't leave blindspots, and interpret the information they get that way correctly. That's the big problem with Scientism. People who believe that having scientific 'proof' for something means that it must be true, even when logic and reason tell them that it can't be, are no different from religious fanatics who blindly trust in what their god tells them.
Way to go science, you turned another youthful man with a future into a recluse. If it weren't for the internet, he would be in Paris now. Ah yes, he ran into a French teenage girl in a museum. She came up and made a joke that he looked serious as he was contemplating a painting. Then they had a long day discussion art and philosophy, then she read him some Baudelaire and got quieter and quieter and they kissed, and then rushed back to his sumptuous hotel room were they made passionate love, and she told him he could sodomize her and she had not done it with anyone else. In the morning she would sleepily open her eyes to to smell of espresso, brewed proper with a little espresso kettle, and as she poured her demitasse full, he would lightly slap her undressed bottom, and she would gasp and turn around and say, "Yoo ar sooth a cad!" and without even getting dressed, she would join him on the balcony, and they would share a cigarette together and talk about how lovely the day is...eventually he would get around to how he's a successful writer living the bohemian lifestyle, and how she wanted her to come traveling with him...but not yet...that could wait...But here's the internet, thanks to science. So instead he's shitposting and masturbating to cheap porn.

faggot/10 bad method anon
hes right, absolutely right. But what he proves with that statement is that humans have never done science. Ever.
This just about sums it up. If we live in a world that has actual, hard rules, and not some kind of consciousness bubble, then the truth is true whether we believe in it or not. That doesn't change the fact that we have no way of knowing for sure what that truth is.
Fuck, these were some great posts. Did you write them? I'm thankful nonetheless.
Is scientism like atheism plus? A bunch of sad, angry faggots who aren't capable of just having no religion or are desperate to feel superior because of their lack of intelligence so they create their own 'religion' where all they do is talk about how stupid other religions are and how they don't need one.
Yes, but do not be petty, if you do not think they are good, say so, I am a big guy
This is the most stereotypical /lit/ thread ever. Board is called "literature". So post about books? Zero or few replies because the /lit/ hivemind will only admit of a tiny collection of meme authors that they haven't read anywayMake a post about "scientism" with a picture of Christopher Hitchens? Every angry teenager who has a copy of Pop-thinking for Dummies and who thinks they have some uniquely special insight into the world bawls their stupid fucking head off
You have won me over with your flawless argument.
No, I mean it.I hate how being polite and nice on the internet is so absurd I'm constantly accused of sarcasm. You were very didactic and consistent and I am happy you took the time to post. Since I have no issues or questions all I can say is thank you or say nothing at all, but, oh, well.
okay, I was biased from 4chan :
Contradicts himself in the very first sentence. Distrusts anything that contradicts science even though science contradicts itself all the time. Is this really the best fedora-tippers can come up with nowadays?
Has not read HumeAn incompetent philosophy lecturer was teaching a class on moral properties."Before the class begins, you must get on your knees and worship the is/ought problem. You must accept that it's fundamentally impossible to get an 'ought' from an 'is' using empiricism.At this moment a brave atheist, with a PhD in neuroscience and who had over 45 million youtube debate views stood up."Raping a child is wrong/bad/negative."The arrogant professor smirked quite Scottishly and smugly replied,"On what basis, you stupid STEM-tard? Raping a child is a descriptive statement. You are prescribing a normative value and implying it 'ought' to be a negative thing.""Wrong. The entire debate resides inside a semantic framework with the concept of normative having no relevance. All we have are 'IS' statements based on empirical observation, and various forms of the verb 'TO BE'. There 'IS' a Child; the Child 'WAS' raped; a governing body 'HAS' decided that it's a punishable offense; you 'ARE' crying about 'oughts'; and you 'ARE' ignored while punishable offenses 'ARE' influenced by empirical observation, economic trends, social pressures and other forms of 'IS'. Your so-called normative 'ought' has been demolished because we can and do form policies and decisions inside inter-subjective semantic models, and individuals voice their own subjective 'IS' statements to collectively influence the framework."The professor was visibly shaken, and dropped his chalk and copy of A Treatise of Human Nature. He stormed out of the room crying about what he ought to do. There is no doubt that at this point our professor, David Hume, wished he had embraced New-atheism.The previously faux-Christian contrarian students erupted into applause and declared that moral values are officially in the hands of science. An eagle named "the scientific method" flew into the room and perched atop the copy of "The Moral Landscape" and shed a tear on the hardcover. The last sentence of "the God delusion" was read several times, and the Pope declared that morality does not come from God.The professor lost his tenure and was executed by Hume's guillotine the next day.The brave student's name? Sam Harris.
That is disgusting. I don't know how I never heard of that before
May I ask: Is science a coined term for something that is fantastical, but more so coined from something that is fantasy?
science contradicts itselfThat's exactly how it progresses. Someone finds something that doesn't fit an old theory and creates a new one that fits all the evidence.And if you are talking about multiple theories for different scales. That's why all theories have parameters.
I really really want to believe that you posted that with satire intentions towards scientism, but one can never know how much retardation there can be nowadays.
I loled and saved
tfw a wild fact appears
you're dumb and have proved you know nothing about quantum mechanics or its interpretations. Interpretations are by their very definition untestable, the "worlds" that Everett proposed are spatiotemporally separated from ours so that we'll never be able to contact them.
what are the seven liberal arts for modernity?have they changed?
1. Shitposting
The liberal arts don't change. Human nature doesn't change. Hegel and the Christians have deluded the masses into thinking history has a direction. Read John Gray.
What should be added under Dialectic-Logic?
I couldn't even be bothered to get it out of the plastic sheet for you, OP. What would you change about it?
Seven Mechanical Arts...
Rather, these are the Seven Mechanical Arts...
Seven Fine Arts
Seven Higher Sciences...Geez, everything is Seven! What a mania!
What is this turbo autism...
...
Can you explain what these note sheets are, why you have them, how you have the time for this, etc.?
Is that your handwriting? Because that's fucking beautiful.
Just trying to sort out personal options I suppose. I would have liked to have understood what relationship Grammar had to the Alexandrine School, or how an individual occupation might be related to a set of occupations. Things like this help explain certain aspects of history, like why Jefferson felt an obligation to learn the language of the aboriginals for example. He had to learn the Grammar of the continent because he was honour-bound to do so. Anyway, I was homeschooled, and so I could choose my own avenues. Now my binders are overflowing, yet I find that every subject can correlate with something else, nothing that I write down is in any sense a subject apart. So it's the concentric its which appears autistic. Everything eventually comes together.
I would prefer 'a handsome script' anon. But thank you.
What books can I read that will make me stop masterbation? Help me /lit/
, 
What do you think about Chomsky aside from the Harris thing? And where should you start with his books? Anyone got a chart?
Anyone got a chart?why is /lit/ filled with retards
You sure are a cynical little shit, you should find another shtick that one sees as much use as your piss jars in the closet.
Top notch con manI'm a big fan
Anyone got a chart?is this /mu/?start with syntactic structures and then stop, it's the only thing he wrote worth reading, beside maybe his book on propaganda. the rest of it is muh imperialismheres a free linkhttp://lingo.stanford.edu/sag/papers/lees-rev.pdf
Manufacturing Consent and Understanding Power are two go-to Chomsky works
Care to explain?
oops wrong link here ya gohttp://jpkc.whut.edu.cn/yyxdl/uploadfiles/mzxd/Syntactic_Structures.pdf
He Writes books and gives lectures highly critical of the military - while making millions off his work for the militaryHis 'best work', Manufacturing Consent, calls corporate marketing propaganda and decries it. Then and now he makes millions as a consultant helping corporations create better marketingHe promotes higher taxes on the rich, but pays no taxes on his millions because he uses shelters and trustsThe 'tenured professor who promotes anarchy' is just funnyall part of the public record, well proven, and admitted publicly by ChomskyI admire his boldness
Citations?
The best is probably the book Do As I Say Not a As I Do; well-footnoted and acknowledged by Chomsky as accurate.
i wrote a paper on 'culture of terrorism' in prep, i thought it was pretty good but then again i was in my anarchist-crust-punk phase
What do you think about Chomsky aside from the Harris thing?implying Chomsky has any relevance aside from his 10 seconds of fame - a footnote to the greatest philosopher of all time
You're best listening to his album speeches at first. That's a good introduction.
What does Chomsky have to do with Aristotle?
In all seriousness now OP, this article is quite good; Chomsky is quite polemic by nature and I think you need some balance to read him without getting frustrated -at least for an agnostic like myself. I could see someone finding him charismatic if they already agree with all he says.http://plato.stanford.edu/entries/innateness-language/
implying Aristotle wasn't almost always wrongAyn Rand also said Aristotle was the greatest philosopher of all time too, and you know what her work is like.
he's a dummy
rand was messed up but even a blind squirrel can find a nut
The joke-----------Your empty skull
oh the irony
Half convinced this is a samefag
Babby's first ideologue.
The best is probably the book Do As I Say Not a As I Do; well-footnoted and acknowledged by Chomsky as accurate.But the charge itself is silly. It's not Chomsky's fault the Pentagon funds MIT. It's not like he interviewed for a job working for the military as Noam Chomsky Inc., the way his critics want to make out.
You should google the interview Bachem Macuno did with him. Very enlightening.
why's it so hard for you guys to determine who is full of shit and who is not full of shiti mean look at him
If you're interested in his linguistic work you should read his "The Minimalist Program" from 1995; that's the most recent revolution in chomskyan linguistics. There are a lot of detractors to the research program, so you should also look at "The Structure of Unscientific Revolutions," and article by three vociferous critics.
But he has also purposefully plied for mikitary grants, joined groups on military projects, etc.He has actively sought work for the DoD and corporations for millions.So -you're incorrect
harris BTFOd him
It's not Chomsky's fault the Pentagon funds MIT.Great defense. "The military is evil but I'll working for an institution they fund because, you know, I'm clinically allergic to any place that isn't the MIT."If really he didn't want any contact with them he'd simply resign, it's not like he can't afford it right now.
Can we all at least agree that he's got an amazing smug smile?
Young chomsky was so fucking qt.
Was going to say the same.
I don't really know how much of what is said against him is true. But even if it's ALL true, I don't think it amounts to the kind of hypocrisy his critics would like to imagine. He's not critical of the military; he's critical of US policy. Do you have any evidence that he sets the policy he opposes? Because that would be hypocrisy.
Working at an institution funded by the Pentagon, but not actually producing anything that can be used for violence - and in fact committing much of one's career to speaking out against the Pentagon - is a bad thing.Idiot
Hey, I'm not the one pretending to be an intellectual and still working on the payroll of an institution I pretend is bad. Chomcuck can be a shill all he wants, but being a shill and pretending to be an intellectual and still woking for the guys you supposdly oppose as an intellectual is pretty high on the bad intellectual hygiene scale. It's not about violence, it's about not being a class-A fraud. I hope Chomchom has a good rationale for this.Or are you going to pretend that Chomsky's work at MIT did anything to mitigate the Pentagon's use of violence ? "Speaking out against the Pentagon" when you're simply getting internet points for it and not changing anything is simply bribing your way into a comfortable position. From here it just looks like he's comfy being a proeminent fraud. Not that I don't understand the appeal of it, but let's not judge a MIT professor by the standards of a sleazy 4channer.
he's not critical of the military Proven - you either haven't read him much or you're a fucking liar
He applied for grants; i.e. Volunteered, to make the military more combat effective in Vietnam.He SOUGHT OUT grants and programs working for the military and corporations and made millions doing it.All the while selling books and lectures about the problems with the military, corporations, and the rich
This is because the military grants money for pretty much anything to do with the middle east nowadays and don't really need results. I can get military grants for studying Arabic or Farsi without any obligations.
ignoring Chomsky's grants were for combat efficiency in Vietnam while Chomsky was protesting Vietnamnot talking about Chomsky's ongoing work on corporate marketing while he writes books calling corporate marketing vile propagandaTypical
Also- not talking about How Chomsky has tax attorneys, tax accountants, trusts, etc. then charges thousand of dollars plus airfare and lodging! to tell college kids 'Capitalism is fascism'
Proven - you either haven't read him much or you're a fucking liarI haven't read that much of him, I prefer to listen to him speak. Tons of stuff available on iTunes, btw. But I think you and others are falling for a deceptive reduction. He's not critical of the military, he is critical of the US foreign policy that uses the military for it's ends. This is a pretty crucial and readily appreciable difference. Right?
Also- not talking about How Chomsky has tax attorneys, tax accountants, trusts, etc. then charges thousand of dollars plus airfare and lodging! to tell college kids 'Capitalism is fascism'Is that a direct quote?
Is GRRM the most important Feminist author of the last 30 years?
DFW is the most important feminist for his extensive hands-on work in the field of audience pussy.
Fat fuck
kekhow did the audience pussy meme come about? did he actually write something like that? in jest, maybe?
http://www.slate.com/articles/arts/books/2012/09/d_t_max_s_david_foster_wallace_biography_every_love_story_is_a_ghost_story_reviewed_.html"Sure, his friend Jonathan Franzen felt compelled to point out that Wallace was never “Saint Dave,” but it’s another thing entirely to see him walking through the Amherst campus as an undergraduate, remarking on the springtime “smell of cunt in the air.” We later learn that Orin Incandenza’s penchant, in Infinite Jest, for seducing young mothers is in fact something he shared with his creator. We learn about DFW’s womanizing, about his book-tour fondness for “audience pussy,” and that he once wondered aloud to Franzen about whether his only purpose in life was “to put my penis in as many vaginas as possible.” "
I need to use that quote for copypasta purposes.
that's crazy. DFW feels like such a hypocrite. kek.
He never said he was better than the characters in his books. If anything he was writing about his own problems.
there's just something about being suicidal and having an extensive self help library while at the same time doing stuff like the This Is Water lecture that seems phony to me.He's not saying he's better, but he's putting himself into a position, willingly, where a lot of people who admire him will listen to and somewhat try to do what he says. I think he's a great author, and I'm not passing judgement on him as a person as a whole, just saying something about him seems pretty twisted. like whatever he says about moral or cultural issues should probably be taken with a grain of salt
BASED
He definitely was a sad, twisted, insecure man but that's exactly what made his writing effective. I view his social commentary not as coming from a place of moral authority but something akin to an addict talking about their own addictions while even as they still struggle with them.
When did being good with the ladies become a negative trait?
My girlfriend Ph.D anti-feminist and I get along just fine with our horrible systematically oppressive gender roles. Our relationship functions beautifully. We relish the ability of one another to perform a unique function that simultaneously affords us risk aversion from external forces, and promotes a flourishing symbiotic environment of self-actualization.
It's a negative trait when you use it as a form of escapism that ultimately doesn't make you any less miserable, like he did.Having sex with lots of women is fine so long as you're actually enjoying it.
Sticking to the point, no he's not.He's just fair to women and doesn't use them as objects as most men have in fantasy for the past 30 years.
eh, the books are full of rape and women at the mercy of powers beyond them. there's women warriors and whatnot but the series is just influenced by some recent developments, nothing wrong with that, but it's not like he's enlightened and completely just or anythingthere's certainly a bunch of objectification going on in there
Pretty sure the nuts he was busting felt good in the moment.
He's writing about a fantasy world but it clearly draws from medieval Europe. Because women are mistreated dosent mean that were supposed to clap our hands and say "haha yes!" It's part of the setting you dunce
in the momentThat's the exact problem.
Some writers drink heavily, other's take heroin for the moment. Pussy comes with a lady's personal warmth. If it was a futile vice, at least it was one we're all born to do anyway.
It doesn't have to be a futile vice. It just is for most people.
New to these genres? Check out these charts for recommendations!Fantasyhttp://vignette4.wikia.nocookie.net/4chanlit/images/a/a8/1307836551252.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20110612005642Sci-Fihttp://vignette2.wikia.nocookie.net/4chanlit/images/a/a6/Scifilit.jpg/revision/latest?cb=20100710233344Questions to consider What SF/F books are you currently readingWhat SF/F books have you read this year?Who are your favorite SF/F authors?Recent purchases?Upcoming releases you're excited for?What is your favorite subgenre of SF/F?What are your favorite interpretations of the Arthurian Legends?
i'm surprised to see john marco on the fantasy charthe's the first fantasy author i really likedwhat's the castle in the clouds supposed to mean?
Cosmerefag reporting in, happy for an excuse to sperg about the Cosmere.
I'm new to this board so sorry for probably beating a dead horse .Are Tolkien's Lord of the Rings trilogy a good read? Or are they just entry level garbage for dumb-dumb's?Also recommend some essential entry level books that aren't garbage. I got really into reading about a year ago and i don't really know where to go next.
About to pick up Dune. I tried reading it a while ago, but didn't make it past page 100. I'm going to give it another chance.As far as what I've read so far:American Gods - Neil GaimanIt was all right. It really picked up toward the end. I found the main character kind of flat. I know that's how he is supposed to be, but still. I will probably read Gaiman again in the future.Lucifer's Hammer - NivenProbably the best post-apocalyptic novel as far as realism goes in terms of the science and what would might actually happen if a comet hit us. Not as convoluted and literary as The Road, which I liked. It is a bit dated since it was written in the 70s.The Wise Man's Fear, Patrick RothfussOkay. Not as tightly plotted as the first book.The Dragon Reborn - Robert JordanI like Jordan, especially for his world-building. I don't think the third novel is as good as the first two. From what I've read, it goes downhill until Sanderson picks up the story. It's still good, just a lot more words with less happening.Several Star Wars books authored by Drew Karphyshyn.Fun reads if you like the Star Wars universe.
Definitely not entry level garbage.Not everyone likes Tolkien, but his world building is second to none. I'm glad to have read these before the movies came out. It's the quintessential quest plot line, and most if not all modern fantasy is influenced by it in some way. It's a must read, even for non-fantasy readers.
Oh, forgot to add another.The Book of Strange New ThingsI enjoyed this one. A literary first contact story. Some things are left unexplained, but it's still a good read.
what's the castle in the clouds supposed to mean?You'd have to read Wolfe's "Wizard Knight" to find out.
Lord of the Rings is kind of important to the genre because it sets the tone for everything.It's got a detailed world, mythological characters, and defines a lot of fantasy concepts that influenced pretty much everyone.That's the surface level stuff, but it's a good read from a literary perspective because of how it's been interpreted. Tolkien's fantasy wasn't just straight up fantasy, it was deeply-laced with commentary on his values, beliefs and how he saw the world and spirituality. There's plenty of allegory and symbolism in it, to the point where people who treat LOTR as just the baseline for fantasy See: Peter Jackson are missing much of the point.On the other hand it's very long, very wordy, and often very slow. Compared to the Hobbit which is a much more accessible book with more relatable characters, LOTR I think has a lot of trouble breaking free of the mythological aura to show the cast as real individuals.But then that's also important to understanding the genre too, because that part of LOTR has become detrimental to a lot of books who tried to ape it.I don't know if I'd say start with it, but I think it's good to read it at some point because it's key in understanding how the genre is the way it is.
What SF/F books are you currently readingThe Way of Kings, Brandon Sanderson Recent purchases?Assassins Apprentice, Robin HobbUpcoming releases you're excited for?ASOIAF continuing pleb I know
Read The Hobbit. Then read other stuff until you get the urge to return to that world. Then read Lord of the Rings.But yes, it's definitely worth reading.
This is pleb-y as fuck, but what's some good sci-fi or fantasy with a cast of characters who interact, and at LEAST one or two waifu-able female characters who are cool and interesting and are present in the book or series a lot?
actually that was why i was asking, because wolfe has used it before in both the wizard knight and castleview, and i'm not all that sure what the imagery originally meant
And New Sun. I'm a Wolfe scholar and I don't even know. Please other anon, do tell.
The Book of the Long SunI would follow General Mint in battle.
Firefly.
Yeah you're right, dunno how that slipped my mindThere might be some significance in Severian thinking he sees a castle in the sky, even though it actually isn't one. Haven't really thought of that before.
Same anon, I figure its a symbol of hope, Heaven or paradise.
I agree.
watch Firefly for the first time as it's airingcrush on Kayleewatch Serenity when it comes onRiver is amazinggo back to watch FireflyKaylee is annoying and my list goes River  Zoe  Inara  KayleeWonder what happened.
OP here. Thinking of creating a detailed OP with some resources in it. What should I include?
Reposting from the last threadNew to Fantasy/Sci-Fi and really reading in general. Here's my current Summer Reading listBlack Company Book of the SouthFirst LawDuneLOTRA Lovecraft collection I picked up a while agoA Howard/Conan collection if I can find one in townKingkiller ChroniclesAnything else you'd suggest? I'd like to add some more Sci-Fi to the list.
G O R M E N G H A S T
Sci-fi? Try some Dick & Asimov. Also Neuromancer
after i finish the current book i'm reading i'll start reading the gormenghast booksjust as long as that fig from goodreads doesn't show up, i'd be glad if the threads had a few staple works to discuss to death
Read Revelation Space for your sci-fi fix.Remove Kingkiller Chronicles.
What are those books about? How are they written?
generalsplease /v/
you don't have to open the thread, faggot
They're good.Because it doesn't have the quality to justify the length.Gets better with each book.
What SF/F books are you currently readingThe Road and Perdido Stree StationWhat SF/F books have you read this year? When Gravity Fails, Book of the Short Sun, The Name of the WindWho are your favorite SF/F authors?Wolfe, Vinge, Herbert, GRRMRecent purchases?PeaceUpcoming releases you're excited for?Winds of WinterWhat is your favorite subgenre of SF/F?Anything that attempts to be literary, even if it fails.What are your favorite interpretations of the Arthurian Legends?Severian.
What are your favorite interpretations of the Arthurian Legends?Easily Barjavel's Enchanteur. Not the most canonical, but definitely the most enjoyable.tfw named after an Arthurian charactertfw taking gf on vacation to Brocéliande
What SF/F books are you currently readingabout halfway through Rimrunners, 3 books into Chanur, re-reading Blindsight and the Risen Empire duologyWhat SF/F books have you read this year?finally got around to reading Culture stuff, Player of Games was pretty good when it came together, but Excession was my all-round favouriteWho are your favorite SF/F authors?out of my limited palette, probably WattsWhat is your favorite subgenre of SF/F?the hard end of sci-fiperhaps I'm just bad at finding books, but I need more hard sci-fiso far I've gone through:wattscherryhmorganstephenson
Is there a translation of that?
 it sets the tone for everythingI like how you worded "it is the last original thing to come out in the genre". Tactful, Anon
In this order:Lord Dunsany, William Morrison, Robert E. Howard, Lovecraft, Jorge Luis Borges, Tolkien, Philip K. Dick, Ursula K. le Guin, Isaac Asimov, Frank Herbert, Terry Pratchett, Douglas Adams, full stop. That should get you started and, hopefully, finished. Because everything out there rips these guys off.
No.hyped trash.The King of Elflands DaughterThe Worm OurborosThe MabinogionConan the BarbarianJirel of JoiryFafhrd and the Gray MouserThe Broken Sword + Three Hearts for Three LionsAll betterAll written before or at the same time
because it sets the tone for everything.So much of fantasy draws far far more from Howard and Leiber
Severian is an Apollo/Christ/South American god avatarNot ArthurianWolfe has written two Arthurian inspired storiesCastleviewThe Wizard Knight
PKD is trashhttp://www.theguardian.com/books/2003/mar/15/sciencefictionfantasyandhorror.philipkdick
Marc? Btw Marc Aramini is going to publish a two volume book on Wolfe. I'll try to buy it.
I've just started the Book of the New Sun. I honestly didn't think it was going to do anyhting for me but holy shit. I actually cried of joy at some descriptions and phrases. It's just so beautiful and uncanny and Borgesian at moments. I can hardly read it without wanting to put it down and think about it at length.What are your favorite interpretations of the Arthurian Legends?Book of the New Sun and a Pratchett book every two days, bless them pdfs.What are your favorite interpretations of the Arthurian Legends?I've read none, care to suggest something?
What SF/F books are you currently readingThe Healers War by Elizabeth Ann Scarsborough, 1989 Nebula award winnerWhat SF/F books have you read this year?The City & The CityMission of GravityMythago WoodThe Wild ShoreCities in FlightHer Smoke Rose Up ForeverWho are your favorite SF/F authors?Leiber, Brackett, Ellison, Le Guin, Zelazny, Tiptree, Wolfe, RobinsonUpcoming releases you're excited for?Aurora by Kim Stanley RobinsonWhat are your favorite interpretations of the Arthurian Legends?The Mists of Avalon by Marion Zimmer Bradley
Book of the New Sun isn't Arthurian at all. The Wizard Knight on the other hand is really neat and too subtitle for its own good. Also why are sf threads the only good ones on lit? All these wanabee patricians and I'm only discussing literature here.
but holy shitwe've got another one
Is the Wizard Knight worth it? It's because people here actually enjoy what they read and the act of reading probably.
the cutest science fiction author ever?
yeah
http://upcoming4.me/news/book-news/aurora-by-kim-stanley-robinson-cover-art-and-synopsis
pick up random nautical-themed fantasy noveldon't even look at the author, it's in a secondhand store and the blurb is interesting enoughread itsort of enjoy itthere's two sequelsread themget so fucking mad at the fucking ending and the fucking asshole authorlook at the authorit's Kevin J. AndersonServes me right. In summation the Terra Incognita Trilogy is shite and probably the worst fantasy novel series I've ever read, not simply because it's bad but because it took my interest and choked it to death and pissed on its' corpse.
And yeah, it's a really solid book. It's grown on me in retrospect a lot.
only looks at the author's name on the books after finishing three of themI don't believe you.
No really, it was like a four-month long brainfart. My brain just didn't connect this Kevin J Anderson with "that" Kevin J Anderson. Then it hit me like a ton of bricks.
Possible.Most of his SF was
a friend of mine recommended me Lyonesse, i have a shit ton of things to read already, is it worth it?
Replace Kingkiller Chronicles with something good like Gormenghast or Book of the new sun or the Swords series by Fritz Leiber
I've only read the first one but it's pretty good. I like Vance's unique style.
I'm trying to write a science fiction novel but I'm already stuck on what to do for the first sentence. I'm also stuck on if I should use first person or third person omniscient narrative.
If you've never written before avoid first person like the plague. You don't have a sense of balance yet so it'll either be full of I's or go off on way too many tangents. Third person is easier, just make sure the perspective is anchored on whatever character you're focusing on, so that way you don't float off into space and end up getting too infodump-heavy.As to the first sentence, just don't worry about it and come back later. Your first draft is rough for a reason, you'll learn more about writing as you go and you can always come back and apply that knowledge to stuff you wrote earlier. tl;dr don't worry about getting any one sentence or paragraph just right, your goal right now should just be to write out the entire book and fiddle with it once you're done.
Sorry I explained my situation wrong. I dont know if I want to useAs the impact sirens blared, Olivia removed the duffel bag from underneath her bed. or Olivia removed the duffel bag from underneath her bed as the impact sirens blared.for the first sentence.
Second one's better, sounds more definite. As is kind of a wishy-washy word and sometimes people overuse it.
Thanks. I'm probably going to show up more about the wording of my sentences and shit.
Good luck with your second sentence.
It's cool, there's no such thing as a stupid question.
What about this one?
Deep.
Where did you read that Wheel of Time gets worse after TDR? Just curious because I have never seen that opinion before.
I'm working on a space opera thing. I have this idea for a mad scientist type figure. Think futuristic Frankenstein. What do you think of the idea of having him just out floating alone in some solar-powered ship manned entirely by computers where all he does is set the course then go do his mad science?The basic idea is that he's working on a specific thing that's in violation of interplanetary law and also the mores of his day, and doesn't want to be bothered while he works.
Scratch that, I'm retarded
He'll need characters to play off against.
The Lady of the Lake gives Severian his sword.
Philip K Dick is shit, Frank Herbert has only one book actually worth reading, Terry Pratchett is shit, and so is Douglas Adams.
what one book is that?
Unless I'm forgetting something, no she doesn't. There isn't even a Lady of the Lake in the text. What happens with Terminus Est is a reversal of the Arthurian Lady in the Lake scenario.
Dune. Though God Emperor of Dune has its moments that make it somewhat worthwhile.
The Lady of the Lake gives Severian his sword.The Lady is an impotent old man who tortures people for a living.
Any love for John Wyndham here?
of course, gotta love the day of the triffids, that book probably got me started on reading
There are lots of blogs and recommendations on books or series for fans of "Game of Thrones", but what I'm really after is books that are similar in depth of character / character development. I don't really care if it's scifi or not, but I've checked out all of the common recommendations and none of them really fit the bill. I'm not looking for "epic fantasy" or "gritty setting" or "historical basis" or any of that stuff, I'm just looking for stories with deep, well-written characters interacting with each other. In that context, does anyone have some perhaps off-the-beaten path plugs I could check out?
It always annoys me how people refer to 28 Days Later and The Walking Dead ripping the beginning off each other when they more than likely both got the idea from Day of the Triffids.
i never really realized that, but they really do steal it straight from the day of the triffids, with the hospital after an injury and everything
In most legends Arther gets the sword from the stone, before losing it in the lake and the Lady returns it to him.
No IIRC he tries to fight the black knight but the black knight breaks his sword and merlin saves his life and he brings him to the lady of the lake to get a new one. Also the scabbard for the new sword saves his blood or something.
A swallow carrying a coconut?
He gets them eventually. Early on he's all alone, and that itself provides some of the conflict, but his situation changes quite a few times.
He didn't get it from the stone and it wasn't returned.
I need a word to replace 'put on' At the top floor, she put on the hazmat respirator...I just don't like the way it sounds and I've also tried slipped on, adorned, donned, and harnessed but none appease me. inb4 just go back to it later It bothers my ocd/perfectionism to much to continue
don, she donned the hazmat respirator
At the top floor, she donned the hazmat respirator from her duffel bag and exited the cargo lift.I guess it will have to do but something still bothers me in the sentence.
I don't like "At the top floor", although I am reading this sentence alone and it might fit better in a paragraph. Just a thought.
She donned the hazmat respirator from her duffel bag and exited the cargo lift as it reached the top floor.Would this work or should I replace 'as' with 'when'?
That reads much better. It really is going to take you eons to finish this book if you keep up this level of scrutiny on the first draft.
first draftI'm one those of those guys that edits his essays while writing them to avoid multiple drafts. I'll probably write it by hand first, type it up to check for any spelling or grammatical errors, make certain scenes more descriptive if needed, then be done with it.
The longer the piece, the less viable that is. For a book, it's just not doable. Unless you're doing something frenetic like Fear and Loathing in Las Vegas, it just won't happen. And even then, Thompson had been writing for a very long time, and as hard as it may be for some to believe, took writing very seriously and worked his ass off at it.
Well even without Day of the Triffids its an effective way to start that type of story off.
/lit/ has a general nowIt's over, next, we'll have general threads for every branch of philosophy, heck, while you're at it why not make a religion general since we hate talking about that so much too.If you feel bad about your tastes being bullied by anonymous virgins on a siamese stamp trading forum then I suggest you go elsewhere, because this place is not for you.The worst part is that this won't solve the issue at hand, people will still pollute the board with pointless threads and all that will come of it is to create a hugbox within which you can discuss the same topics over and over again with the same likeminded autists day in day out.
It's over, next, we'll have general threads for every branch of philosophy, heck, while you're at it why not make a religion general since we hate talking about that so much too.They have been a thing for a while now newfag.
What is it with you people and this irrational dislike of generals.There is nothing wrong with them.
Why does Houellebecq hate Islam so much?I've read Atomised, Platform and Whatever, and all his anti-post modernist/anti-'68 gen & feminazis/cuck/fag rant is well-formulated and explained, but tbh it's been a while since I read his works, so I don't remember the details around his Islamophobia, but doesn't it seem somewhat a solution to his Schopenhaueresque world-view and conclusion?Is it because of le muslim raep rampage in european capitals?
His new novel is actually somewhat admiring.
Are you asking why a man wouldn't like Islam ?
because the little frail white boy no longer feels safe and at home with all the cool muslims taking his women
You sure you aren't confusing his books containing anti-islam characters?
Why wouldn't he like it?He mocks all the groups Islam hates.He doesn't seem fond of Christianity or post-modern Europe.Islam as weird as it is - and I'm no Muslim - seems like sort of a Nietzschean solution to a lot of things he finds trouble with.But I suspect it's north Africans in France acting all up that makes him so open Islamophobic.He called Islam the stupidest religion, he went to court for it.
I think he starts a good explanation in Platform. Islam is cruel and dehumanizing because of it's extreme monotheism. Where the One God is the superior authority for everything in the entire universe there's no room for dissent, change, or freedom. Thus Muslims are more inclined to believe in a black and white sort of world where "if you're not with us you're against us" is the rule, than Catholics - with their Trinity and Saints to mitigate their monotheism - are. He never really developed this thought, but I thought it was reasonably interesting.
insulting tolerant Islam gets you sent to courtYurocucks everyone
with their Trinity and Saints to mitigate their monotheism - areThere are various branches of thought and sects which allow this divergence though. Islam isn't as monolithic as everyone treats it.go to schoolmoderate risk of getting shotAmericucks everyone.
I just don't see that as a reason to hate it more than other religions if everything is to be taken dogmatic. I just don't fully understand it. He seems to hate "freedom" in a cultural sense; the minorities and the "enablers" alike.For a man so fed up with everything the West stands for, it's weird that he dwells into pessimism and hates on Islam hard. But I suspect he just likes to provocate and laugh at the leftists SJW's defending Islam
I haven't read Houellebecq so I won't speak for him, but Islam is a contradiction in the average Euro-American mind: too similar and too different; too foreign and too close; too old and too new. It is an easy object to transfer their fears onto, but the ultimate problem, of course, is that it [Islam] is not an object at all, but a huge mass of persons and peoples.
Thus Muslims are more inclined to believe in a black and white sort of world where "if you're not with us you're against us" is the rule, than Catholics - with their Trinity and Saints to mitigate their monotheism - are.No, that's absolutely not how it works.
Read his interview on his last novel:http://www.theparisreview.org/blog/2015/01/02/scare-tactics-michel-houellebecq-on-his-new-book/He has become much more nuanced in his views towards Islam.
In 'Atomised' the characters' mother is an old weed-smoking hippie whom he portrays badly. irl Houellebecq's mom left him when he was a kid and went off to live a hippie lifestyle abroad. He mentions terrorists in Thailand in 'Platform'; irl Muslims terrorists in Bali blew up a fuckton of people.Either he just likes to troll or if he's dead-serious and as grotesque in his mind as he sometimes write, then wouldn't Islam somewhat be a solution for society and him as a man? Just to play the devil's advocate
does he really? i haven't read anything by him but i assumed the backlash he got for his new book is just moral panic, and that the book is actually more nuanced and differentiating
You're suggesting he should think Islam is a "solution for society and him as a man" because Islam is socially conservative?
Good interview, thanks for the heads up.
Sort of, like an alternative to European Christianity which ultimately led to the societies we live in now.
same poster ^I don't say that I agree with him or Islam. But its pragmatic and warrior-like ideals & culture, compared to "slavemorale" found in other religions, seem like the solution to most of the problems he views.But I didn't read his latest book and according to posters here it's different now.
Because post colonialism. Because France
Islam is the only coherent tradition still vital enough to offer an alternative to liberal de facto nihilism.
There is also Communism.
, 
Christianity prohibits drugsIslam prohibits drugsJudaism prohibits drugsBuddhism prohibits drugsHinduism prohibits drugsWhat philosophical options are there for me if I want to believe in transcendental values but still do drugs?
New age hippie shit
Shamanic rites. Native tribes.
Create your own
They're not even trying any more with this bait.
Discordianismhttps://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Discordianism
Islam prohibits drugsAren't there various sects within Islam sufi?, shia? which use/used drugs once upon a time?What about the hasashin?
Im pretty sure at least one of those has some sect that has used hallucinogens in religious rites.
Aren't Christians allowed to get drunk?
They are allowed to drink, not get drunk.
None. You won't be able to properly think by trying to force justifications for your pleasures.
I can only speak for Islam. You have to ask yourself why it's prohibited: anything that falters the mind to the extent when thinking becomes impossible is prohibited. A drug like heroin, for example, can be argued to provide no benefit when used in a recreational manner, but there are drugs that will strengthen one's faith in God, how can religion prohibit such spiritually beneficial instruments? Imams will say it's prohibited because the majority will take things to excess and so will smoke themselves into a lethargic state if they are told it is prohibited under circumstances only. I imagine drugs are generalized as prohibited in other religions for similar reasons.
If I recall correctly, there is a poem by Rumi to this effect, specifically about wine.
I can only speak for Islam.Why?Also, can you shed insight on various dervish practices and the like where the young men whip themselves in frenzies or sufi chanting/songs where they enter what one might consider altered mental states almost akin to being under the influence of drugs?
drugs could be said to not being prohibited in buddhism so long as they dont cause the user to lose consciousness/awareness
why you so worried about spooks, op? drugs are the property of your ego :^
Why?Because I am a Muslim. I cannot clarify much in relation to what you're asking, but from what I've seen/heard, it tends to be that individuals who seem to be in a frenzy are supposedly possessed and are without the means to control their actions. The chanting/songs may sometimes serve as a method to rid the possessed of the spirit occupying him. I have heard enough first-hand accounts to know that the possession is real insofar as the victim is fully convinced that a spirit has possessed him and of the effectiveness of the chants/recitations/songs/etc. I have seen the mad --such as we would consider schizophrenics and hopeless cases-- be relieved significantly of their ailment simply through consistent chants/readings of the Quran. The power of conviction is awesome.
Are you steady now?https://youtu.be/IFFl9S39CTM
Jack White-Steady as she goeshttps://youtu.be/WZanpT7opf4
the interplay between blue and redhttps://warosu.org/lit/thread/S6212703
What vision do you hear?
one chloe was time oriented and the other space
multiperspectival research methods
https://warosu.org/lit/thread/6603237#p6603524
https://youtu.be/1TphEh0Qgv0subtle interplay
Permeating the living reality of our culture are certain contagious notions, fads and trends that have the ability to influence the way we think about the nature of Reality and ourselvesTransdisciplinarity connotes a research strategy that crosses many disciplinary boundaries to create a holistic approach
Light can capture the nuance of energetic processesEllie Goulding - Burnwww.youtube.com/watch?v=CGyEd0aKWZE
I want to kill my ego /lit/, what books can I read that will cause me to experience ego death?
The Bible
Not really
Ego and its Own
Schopenhauer
Listen, motherfucker. I don’t know what you thought would happen when you picked me as your spirit animal, but you can take all that adorable woodland creature nonsense and shove it up your unenlightened ass. I’ve been around. I’ve seen shit. I fucked Bambi’s mother back when she was still hot.That’s right, bitch. This ain’t gonna be some gentle cleansing of the soul. We’re not gonna skip through any dreamscape meadows together. We’re not gonna dip our cute little noses in any babbling brooks of mystic energy. I’m gonna drag your useless shrieking ego through the black forest shadow dimension until your higher consciousness can move through the eternal nothingness without fear of its own annihilation.You think you’re ready for a vision quest? You’d better be, asshole. I’m gonna eye fuck so much ancient sacred wisdom into your thick human skull that time and space will melt away into harmonic vibrations of universal oneness.Go ahead. Whisper your darkest fears and deepest secrets into my furry little ears. I’m the righteous guardian of your fate, and I’ve already seen your death.
It's funny how people who claim to want to kill their ego use the words "I" and "me" repeatedly.
Take some DMT m80 and experience an EGO DEATH
It is weird that I'm aroused by deers?
Sartre's The Transcendence of The Ego
haha this is great
stop finding what i dont find funny funny
It isn't dead yet anon:^
song of ice and fire
Siddhartha for entry level
/threadAs in, become a monk. Extinguish your potential and die in life.
You can't.You wanting to kill your ego is a product of your ego in the first place.
Hehuhe
I had considered dropping acid but I loathe the drug crowd so i'm giving literature/philosophy a go first. Although if this fails I will have no choice but to blast my conciousness into the stratosphere with whatever drugs I can lay my hands on.
Brew ayahuasca. You can buy the ingredients legally on ebay and it takes about 14 hours of prep and brewing which is a journey in itself. No need to hang out with the "drug crowd" which you have clearly only experienced through media and 4chan memes.
As in, become a monk. realize your potential and transcend life.FTFY
I have enough personal experience with retarded stoners and new age hippies to dislike them without the help of the internet
How else would you name your corpse? By talking about yourself in third person?
Atlas Shrugged or Anthem
try lobotomy
The Power of Now by Tolle
Don't bother with it, I killed it accidentally a few times and It was terrifying.
you can't improve because the desire to improve is caused by badness
Whatever you say m11. You won't kill it without drugs.
That's not true at all
sure, replace your ego with a spooky unreal collective ego, hippie fags pls leave
I've smoked Salvia extract from a bong, 2 consecutive hits. Experienced ego death, saw the ''pages of reality'', forgot my mother language, forgot my memories, I became an observer, an observer of the space reality itself is contained in. yes, on salvia, reality is like a plant in the cosmos . It is truly a frightening/amazing experience.
Suicide. Any other approach is sophistry. Also, if you want the matter you are to not become sentient for a long time, you should probably have yourself frozen or mummified and cast into concrete or something.
Why do drug users always mistake temporary brain malfunction for profoundness?
smoke a moderately high dose of that legal high meodmt or something like that - completely kills like a cortex of your brain leaving you completely egoless - have fucking fun my friend!
The Death of Ivan Illych
they take them at a time when they are stupid teens, early 20's when they get smarter, they dont dissmiss the ''profound experiance'' rather they try and rationalize it and become solapsists or some shit.
Ego death requires "brain malfunction". You're not going to lose your entire sense of self by reading a book. You're not really learning anything from doing drugs like you would from reading a book, but knowledge in the traditional sense is not what OP is looking for.
I did that shit. My brain is fucked. I've also done salvia, dmt, acid, mescaline, shrooms, ayahuasca, and about every research chemical there is known to man. Even the infamous "bathsalts". I hate hippies with a passion now. I used to be one. Naively believing that drugs in the right doses were good for you. I've found out otherwise. Enlightenment leads to more suffering, not less. If I could go back I'd never touch the stuff.
Ego death is overrated. Existential crises are no longer cool after high school.
I was referring to how they have an experience with hallucinogens and then interpret it with heaps of ideology as if the ideology itself was part of the experience.For example this lad:I became an observer, an observer of the space reality itself is contained in.
Meditate OP. Learn to release DMT endogenously and go into moksha/nirvana. Read the Heart Sutra, Diamond Sutra and Lotus Sutra. Then read the Yoga Sutras. Then try meditating. Work your way up from meditating a little more after a few sessions. Try to achieve dhyana. Try to attain samadhi.
Existential crises are no longer cool after high schoolThis is a ridiculous attitude to take, ignoring feelings because they aren't "cool".I agree with you but like to think that example was bait.
10/10I came.Now write a whole novel in that tone.
I've had one at about 160 ug.
You cant kill the ego. Its hypothetical construct used in psychology and psychodynamic theories that is part of you as a human being. To kill ones ego means you would no longer be alive. Ego is not egoism as lay people refer to it.
The Ego and His Own should be read by anyone under the impression that the ego ought to be killed.
I wish there was really a deer like this taking care of hippies.
I did salvia and I actually experienced not a loss of intelligence, but a gain of dumbness that is too difficult to explain. I gained in idiocity, in capitalism ideology and in enlightened nothingness of nothing. My intelligence remained the same, but I was somewhat more spookified than before.In fact, I have been through a year of trying to lose the idiocity thought many philosophers, sociologists and psychologists so I can drop it definitely, it's hard though.Enlightenment is serious business, once you have you will want to lose it because it's just pure positive dumbness and newage neutral stance.
In a way I know exactly what you mean
I fucked Bambi’s motherinto my furry little earsYiff in hell furfag.
Meditate your dick off.
Just finished this, what does /lit/ think of it?
Okay book. Short and sweet. Great characters.Moral/Core of the book isn't all that. Just a pre-modern emo stage. 7/10
The film is better. Rare case, but DiCaprio really nails it.
The only good casting in that film was Tom Buchanan. Spiderboy as Nick Carraway ruins it from the start, that film should never have been made.I loved it. The prose is efficient and beautiful, and Fitzgerald manages to fit so much drama and description into just 100 pages. It really is impressive. Also, those last lines.
Can you explain why the last line is good or even relevant to the story?Not being a dick, I honestly want someone to explain its supposed prestige. To me, it looks like he just shoehorned some loft, inspirational bullshit at the end, apropos of nothing. But, I'm willing to re-evaluate my take.
Fitzgerald worked very closely with his editor on Gatsby, it probably was cut down, if it wasn't for his editor, it would have been called "Trimalchio in west egg".
It's great.
The film's cast was amazing. All of the actors except for Carey Mulligan tbh were perfect for their roles. Leo IS Gatsby IRL, just as Tobey is Nick. The problem was the saccharine rollercoaster way Baz Luhrmann filmed it.We can at least all agree it's better than the 1974 version.
I always waver back and forth on this book. I think it has some very interesting themes and characters and a powerful narrative. But I also think fitzergerald sort of lost his way in the middle and lost focus, his writing shows it and the middle of the book gets incredibly dull to me. Overall, great book though, I just think large chunks of it could have been written better.
Are you doing the /lit/ starter kit as well? I think I will omit some of these books, as I can't wait to start with the Greeks. I'm currently reading 1984, hope the last 25% will finally surprise me with anything. I wouldn't have finished it, if it wasn't for improving languages in the first place.
God-tier prose9/10
The final words will certainly be worth the whole book.If they don't you're either lying or someone spoiled The book for you, which could explain your apathy with it so far.
The Great Gatsby Progression: First time reading - Omg this is really goodAfter some thought - It's not that good, overrated, isn't the "great american novel" Second reading years later - This is incredible and deserves the praiseYou're all on the second step ;
kek it really is summer in here.It's shit. easily Fitzgerald's worst novel.
Well what's his best? Gatsby is admittedly the only novel of his I've read.
Nice try, newfag.
ebin simply ebinFitzgerald is a thoroughly mediocre author, but The beautiful and damned, tender is the night, and this side of paradise are all better than the great gatsby.
ebinYeah, nice try, newfag. Revealed yourself a little too early.
implying you aren't a pleb summer trollFitzgerald is pleb tier. He's the worst of the lost generation, even worse than stein. I don't care what realizations youyr high school ass has about him he's mediocre and you're a pleb for defending him, even ironically.
Keep going, newfag.
I take it back, though, the first half was quite tiresome for one of the best books ever written
I was sad that it ended
le newfagyou are the one who is new and a fag
Pipe down, newfag.
suck my pipe newfag
Okay, fag, newfag.
I don't know, I thought Leo was an awful choice. Every role he's in these days he just seems to be playing himself, I really wasn't convinced by his acting. And I don't think Tobey is Nick. Tobey comes across as weak and stupid imo, I don't think Nick possessed either of those qualities
Why don't you think it's relevant to the story? The whole book is about a man unable to detach himself from his past.I suppose I can see what you mean, but for me it was a perfect final line. I'm a sucker for poetic last lines though, the last paragraph in Lolita killed me
go back to 9gag you newfag
I'd personally say This Side of Paradise
I actually though 74' was better, seemed more real with the whole thing. That's just me.
Stopped reading once I realized the narrator was gay and would probably never date me :/
Explain.
I am ugly.
I love it. Extremely well written, very poignant, romantic, and tragic. Shame that it's a forced part of the HS curriculum and most people end up either resenting or going around claiming how good it is because it's 1 of 2 books they've ever read.
Something about Gatsby makes it unflilmable. The characters themselves are enchanting, yet at the same time weightless,
http://oyc.yale.edu/american-studies/amst-246/lecture-4
Boring piece of poo-poo :^
I also just finished it OP. One of the finest books I've read in last few years. It's a master class in 'well-rounded characters.' Everyone has a personality and a figurative voice. They're all capable of surprising you EG Daisy, EG the Library Man. The extremely firm social and physical setting is always in play; characters are webbed in local conditions. Everyone has designs on status, so even the briefest vignette comes with dramatic stakes.
As a matter of completely straightforward, non-experimental, American literature, yes, it's rather good. But as soon as you put it in under the light of its contemporaries such as Faulkner, it pales pretty easily.Besides, I thought My Side of Paradise was infinitely more creative.
What is Paradise Lost about?
a misplaced fleshlight
Wanna connect over it?
I haven't read it but I would guess the fall of man or some gay abstraction of it
With a big ol head like that, I'm sure you can figure it out for yourself champ. ;^
It's much more about the fall of Lucifer, and go read the fucking poem you mong.
Tell me that.
Honestly, is it that big?
Just finished this masterpiece the other day. It's not often a book lives up to the hype but this one did. And, like, I guess it's wrong to think about books in terms of payoff, but this book has a hell of a payoff. I read the last paragraph about five times, just completely in awe. I did some google searching, looking for people who freaked about the ending like I did, but couldn't really find anything. Did anybody else get really excited about the last paragraph of this book, about the way it moves and dances just like the judge?
he just finished Blood Meridian in 2015what were you doing with your life?? are u a nigger or something?
"huge and pale and hairless, like an enormous infant." is one of the most amazing lines ever.
Much Nihilism the Novel
I want to see a film version of the judge done correctly so much
dfw you live in the time before someone has ruined blood meridian with a shitty moviefosters good feels
Michael Berryman will die before he gets to play the role he was born for
meconium tier bait
What are you reading? What are you drinking?
My Twisted World antifreeze
I've wanted to try absinthe for a long time but the whole dripping water over a sugar cube thing seems like a pain in the ass.
It's not really necessary, you can also add a little simple syrup. I don't like any sugar at all in my absinthe though. The whole reason I prefer absinthe over drinks like pastis or ouzo is because it isn't disgustingly sweet.
TanquerayEpictetus
Writer's TearsJames Joyce's fart letters
Reading From Third World to First: The Singapore Story while drinking a mimosa
Thinking of drinking some fortified wine that tastes like syrupy hobo pissCan someone recommend a book that will make a drunk person feel like they have a family
V. will make you feel like you have a drunken dysfunctional family of wannabe artistes and a weird uncle who no one talks to most of the time.
Please leave and never return if you agree with any of the following;you limit yourself to the idea of 'genres' instead of realizing there are no genres but only talentsyou base your ego on your knowledge of classics even though no one can ever know all the works that have contributed to humanities 5000 years of cultureyou don't understand the value and difficulty of creating enjoyable, entertaining artyou shut out the opinions of others just because they are different and so limit yourself to an echo chamber and stunt your developmentyou are ignorant of the huge number of giants in all fields who only speak one languageyou don't see the value of solid plotting and pacingyou don't see the value in fun and excitement in writing because Homer was certainly not trying to be entertainingyou rarely read nonfictionyou limit your associations to those who share the exact same educational background as yourselfyou judge yourself and others based on their knowledge of particular authors not realizing that anyone could pick another set of authors just as important out of a hat that you're not familiar with to be truly patrician you must have a deep understanding of the Batrachomyomachia!You obsess over gaining deeper understanding of all aspects of your own culture, pushing yourself into prescribed reading criterion rather than delving deeper into your own idiosyncratic interests and developing a unique identityYou obsess over pushing yourself into foreign cultures even though you'll never be anything more than a dilettante in cultures you are yourself not a part ofyou cut yourself off to all that is currently happening in the literature world to worship the classics thinking this makes you patrician when really all great writers and critics have always been greatly abreast of their contemporariesyou don't understand that 'the author is dead' is just one trend in literary criticism and is interesting and fruitful while still just one of many currents in the literary worldyou cut yourself off to critics who acknowledge their ideological bias and instead worship those who hide it.you believe flowery prose is the end all and be all even when it's not in service to any larger goal on the writers part.you wish you could control what others should and should not readyou restrict your creativity to the opinions of literary authority by obeying simplistic rules of rhyme and reasonyou form hard, easy opinions on works just so you have something to say instead of letting yourself dwell on their more inexpressible subtletiesyou judge people based more on their criticism than their creationyou don't acknowledge that people who've spent their whole lives studying and critiquing literature have very cogent arguments that often can and should sway your opinionyou believe yourself superior for following arbitrary, self-imposed limits like reading for hours at a time
Please leave and never return if you make threads like this.
two memes make a right
Is this a new meme?I'm not really feeling it.
I agree with you butGoTShit dude
their only response is calling the OP post a memeDoing good guys
shamelessly copying a tripfag threadnot a memeWell congratulations.
So how Manny of these did you violate
valis, i summon valisrain down upon usyour divine smugness
you rarely read nonfictionyou cut yourself off to all that is currently happening in the literature world to worship the classicsyou don't acknowledge that people who've spent their whole lives studying and critiquing literature have very cogent arguments that often can and should sway your opinionThat's all me, and I'm not leaving anytime soon, faggot.
You are the type of moron the OP is against.
Is that thread even still around?
i agree actually. good critria
maybe it was an enlightened joke
What's the secret behind this parental tone going on lit these days? tripfags were right when they left lit for ideal city please enjoy your pomo rules
, 
I want to find a book.Me and my mom used to sleep in her room when I was a kid and she had a shelf with a few books on it. I'd often look at them and ask her what the books were about, as I never had the patience to read them. There was a particular one with a young girl holding flowers on the cover. Apparently it was a horror book that she was really afraid of don't know why she would place it on the shelf and my mom would not let me open it, but she did mention a few interesting scenes from it. I was young so they affected me quite a lot and I'd like to actually read the book. The scenes I remember her telling me about was the little girl the protagonist finding chopped up pieces of other people in one of the vases in the house. In another scene, she is woken up to the sound of piano playing from the floor above, and after checking the room and returning to her own, she lays in bed, tries to go to sleep, and as she turns around, she sees the evil old lady who I think is the antagonist, might even be a ghost sleeping next to her. The main problem is, I'm not English so the title was translated and the cover is different but I'm pretty sure the author wasn't Hungarian so you guys might be able to help. I think the title was something like "flowers on x's grave" or "don't put flowers on my grave" or "don't mourn me" or something like that. Any help would be appreciated.
My daughter asked for books for her 12th birthday. How did I do?
not having her start with the GreeksGo back to reddit
my daughteris this the ebin new variation on "my girlfriend said"
She's ugly so pretty bad.
what do her socks smell like
They probably smell like feet, Anon.
posting a pic of your daughter on 4chan
Does this look like Reddit to you?
THe picture is literally from reddit lol
No parent would post their child here. Those aren't ideal books to give someone, but they are acceptable considering she's a young girl. Fuck off, OP.
Please don't repost stuff from reddit http://www.reddit.com/r/pics/comments/37t1ys/my_daughter_asked_for_books_for_her_12th_birthday/
Oh my god, they're so much friendlier over there. That Indonesian chick's story touched my heart.Why can't we be like that?!
Because it's all faked for internet points.
Cool, why don't you go there and never come back?
4chan is full of edge-lords trying to get the maximum number of replies.
Why don't you take my balls out of your forehead?
top fuckin' kek
The itnernet is just one big popularity contest.
oh~ what dicks.I like the Dota 2 subreddit...I believe you.
YA bullshitNo GreeksNo JoyceNo KafkaNo WildeNo ByronFuck off
I really want to take that little girl out to a massive family-run bookstore and sit by the exit while she runs around and experiences the environment for the first time.I really want to run my hands through her unkempt hair and chuckle when she tries to impress me by bringing back copies of my textbooks.I really want to glance over at her on the long drive home and see her nose stuck into a copy of a compilation of Shakespeare's works.And here I am dying a virgin.How viable is adoption for a single father with a one room apartment and a minimum wage job?Just go back to Reddit, idiots. You don't belong here. The site layout and system is not compatible with your established mindset. Or you could always stay and continue killing this site.
thinking parenting is all about booksthank god we're on /lit/ or I'd be scared
mfw I'll continue browsing reddit and 4chan only to spite you
This picture is so cute that I'm actually feeling really bad for the fact that I consider all these books worthlessOf course I would never tell a child who's reading these books that, but I almost feel bad just for thinking it
books is all that matters
you should have given her the G, nigga
I never said that, it'd just be a highlight of parenthood. Am I supposed to look forward to swaddling and burping my prospective daughter as much as I do staying up late to watch cheesy 80's horror flicks with her or making her pancakes in the morning?Nothing. You're immediately harming those around you and eventually it'll turn around to bite you in the ass. SA was ruined by your type, Imgur was ruined by your type, and you'll never guess who's now standing in front of the barrel."Newfag" is an endearing term for people who occasionally shitpost to piss off others, it used to mean something different than it does now. You people are a fucking malignant tumor.
How viable is adoption for a single father with a one room apartment and a minimum wage job?It's fair to say that if you look like the average 4chan browser it's 0 because the people responsible for these kids will understandably speculate about you being a serial child killer or a pedophile
dae r/literature?wow this nigger mad
Just want to add that I think you have a very romanticized idea of what being a parent is like, because I know many people who also said they'd give their child a lot of attention, care and culture and now they're happy to just give them fast food and throw them in front of the TV
SA was basically reddit before reddit existed
I fucking knew it. You faggots come in and shit up d2g. You are all such colossal faggots, and the worst fucking part is that you think its a meme that people hate you. go die
That Indonesian chick's story touched my heart.Why can't we be like that?!fuck off, cunt.
Feel free to leave any time
This. Reddit is for masturbatory navel gazing, 4chan is reality.
No parent would post their child here. Why not? Here's my son's favourite series.
4chin is hyperreality nigga
My daughter asked for books for her 12th birthday. How did I do?
What a pleb
I'm  jkcute kid
Pretty patrician for a 12 year old, except for Ulysses. You should probably wait for her to get older.
I'm actually just subtly trying to get her into Freud. Next I'll get the interpretation of dreams. Make her aware of her Electra complex. :^
Ulysses too complicatedKant isn't
If you have a kid she should be at least this patrician
lol at this edgemaster slut going after big boys lit credit
this is a very cringe post
My 6 year old daughter. Madame Bovary and Lolita.No, no, no.
LolitaOh Yes
People like an underdog, people love a victimEven more if it is le disadvantaged colored victim who became successful through hardwork. Not that I don't value those qualities, as a lone individual, but when told and put under the spotlight they take a whole new colorCheap emotional response. They are to humanity what jacking off is to love
Thanks. He's still only 2, so as long as he's interested in learning to read books rather than eat them, things are going well.
nice feets. could you post pics of your wifes feet?
I think that might be a bit off-topic for /lit/, and I'm not sure I have any with no nudity.
Open up pictureSee little socks and booksAww that's kinda cuteGo up to her face and --OH GODIt's hideousKill that dog OP.
Post them on /s/ then pls :3
4chan is reality
PhD studenton reddit
implying you wouldn't read Lolita to her
Yeah what a blunder, we all know 4chan doesn't exist.
D'awww. Kid's adorable, anon.
posting your kid on a website known for CP and pedophiles not minding some old fat fuck rubbing his dick to your childYeah, wonderful dad.
They are everywhere, dude. You are not going to stop going outside with your children because there are pedophiles outside.
I suppose it's possible that somewhere there might be some lonely pervert so inept in internet use that my fully-clothed toddler is his chosen masturbatory aid, but it's hard to imagine, and seems absurd to worry about it. I'd be just as likely to find that on Facebook, or walking down the street.
No, but I'd probably not take him to a park known for having old guys jerking off in the bushes. As a parent, I say shame on you. Also, weird captcha
How's slow movies?
fuck the kid. we want pics of op's wife. especially her feet.
Yes. Requesting a pic of her feet besides a Ulysses copy.
shiiit, we have the same fetish.
Well, if this thread is still around when she gets back, I'll see what I can do. I can't imagine how I'd explain this, though.
I second this.
What is it like to be a dad?not sure if want
Hey honey. Can you, hmmm, take a pic of your naked feet besides this book here? It's for my internet friends.
tfw had based mom who literally made me a massive book with every letter and a word that started with the letter, so I could learn the alphabet and how to read I was 2 years old at the timetfw she personally drew and painted the 30 pictures representing my toys, the people we knew, the places we visitedtfw read comics to other kids in kindergarten, when no-one else could2nd row, last picWhat the fuck
F...FBI PLS GO
tfw no patrician parents
are you saying you don't have a 4chan pass? what a loser.
he is not a 4chan mod
there are people who pay to post on this website. THIS website
Dad here. I'd rather not have been. So much time and money wasted. I could be playing vydia or reading books.
sure, why not? i can afford it, no big deal.
I can afford a radioactive dildo, that doesn't mean I should get or use one.
whatever. you have fun clicking on pics of pizzas and steaks. i'm off to shitpost in other threads.
Penguin booksPenguin Kritik der Reinen VernunftNice try faggot.
Tell her to comb her fucking nasty hair and then make her read Lolita
Rewall series by Brian Jacques is pretty good. Start with Redwall, and after that any books in the series can be read in any order.
All right, here are my wife's feet next to a stack of my Joyce copies. I have no idea if her feet will interest anyone I'm not a foot man, myself, but it was nice of her to humour me!
yesssss

this is gay
Does Campbell's book on Fineggan's Wake help make it much more accessible? Worth reading?
aw
how old are you guys
I've found it very useful, personally. His old-school mythopoeic approach is in line with much of Joyce's sensibilities. The Wake still defeats me, though, for the most part.
/lit/ is so weird this morning.
What makes you say that?
what
le new age dad meme hurr being a father is incredible but I'm totally cool about it except for those times I suddenly get super emotional Fuck off
No idea what any of that has to do with me. "New Age dad"?
Nice. Do an armpit pic next?
does ur wife know her feet are now a celebrity on a small literary message board?
Well, I told her it was a sort of internet scavenger hunt, as opposed to her asking if it was for a foot fetish site. I won't be getting any more odd photos today, though.
Can we see the bottoms of the feet?
well we better get to work on this scavenger hunt. is there a puzzle hidden in the pics that we have to solve?
Lold
Sorry, Satanic anon. I only snapped a couple shots as posted. No soles or souls.
I envisioned a series of required photos juxtaposing certain body parts with certain authors. It's already too random, though: Joyce should be by an ass, and Fitzgerald by feet, if we're going by author fetishes.
Well you better hurry up and take a picture of someone's ass with Joyce next to it. Your own ass would work.
When I was little, my father would take me to book stores every weekend. I'm Indonesian and back then English language weren't that well spoken and books written in English were crazy expensive. We weren't rich, but my father would encourage me to pick all the English books. I would grab piles of books, thinking I would select one final book from those piles. But he would just say 'Is that all? Anything else?' So we ended up going home with piles of expensive English books. He would set limits on what to spend on food, toys, etc, but never books.Having learned English on my own from those books, I managed pretty well. I got a scholarship to study Master abroad in Netherlands and now starting PhD in Denmark. I never thought I'd make it anywhere out of my country and always felt insecure about my formal educational background as I know it's nothing compared to first world education. But remembering those weekend afternoons in the book stores with my dad, it convinces me that informal education can really bring you to great heights.I hope your daughter enjoys those books. Her face reminded me of how I felt in those book stores. The memories, the resulting love of reading, and where it can take her are priceless.
thanks
This. Requesting that guy's ass close to Joyce.
Aside from the contortions involved, I have no desire to do that. Someone else can continue the hunt. That's hilarious, though I don't believe that's semen.
thickest penis milk i've ever seen, it's halway between cheese and yogurt
If I had a printer, I'd cum on that picture.
BASED So happy to see a future reader B without shit taste anon, keep up the A good work!SED
/lit/ - Literature
Maximum RideOP listen to me very carefullyIt is worse than any John Green novelIt is more infuriantingly funny in its stupidity than Twilight, until it stops being funny and becomes maddeningIt may well be the worst Young Adult series EVER written, because at least the others have a coherent plotRun OPRun
you think we can't tell the difference between real semen and fake?

Wife's ass, no Joyce, no nudity. Cheers!
That ass is PHAT
Put a copy of Moby-Dick next to her ass.
Put a copy of Moby-Dick between her ass cheeks.
what is going on in this threadis this some kind of ruse
Infinitely better than OP. At least someone here cares about their child's development.
Isn't that just shitty, lazy parenting? I'd hate myself if I became the kind of parent who parks their kids in front of the tv for hours at a time.
tfw leftypol won't stop raiding uswhat is you guy's fascination with /lit/?
Dad here. You have no idea what you are talking about, faggot. If you really wanna have an idea of what parenting REALLY is watch this Louis C.K. video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_sA38IUPN6oyour face when you become a dad
You never know how tired you'll be when you have to take care of them, a marriage, and work.Also most people don't come from a position of culture, they barely stuff they learned at school, they can't prepare healthy food for shit, etc. Doing all the research and habit-change in the middle of the mess that is raising a kid must be tiresome.
When you first have them you probably go "I'll make sure my kid will be smart, healthy and polite!" and by the time they're 6 you no longer give a shit if they only eat french fries, play videogames and scream in public.
I'm . Watch this video as well: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=4u2ZsoYWwJA
Louis Cuck KingkekAlso, I'm never going to be a dad because fuck kids.
Is it full of farts?
My daughter asked for books for her 8th birthday. How did I do /lit/
I never said it was easy, but CK spends time with his kids and feeds them real food instead of turning on the tv and buying McDonalds. Parenting is hard, but you should be prepared for everything about your life to change if you have kids.
lol at this edgemaster slut going after big boys lit credit
LolitaYou did very well, my friend.
genre fictionpicture books8/107/10picture booksnoice7/10
There are only 26 letters in the alphabet idiot
mostly paperbacksYou sure showed her. She's never going to have a functioning relationship in her life. Nor will she earn any worthwhile degree.
They are chronically unemployed
Perhaps it wasn't English. Czech has 42 letters.

THERE ARE ONLY 26 THAT MATTER ROUND THESE PARTS BOY
Czech does not have 42 letters. It has the same 26 that are used in English, except that some have diacritics which change the pronunciation. That does not make them new letters.
that edition of the Wake is riddled with errors
They are learnt separately and there are words that start with them.
Those errors, dear friend, are intentional - just like made up words.
Trying to prove a point by linking to Louis C.K
You just shitposted a reddit shitpost.
pls stop painting your nails and pretending that you have a wife
4chan is reality
http://learn-croatian.com/m/croatian-alphabet.htmlle usa is the whole world maymay
http://www.omniglot.com/writing/ucas.htmle europe is the whole word maymay
Is this a good informational read?
buy bookread itstill CaucasianWhat a rip off
"Have you ever been in love? Horrible isn't it? It makes you so vulnerable. It opens your chest and it opens up your heart and it means that someone can get inside you and mess you up" ... Neil Gaiman sucks, horrible isn't it ?
 You're still here OP : Join me https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=N5I01D05ak0
He's good reading for a comfy autumnal evening Not the most impressive writer, but enjoyable
That line is supposed to be bad, you're taking it out of context.
Sandman, American Gods and Good Omens are good.Dont care for the rest, he tends to recycle a lot of his work.Your quote in context is coming from the mouth of a young girl in a comic
so what
so it's meant to be trite and bad, you blustering troglodyte
Sandman is one of like five maybe actual worth while comic series.
he's a children's author, what do you expect
American Gods is the second worst book I've ever read.
American Gods is SHIT.SHIT.HIT.It is a novel built around a payoff that never comes. It is an "idea" novel. Something that introduces a cool concept and has NO idea where to go with it.
le taxi-Djinn blowjob face
Dude, you need to read more shitty books. If you think American Gods is worse than most of the trite out there, than I envy your ignorance.
Gaiman writes for basically the 10-15 age range. If you read him when you're older than that and judge him by the standards of serious literature, that's a problem of your own making. Richard Scarry doesn't hold up under adult standards, either.
This way of thinking is bullshit. Creating such demographics allows authors to produce mediocre novels that won't be judged by those “serious literature standards” how could it be non-serious?. This is the sole reason of young adult fiction. It's creating a fictive line between 20s and 30s to lower the quality.
The Sandman sequence, Coraline, A Study in Emerald short story, and The Ocean at the End of the Lane are Gaiman's only worthwhile reads.
Gaiman basically rewrites the same "mythology dressed up in contemporary life + references to lit/history" novel over and over again. All you should read from him is Sandman.
Where do I start with Dostoyevsky? I own copies of most of his books but have yet to read them. Please leave some reasoning.
I would just read whichever seems the most interesting to you and go from there. I don't see much reason to read Dostoyevsky's works In any specific order
Start with the GreeksAnd then read Notes from the UndergroundAnd then Crime and PunishmentAnd then Brothers KaramazovAnd then the Idiot and Demons
notes from the underground
I just finished brothers karamazov and it was my first exposure to Dostoevsky. Shit was straight cash.
like this:Dead Soulsa Hero of Our Time Fathers and Sons Notes from undergroundCrime and Punishmentthe GamblerBrothers Karamazovthen read all his other short storiesthen the rest of his big ones.faggot.
Whatever you do don't start with Notes from Underground, or if you do, understand that it's very different from his other works.I'd say, start with Crime and Punishment.
Hey thanks, I think I wanna start with Brothers Karamasow, although I feel like Crime and Punishment might be the better introduction.
not reading tbk last
notes from underground is like a hundred pages long and it will blow your friggin' mind, everything else he wrote after that is christfag shit.
pick up Tolstoy, Lermontov and Pushkin instead
Crime and Punishment is his most famous and accessible so start thereThen Karamazov because that's his masterpieceThen Notes From Underground cos you'll need to break up his tomes with a novellaThen The Devils / Demons / The Possessed because it's probably his most difficult and darkest and flawed though it was my favourite Then The Idiot because that's the last one you need to read to complete Dosto If you really must read something else try The Eternal Husband and Other Stories or The GamblerHaven't enjoyed anything else I've read by him Poor Folk, A Raw Youth, Insulted and Injured, House of the Dead etc - don't bother with these unless you're literally addicted
This guy has a pretty good way through it, although personally I'd split up C&P and TBK with Notes, but it's not a big deal. As long as your first three are those in some sort of combination you'll be fine.
, 
 ctrl+f no critique threads for prosePost one, critique one
http://pastebin.com/JxZ55RHaneed critique, especially for the second half.
I don't usually do scifi, but here you go. For a short story contest on a forum, two chemists married discover a compound that transforms them. Pretty standard crackerjack stuff
The city had been aimed, and on the bus ride home I'd only felt I were in a series of photographs. Worse, I was taking them--every hour was only Moriyama or Winogrand to me. And suddenly my outstretched leg became a most evocative gesture, taking up the evening frame of the interior.
http://pastebin.com/JxZ55RHaHave some punctuation problems, can easily be fixed up.You have a good sense of stylization, but don't have me reading a picture book. I just recommend more experience on outside, to better fill in your descriptions. There are characters in what your trying to describe, but they're filled in by a derivative vernacular.
I've read this before, figuratively. I feel like every paragraph is a shot in a film, but they never dissolve into the elements of a scene.It feels like an intimate scene. Measure it. Not so much purple. Let the reader fill in.
You two. Somebody. Critique my short passage.I always get skipped in these threads.
EntertainmentSilence and inaction are insufferable. I cannot, just cannot waste away unentertained. Every passing second, accumulating to every atrocious minute is torment. Self-reflection and introspection have become so hostile, so foreign to me. My own thoughts are poison. Feasting on any of my self/ill-conceived diarrhea makes me vomit. Pre-packaged and readily-assembled thoughts is all I can process to circumvent my mind’s toxic outputs. Namely doubt, existential fear and what the fuck am I pining away in the name of what the fuck. Hush, soothe and calm the infected rebellious fear factory with some more Big Bang Theory. Let me forget.
It's abysmal, because you combine highbrow name-dropping with what reads like a zero-effort thread contribution. I assume you think 'suddenly my outstretched...' etc qualifies as some sort of payoff or piece of eloquent description, but it doesn't. Think about what you find entertaining and readable and try and give us that.
Feasting on your diarrhea makes me vomit, too, glad we figured this out
like in a fragmented way or incoherent way?tell me what you think of this passage then. It precedes the dream and them waking up.I will after I finish with the bus story guy
Give me a break. What it mean to be "elegant"? There's no ornamentation in a two-sentence work. Nor a payoff, for that matter. Give it another go.
forgot image
Sorry bud, squeaky wheel gets the unvarnished feedback. I feel for u
good pacing, seems like the set-up for what's going to be a bad trip, if this goes how it generally goes for other compounds.you name a lot of places, so I have to wonder if it matters or not where the characters actually are.would read more.
Oh, I didn't notice so much. I count it as a critique. Wish I didn't have to settle for blue balls because the ass isn't on display.
It doesn't have to be much, but put this man somewhere. Reads more like a diary entry. I want to see him doing something.
I can see the line it runs on. Too much of an effort to hit the beats.I'll read the other passage now.
Think of it this way. The audience *knows* this scene. It's a trope. Give it new life. Don't plot it.
you misspelled will a lot
When I was a young man, I ate a rotted tomato on a dare. The stink was enough to drive away the bright-minded, but the need and desire to be cool worsened and to be seen as an object of value to the group, to brand myself as a ‘wild card’ in hopes of inspiring camaraderie I was beyond reconciliation.I bit into its tawny and leathery flesh, and its taste sank into my tongue.In horror, my body attempted to reject its newfound meal, lurching forth from the deepest hold of my bowels. In a true display of courage, I kept it down. The first bite anyway.After making a great show of the depravity of my most recently perpetrated act, I looked to my companions for their reaction. Did I expect them to hoist me up, upon their shoulders, and parade about as a golden idol of willingness and gnarlyness? I am unsure. Though I know what they did do.I was exposed to rejection, a sickening, howling and shrill laugh at my self-imposed suffering.There was no benefit to my destructive behavior. Was this to be my lot? To subject myself to mindless and fruitless tortures for the amusement of my captors, my friends? These rhetoricals brought me no solace. They simply brought to mind the baseless and idiotic existence to which I had cemented myself.I was alone, and surrounded on all sides.2 or 3 years old. Thanks.
"said Atila.""She went downstairs behind him, feeling lightheaded"passive voice
You have an intuitive grasp of pacing, but you could trim the odd word or phrase. Will make it seem less "written" in this confessional-type work.
Whatever.The possum's sore hurt more and more, at every step of the way, from the chicken's place to the willow tree."Hew reach tree? Hew reach tree?"Possum's sounds echo in his mind, voices heard long ago, of young kids playing joyly. But stumpters youngsters and terries keepers keep the path, then free to come as go as pleased, deathly for those who crossed it at this hour past noon. *Possum's plan: Round the house swim the river walk the hill**Possum's plan: Down the hill cross walk path thust thick thickets hit the tree*Bleeding badly! Walking fast possum's rounded farmer's house, then swimming slowly for couldn't fast, cross the lake's short way from shore to shore leaving blood trails all the way. Stepping fastly through the hill the walk path was nearby, but reaching it was fatal, a tandem rushed him over. Bleeding dripping from his body and air getting dense and rough, once rider picked him up and hold him for a while."Don't touch it!" said the woman way behind"Throw it in a bush, it's just a filthy rodent!"And so he did with so much disgust, that he flew to hit his tree.
She looks like a former flower child who cut her hair short and now makes decent money working a real job. She dresses thrifty-chic. Her handbag looks to be handmade, possibly recycled denim. I know from seeing her often that she frequents a popular, upper-middle-class type bar on this route, which tells me a lot. She’d probably like you to know her recycled bag saved a lot of child laborers’ fingers. Likes to dress like money isn’t a big deal for her, but likes to drink with guys who wear cowboy hats and own small businesses.This passage is a little much, but apart from that I loved it. You're a great writer, keep it up.
it's intentional, to differentiate from the Will that's short for William, to make the characters seem like "normal" people but also to give the story a slight cast towards a timeless, placeless scifi future setting
i would read all of this
Here's a song I wrote for my new mixtape coming out in septemeber. Be sure to get a copy fo ya boi. That shit is fire.I'm the lyrical spiritual miracle spherical clerical individual!
hey its me  againi dont know why i like this so much but i really like it. im sad that the possum presumably died though. it is strange in a non-edgy non-faggy way
What's with the recent surge in FF posting? Is that all you, nigga
you should just call him billwil is obstructively obnoxious I couldn't get passed it
Pleasant passage. Reminds me of what I'd read in elementary school. The broken English is a little here and there for me, but I was really just bothered by "How reach tree? How reach tree?".
worthy of the worst of /lit/ pastebin
Bleeding badly!made me lol. the simple language works with this bit and successfully adds to it, for me.
When he pulled the tabbed lever to open the beer, a deluge of suds spilled over his hands and onto his light-grey pants, causing him to curse. "Fucking waitress must've been jerking my beer off in the back or something. Doesn't she know how to tap a can, equalize pressure, not be a a totally incompetent cunt." Gregor, sitting to the right, simply looked down at the negligible mess, saying nothing as Devon used napkins to dry himself off. The two sat starved for words as the remainder of the crowd percolated in, filling open seats like a game of musical chairs. Slightly damp as any basement is naturally expected to be, and just as dim, the room took a deep breath in as the buzz of the settling crowd reached a subtle, momentary peak before rapidly dying down to make sonic space for the upcoming performers. Eyes fixated on the adequate though paltry stage, elevated only a baby's shin up from the floor, the night's emcee grabbed hold of the mic as well as the audience's welcoming attention. Routinely, she addressed various crowd-members by their appearances, highlighting and amplifying first impressions like a fun-house mirror, exclaiming to one man: "Hey, this guy's wearing an Everlast t-shirt, I wouldn't wanna fuck with him. Tell me sir, you look like someone who does something with goggles, please tell me you scuba dive or ski." Participatory laughter and "ski," followed by another friendly barrage of comical assumptions, observational guesswork. Then, after a successful intermingling with the super-organismic crowd, she vibrantly introduced the night's 'promising' line-up, snappily like an auctioneer, eager like a Christmas Eve kiddo. "Finally," mutters Devon, with a traveling glance from his watch towards Gregor's marble encased eyeballs. Naturally taciturn, strangely vocal, Gregor reciprocated his friend's gesture with no more than a singular nod of the noggin. The show was about to begin.
No need to use words like "light-grey". Too technical. Indent the dialogue. Reads like run-on.The second, large paragraph is best paced.
i'm not sure why i like this, but i do
It's shit. You write like you are paid by the word and not trying to tell your story as effectively as possible.For example:When he pulled the tabbed lever to open the beer, a deluge of suds spilled over his hands and onto his light-grey pants, causing him to curse.You could say twice as much in half the words with greater impact, especially if you want to show that Devon was making a big deal out of nothing.As an exercise, try writing this same scene three or four different ways and see if you can tell the difference between them. The voice and habits you are using now are bad, inexperienced, and seem completely without purpose. Until you learn how to write thoughtfully and deliberately it's a waste of time critique your writing, you are basically asking other people to proofread and they will be proofreading bullshit. Same goes for pretty much all the rest of you. These threads are worse than the fanfiction posted on DA.
Hey, thanks guys. Much appreciated
thank you
Nobody's going to critique this because you've provided nothing to critique. Give us more than three sentences. And make sure the sentences are actually worth reading next time.And drop the entitlement. Earn feedback by offering something worthy of it.
samefag
I know it's supposed to solely be a prose thread, so I hope it's okay if I share a poem too. Juggling chainsaws, chewing on razor blades,my something-or-other is a feral pet snake eating Chihuahuas in the Florida everglades. The damp rot in the woodwork, submerged in the lake,the torrential rains keep the lifeguards occupiedwhile they're not busy smoking pot in the alley;or complaining about the neighborhood, un-gentrified. The sloths at the zoo, truants like Kirstie Alley,accrue green, and metabolize the air without care,accrue green, and metabolize the air without care.
I like her feet
Of course I did. If I can read about Lydia Davis on bookforum, then I've provided something to critique. "And make sure the sentences are actually worth readin next time." Yes, this is a critique. Doesn't say anything, though.Regards entitlement, I was calling out the troll. You may not recognize him as such. I don't care, this is 4chan anyways. I haven't asked for critique beyond one post. And certainly it's frustrating because this happens often. But these are all my posts:Where else have I obligated anyone? I enjoy critique.
Very good imagery but I think your first line is too abstract or metaphorical for the rest of the poem. It might have a better place later after in the poem after establishing what the fuck you're talking about.Maybe it was the seed for your poem but opening with it really weakens the whole thing. Otherwise I liked it.
I might change it back to Will if that spelling is annoying. Does anyone find it obstructive? This took a long time. Worth it though. I'm not a fan of how most people in critique threads either post something short and meaningless they're never going to finish for replies and other people who just shitpost tiny quibbles and lazy critiques see above Probably the only piece here worth the time other than mine of course-heh.It's good and shows promise of ability; clever. On its own is mundane and unfortunately not clever enough to justify that like Tao Lin or anyone else who does bleak mundaneIf you applied your writing toward fiction, or made it more rigorous and made it nonfiction, I think there'd be a lot of promisedo you have a place where you keep your writing?
fuck me, forgot image again
How does one get good at writing? I'm primarily a drawfag myself and in art there are certain fundamental concepts that need to be adhered to, perspective, basic forms, etc., and I can only assume that writing shares this principle of fundamentals.Pretty much any art does for that matter whether it be judo or cooking. But how do you go about learning? With drawing, an important aspect is studying other artists, like old masters for example. I imagine this equates to reading a lot of books by very good writers, so that much I understand, but is there a book/resource on 'writing fundamentals'. I want to get into writing but I don't want to end up like most people in these kind of threads.Pls help.
Might do you well to read on aesthetics, or continental philosophy they write often on fictional writers or poets. Badiou, Deleuze, Baudrillard, etc. Also, kill your babies.
Every scene through them becomes a glint on the morning. Children only know the theatre from living room windows. On the podium: is there any other word that becomes the fact for the day? I pass the news on the way to kitchen....the sport is doubtful. Something about a crisis in Ukraine:"France says it will not provide weapons for the moment, saying it prefers to focus on encouraging dialogue. The United States, which is still to decide on further help, is consulting European leaders."The milk is on the counter. Back in the living room, I find the politicians narrating to me. I've never trusted a type.
Alright dude. let's see. I like "the city had been aimed," Shakespeare has a lot of "unstressed x number of iambics stressed" lines; they feel "right" rhythmically. "were" should be placed with "was""and on the bus ride home" has no connection semantically with what precedes it, unless you meant "aimed for". I understand why you might purposefully not added "for", but when you do that it loses coherence. "only" is awkward, meaningless first of all unless you really mean something like "I felt like my the entire bus ride was only a series of photographs. The grammatical ambiguity might be interesting sounding but feels contrived. Other things I think you added to just be cool:"And" instead of "but""of the interior"not adding "a" to the referencesHere's what I would write if I rewrote this:"The city had been aimed for and the bus ride home was only a series of photographs. Worse, I was taking them--every hour was only a Moriyama or a Winogrand. But suddenly then my outstretched leg in the evening frame became a most evocative gesture."You're trying to write a third-person, detached observatory thing on how meaningless everything is while you're fucked up, except aesthetically, which yes we've all seen it before, it's great you can be ironic and not have to say anything interesting. I don't agree that this is shit like some people are saying, but I can tell you're trying to substitute style for substance in this.
The fundamentals of art are not at all dissimilar to the fundamentals of writing, or any other art, which is first the ability to effectively communicate.When you are learning how to draw the most important thing to develop first is your hand-eye coordination, in other words having enough control of your hand to literally translate onto paper what you see with your eyes. This is most effectively practiced with exercises like gesture or still life drawing, copying from old masters will only exhaust your expectations and you will likely pick up some bad habits. Similarly, with writing the first thing you need to be able to do is communicate effectively to your reader without flourish, to get them to see exactly what you do as you are writing. As an exercise you could keep a diary or write for a small paper.Only after you have a basic, consistent, effective voice and a technical understanding of language should you start trying to emulate 'old masters'. Read difficult literature often but if you imitate their style before you are able to understand exactly what makes them difficult and why, copying will be more of a detriment than ignoring them entirely. You will develop regretful, transparent habits like the people in these threads.
I know this is the person from before. Let me leave that alone. But anyways, it's a critique. I'm glad. Won't "varnish" it.I just have to comment on your rewrite, in order to explain my motivation better:"The city had been aimed for and the bus ride home was only a series of photographs. Worse, I was taking them--every hour was only a Moriyama or a Winogrand. But suddenly then my outstretched leg in the evening frame became a most evocative gesture."You're trying to write a third-person, detached observatory thing on how meaningless everything is while you're fucked up, except aesthetically, which yes we've all seen it before, it's great you can be ironic and not have to say anything interesting. I don't agree that this is shit like some people are saying, but I can tell you're trying to substitute style for substance in this.I didn't mean to write about the meaningless of things. I wanted to write about how we define the places we visit with the media we associate with it. It was based on a personal experience with NYC. I wrote about Moriyama and Winogrand because they often simulate human vision in their works. So that in the final sentence, even ordinary experience becomes associated with its simulacrum. Sure, convoluted. But, it's an experiment.
every art has fundamental concepts, and every art is also learned best through experience. My personal opinion is that it doesn't matter what you write, as long as you do it, which is the same way I feel about music and painting. however, the comparison makes me realize that imitating old masters in books is probably not a great idea in writing specifically. It's bad in art too--if you spend too much time imitating you don't get a grasp on your own stuff--but it's deadly in writing. Nobody at all wants to read your imitation of dickens if you aren't dickens, or your approximation of Tao Lin if you aren't him.But if you want the writing equivalent of the conventional learning for art where you learn anatomy, observation, landscape then perspective, then colors, etc. I would recommend doing these things for as long as you can, instead of and even if you think you can write a piece:-put down any conscious thought you have that seems interesting. Thoughts about a show, or how something you see looks, or an entire experience, but also simple lines that you think sound catchy.-watch TV or movies or read a book doesn't matter which and write down what sounds "good" and try to figure out what makes it interesting.-do the above and memorize the plot points, then write them down don't do this until after you've read/watched-practice memorizing conversations you have or hear, and write them when you have the opportunity.you'll start having ideas, dialogue, descriptions, and plots. Build this up and start combining them or riffing off them when you're ready to really sweat over something like it's an oil painting that would be expensive to fuck up.
just notebooks and MS Word. this is one of a few bus-related sketches that I have, trying to make it grow into a book of short stories or novel. I almost know what I want it to say, but haven't figured it out yet. thank you for your thoughtful critique.as far as the spelling of Will/Wil in your story, I didn't find it distracting. when I read sci-fi I expect weird names, and simple-weird is much better than nonsense-weird. I don't like when I can imagine the writer struggling over a unique name, saying gibberish over and over in his head until he finds the right gibberish.
We stand upon the clouds at the doorway to some indiscriminate afterlife, white light from the mouth of infinity permeates the solid and un-solid membrane of mystical dew lain beneath our feet, suspending us in some unknown fashion. As we march forward towards the, for lack of a better word, heavenly, gates, we see a man dressed in all white, a suit that in Earth currency would have cost a considerable amount of money, his movements are graceful and there's an enigmatic-but-kind look on his soft and clean-shaven face."Welcome." He says.I had not tried to speak yet, in bewilderment of the place and as I did try I found myself unable. Frustration eclipsed my being as I forced words that would not come out of a mouth I wasn't sure really existed. Finally, I set aside the challenge and approached the man, I nodded to him, and he stood aside as if granting me access to the mouth of infinity.
This is pretty good, I like it. It feels, if a bit generic, at least genuine. What is, a positive at least. The rapid, unresolved change of perspective kinetically charges the piece, and I felt drawn in quite cinematically, but in a subtle, dogma 95 kind of way. What this means is, I felt that the dialogue willingly goes into honesty and mimesis while being firmly aware of its being a dialogue, which is something I enjoy reading. The fiction in the fiction is also quite compelling, in its barebones semplicity and pregress meaning towards the future of the story. I'd say Heidegerrian, but I've been pretentious enough already. Sorry, is sleepy.A non-fictiony essay of mine. A stupid thing, but I haven't got much to show. It was this, or vampires or people wanking about.http://pastebin.com/1ezBa4xd
Upon arriving in Trafalgar, Dora found herself bewildered by the bustle of the hundreds of thousands and millions of people zig-zagging about one another on seemingly infinite invisible rails, each person looking for a moment as if they were to crash into the next before jarring in one direction or another as if a switch had been thrown at the last second to avoid a fatal collision killing hundreds.There were swarms of birds neatly arranged overhead in shapes that resembled nothing, save for the tight bombing pattern of a military fleet. She was never one for ornithology. They could be starlings.Dora remembered her reason for coming to Trafalgar amidst the chaos and made her way to the Grand, perhaps Mr.Rite could shine some light on the puzzle which lay before her, or lay before them both rather, its annals of intrigue slowly dragging Dora beneath the tides of paranoia and mistrust.She arrived at the room. Apparently he was something of a regular tenant as there stood a plaque on the wall "Detective Inspector Thomas Rite". She knocked but there was no answer, trying the handle she noticed the door was not locked and stepped inside. There lay Mr. Thomas Rite born 1978, Michigan, US, laying headless as if some large sharp object had cascaded down upon his neck cutting cleanly through it.He lay with his hand upon his cock and there was semen all over his chest. He was nude. She searched the room, but there was no head to be found, and all of his personal belongings were missing, save for his Michigan PI license. Written in blood on the en-suite's mirror were two words. It. Goes.
What person from before? define the places we visit with the media we associate with itAlright, well I figured it was personal, most stuff here is since it's more clear how to tone it. The words "only" twice and "worse" imply that the ride being a series of photograph is a negative thing, and that the ride is "only" photographs instead a full experience of life. What that makes me ask, is what are you trying to guide this to? If you don't think that is "existential" or "bleak" in the way many /lit users I would imagine feel about life and thus project onto their tastes the boards' general enjoyment of Tao Lin/postmodernism and writing .  even ordinary experience becomes associated with its simulacrumunless you have a different definition for "simulacrum" then I don't think that means anything.
Read more. Read as much as you can. Read the classics, read contemporary fiction, read histories and biographies, read the newspaper, read philosophy, etc. Start with the Greeks. The /lit/ starter kit is fine too.Also write. Start a blog and write extensively on something that interests you. Begin writing a short story and send it in to some journal you like, or poetry. Work on your writing everyday.
badundeclared pronouns, no easing into suspension of disbelief, no reason to care about anything going onboring first person voicenothing happensclichedid you read this over before posting it?
Nothing I ever post in these threads is part of an actual piece of fiction I'm writing, I was thinking about the phrase "White light from the mouth of infinity" and quickly typed that up.
I was thinking I don't believe you
The city lights organized a tryst with the darkbetween the funeral home and church-tower clock,reading: "Night Cometh." Forbidden, the couple swallowed Adam's apple,lodged throat-wise, born a suffocating goiter.And the gold loitered, gone fishin', back in the March,carried by a pack of disoriented lemmings and teeth.So solemnity turned to cheeriness, the chattering ceased,waiting for a package delivery, expedited but late,forcing one, or two, to ask:How can the mosquitoes hold their tongues?while sweat and tears leave blood hanging up to dry?How can we ask the gentleman on his high-horsehow to file for a visa, and leave this sideways country?How can I ask you exactly what I need ask you?You can't, he said in my sleep, nodding like a sculpture,you just have to wait for the shores to mergeand for dusk to dissipate, like your aching tooth.And so I leapt up out of bed,and sling-shotted into space with a gun in hand,dithering, pilfering time, scraping the ceiling,waiting for shortening, for a full filling slice of pie,waiting nonetheless...shiiieeeeet.
shh.
Thanks guys.
Well, as a writer I feel my first obligation is to perform under my aesthetic standards. What I consider as integrating into the work is secondary to that. It is up to the reader if he feels the work is bleak. I feel naive to that.It is influenced by Baudrillard And his ideas on simulacrum but I don't take his nihilist stance, on a personal level.
Epic joke, how did you come up with that?
I didn't believe he was thinking then I typed it
A non-moose conjured up five nines––we're talking glocks, you should know––and fired a fat expletive to the sky like"shiiieeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeet."
He? You mean me. Can you not keep track of a singular discourse?
Enough with all this gay poetry it's time for prose.Wet brown shit ran down his leg and followed a thin path a short way down the street. He was facing downhill and followed where it might go with his eyes, finding an unfamiliar car parked on the side of the road close to where he was standing. He was old enough to feel sorry for the owner. His name was Charlie.Charlie was peeing as well and his pants were in a horrible state. On a weekday afternoon the street was still very quiet and on the condition that Charlie not leave the block his mother let him play outside on his own. Alone in the middle of street Charlie didn't know to hide what was happening but there was an unplacable sense of guilt toward his mother that made him uneasy. Finishing his business and surprised at how short of the car his little stream swam he walked back home and walked into the foyer to the surprised gasp and laughter of his mother. The shit on his leg had dried on the way but it certainly did not stink any less. His plain young face held a serious expression and asked if he could a snack.
it's hard to assume that any one idiot is the same as another on an anonymous imageboard
Boring. Not bad in terms of writing, but plot-wise, boring.
Did you get any of the jokes?
My friend asked me to write a concept album intro a la B.I.G.'s Ready to Die. I told him I don't want to offend him and know I will. He asks again, I do it, and he gets offended . I mean what the hell am I supposed to do? I can't deny it was "fun" though, writing something superficial Tony has deep sterotypical black male voice and Bobby a stereotypical white male voice.
Felt it at about the hour. That horrible taste, it was like licking nuclear spillage. The whole jaw is at the dentist. Their legs are starting to shake a bit from all the walking. “Batt”, he calls out. His nose runny from allergies. It was wet and hot in Gamboa. “What?” He heard behind him. It was a confused voice. “Mark, what?” came right after, from a jittery throat. Turns around to find him falling back behind. He watches enchanted at the trees, like a baby to a toy or an animal to the headlights. Upon further observation he is not so far from him. It just seems that way. Cont.?
I just didn't find it funny.
Don't continue, it's not even worth explaining why it's bad. Move on. Start something new.
Nobody ever does. Nobody gets me.
Arm fold.Bed shift.Bone feels like its melting.Off.Repeat."Why do we do this to ourselves?" she asked.Arm fold.Bed creek.It won't boil.Why is it so cold?Fire. Vein.Bone marrow soup.I face her, asleep."Because people like to ache"."Because people need to ache." Skin on the ground.Nothing to be done.
watch out guys the illuminates here
very mc ride
SPREADEAGLED ACROSS THE THREAD
http://pastebin.com/r6FnndXFI'm auditioning to be on next year's Totalitarinism in a Tundra: Star Search Sweepstakespls and arigatou
I don't read anything that opens with dialogue sorry
pls... Do you know how many dicks I had to suck to get this on here?
fuck off idiot I have principles you know
I'll take it as a compliment.
Opening line of my new novel:It was all a meme.
Anyone?
is this first person or over familiar third person? either way it's shitalso shit
Nah.It was all a spook.
Someone needs to stick a dick in you.
How about: I awoke from a meme. Or: Life is but a meme.
please respond
I'm not entirely sure what youre going for with this bit, but it doesn't come off as particularly funny, gripping, or especially well-written. The subject matter is crude, yet not detailed or vivid enough to evoke any real guttural reactions. There aren't any truly awful portions, though not any legitimately good ones either. That all being said, my main word of advice to you would be to tighten your wording, make it more concise and eliminate any superfluous information. For instance, "and on the condition that Charlie not leave the block his mother let him play outside on his own" could be said in fewer words and in a much less awkward way. Anyway, just play around with it.
thanks for responding
Incandescent Bulbs Emerge from the Field of Madness, Just Outside of Detergent, OHThe listless list reasons for tying strings around their hands, down to the nine pits of Hell, the wire, where Pol Pot's Posserun a vaudeville show on Wednesday's, anda trapeze act manned by Greg––the crowdis less vituperative than you and I were nevermeant to be together might expect. "Expectmight," bellows World's Strongman 2012 runner-up in his nursing home bathroom. ButI leave the boats at bay, for no 'ifs,' 'ands,' or 'buts' could smuggle it through customs,meaning the pugnacious Irishmen downing Guinness in McO'Deasmhumhain's Pub, moisteningtheir potatoes with aloe vera, and comparingeverything to their Mima's bangers and mash,probably lack 401k's, but not red-lashed shiners.Beside the point geometrically, the metric,not for Tetris but flying buttresses' little sisters,the horizontal building stilts for cinematic stunts,is the number of Jackie Chan skin flakesthat don't lack rancid cancer, the kung-fu-mancer.Distributed, languidly spread like creamed cheese on a deep-fried Senegalese rye-flour beignet made by a blind woman's dead daughter,a king's yawn can only echo in a warehouse,overstocked principally with surgical supplies,of which forceps make ups 86%, like me.Though the legend ends not there, but nowherebut the minds of those but long forgotten bythose who forget not, not unlike our second-cousinsthe elephant, no. The end arrives like an obese telegram delivery man or woman, barreling house-ways,rhinoesque, ready to pounce on commission-less duty, unbeknownst to the world and its termites;it arrives, leg-and-armageddon, the day of wrecked awnings, rainless sunshine, molecular Tourettes. And when that day comes harder than Ron Jeremy on yohimbe,it will be I, the protagonist in perpetual soliloquy inside your mind's storage container, fat head,who materializes a gavel out of rubble to slam it upon the shoddy, stodgy constitutionsof red hued, passion-fruitless, and inconveniently fuckablearcological resting places of Homo sapiens andthe psychical manifestations drawn out oftheir extensions, media for an afterlife in whichvoyeurism is the only viable option for participationfor the neverlasting eternity of the sole's owner:the human soul, the opus of mummified biologically encased ideals that take wet concrete to construct the ephemera of beauty looking at you first apartment and all that is or by virtue of Russell's paradox or is not,abstract.
As limbs that lithe began to preen and spreadWith Grecian grace, unfolding me to you,Arrest without a sign, turn stony dead,With iron pace I labor into bedThe old and rusted chain of hoary steel That sputters in my chest begins to creakIn dusky beats it measures what I feel, A heavy ballast sinking through a keelElectric waves that crest within the mindAre equalized to lap a lonely thought,A mad recursion, sparking blue with times When hope had swelled unto a bursting rind
Opening paragraph of a short story involving Cain and Abel of biblical fame:The fire rises. Father yells the preamble to the sacrifice as Mother chokes down intermittent tears. Sister Zinniah is off to Mother’s left, drooling whilst tilting her head back and forth, the insufferable cunt that she is. My sister, Awan is to my right, holding my hand, her long black hair illuminated by the flames as her thin frame reels from the sudden burst of heat brought forth from fresh kindling. She’s quiet. The only other voice that's audible is Brother Abel’s, as he and Father shout in unison to the stars.
sacrificeThat sounds extremely painful.
well meme'd friend
Now's not the time for butthurt, that comes later.
I have a prose poem. I'm about to start working on a more ambitious and experimental, potentially running/revolving idea.The black trees are frenzied and aflitter. They beg and plead and vivisect themselves for the darkened firmament, and a piercing florescent bulb claws its way into my vision. The fronds and limbs cannot shoulder anymore; they scream. As the first drop appears on my eyelid, the pitiful things fade to an olive green. Good babies, see? You can take more and it will go slow.The rain does grow, the trees' burden mounts, the earth is fed and my open mouth gulps. I've go to change, I cry, I know this and need it now. And somewhere in the crashing swamps she's ready for me, with guts of Spanish moss and bones of balded cypress. Her mood is hadopelagic just like my skies and she sprints to me.When she gets here we will be lovers and above all I'll love her. She throws me into a storm window and if my throat isn't too ravaged I'll be happy. Wild boars will walk on me and she watches. Our home will be joyous and military and Catholic. She makes the ground full, the ancient pines suffer, my eyes close. The storm fosters a furious writhing blanket across the ground and bends all below it. This is the change I need, but first she must come. I'm inside once more. The trees stand still and I am bathed in lightning flashes and the digital light of screens. I am impatient.
hi. erm...never comfortable reviewing others but here goes:I like a bit of stream-of-consciousness and this is certainly that. I'm just not sure where its home is or who its neighbours are. You can clearly write but this piece isn't you doing that. The clended cultural references seem awkward and kinda teenaged poet, like a clever white kid rapping.But to be fair, I don't like anything that includes the words 'pugnacious' or 'vituperative'. I am very confident that amongst bookish girls this will definitely get you laid a lot though.and here's my chapter:http://pastebin.com/dVMHCeeeplease review..
What's the general opinion on applying Blake Snyder's "Save the Cat!" to fiction? I'm about halfway through and seeing how it could be used as an outline for writing quick, self-published genre trash, as recommended by that one guide I lost the link too. Thoughts?I already know I'm soulless.http://blackstorkstudio.com/download/save.the.cat.pdf
not read it but my general view is that writers read about writing to delay having to write whilst still appearing to themselves to be engaged in forward momentum.
I thought that was pretty good. It's not really my thing but you know what you're going for & I think you achieve it. You've found the tone/voice you;re after and it feels like it's really yours - there's an evenness of tone which is always hard to get I find and the imagery is strong except crashing swamps perhaps - must be a better option.nice work.
*ahem* I've reviewed 2 now, but I forgot to say the second one was me reviewing.please rate/slate/bate/hate:http://pastebin.com/dVMHCeee
“Gentlemen, good morning. Roscoe, unless you want me to hook your screen up to theprojector again, I suggest you turn that goddamn phone off. Now, a question that I have asked myself several times over the years is this: how do we select senior executives at PiccoloIndustries? I always arrive at the same answer: very, very badly. Assembled in this room, myself and to some extent Sal excluded, is one of the least talented groups of people outside ofCalifornia. If any one of you, right now, in a depressingly rare moment of informed inspiration, finally grew a pair of balls and crammed a grenade up his educationally-subnormal ass, taking thewhole sorry bunch of you with him to whatever squalid misery hole the Devil reserves for fatsuburban degenerates who die in such a manner having squandered every undeservedopportunity life has, presumably as part of some grand cosmic prank beyond mycomprehension, presented to them, our share price would double instantly and I could finallyafford to pay off that lousy Arab fuck who says I felt up his retard daughter at that UnsungHeroes Awards fiasco. As if, Jesus! And we’d be able to hire a brand new management teamwithout going through the whole fuck-knows-why-so prohibitively expensive process of firing you hopeless pricks. A new team full of energy and ideas, a bunch of whip-smart Yale chicks withtits like the Hindenburg – before it crashed, obviously, a team that could finally show thoseslant-eyed little fucks at Imperial Jap Metric that Piccolo Industries is still able to kick their yellow asses all the way back to Naga-fucking-saki. No offence, Nakamura.” “None taken sir.” http://pastebin.com/dVMHCeee
oops apols for formatting wonks.
Bump
Random entry I just improvised for my blog. Comments of any kind are appreciatedI was standing in the corner of the room, watching everybody dance in the center of the room. While I watched her, I was unable to hear the loud music and instead, a soft whistle of silence was all I could hear. I couldn't get involved with her, and hardly could I even talk to her while you're still here. Shortly after, you stopped dancing with her. The song was not over, everyone was still dancing when you left.You sat. Alone.She went outside to smoke and never came back. She knew what I wanted, she knew my plan and intentions to ask about it, and she knew as well that you would not answer. He did as expected indeed, and stayed silent without muttering a word."It's not your problem" he said.And he said no more, while looking everyone else dance. He knew well about their problem and the unbreakable impasse they encountered, but he did not care. He didn't want her to become involved with anyone else, especially if that one is one he knew. And he tried to shake off the matter, pretending to play with the hoster's dog while talking about dog related-matters. The dog seemed happy to receive attention, it was not clear which was its race but it was one of a friendly kind as we could see. It was patted in the head by all of us in the party, but for us two it was a matter of avoiding a subject which only one of us wanted to talk about.At the end we didn't talk about it, despite of how much we knew we had to. Maybe neither of us really wanted to touch the subject, and as such it wasn't for us more than a vague mist that tied our small talk. Everyone in the party was aware of this fact, and nowadays, we look back and remember that day, and regret our clumsy behavior. They didn't say a word to any of us again, probably they didn't say a word to each other neither. And until this they, they never saw them in the same room again. Both of them have been walking their own way for quite a while, and I'm afraid that if I hadn't been such a wreck I would be with her now. Despite of what you think of her, she still would be here. It cannot be changed, the past is the past. But we must remember to not fall short again, we must remember how they fell back like that, and how they lost, everything they ever had.
bump
231 words short, English is not my mother language so I believe there could be some grammar mistakes I didn't see.http://pastebin.com/4KKej5EbThanks for reading it, if you do.I will review/rate later
your formatting is all fucked up
much ofuckingbliged.
It was the nicest thing I could think of to say.
My cross legged Gestalt hovered some where near the more yellow coloured wall of a hungarian girl's interior room.I was half invited. The people were acquaintances at a stretch.As I morphed in to a more ready pose,my left hand rested against the papery material which was pretending to be a wall.The people in the room appeared overly self important and I got the impression if I talked to any of them they would begin spouting either marxist or feminist rhetoric,so I observed the notion float yonder.My invitation was a sort of spectre which possessed everyone in the room.They were posers who pretended to be inclusive,but were in fact exclusive faux-inclusivists, for lack of a better term.I observed a desire to leave.The aforementioned metamorphosis reached a climax in its merging of hand and doorknob.My left hand was almost sweating as it worked, like a cat clawing at a closed door.I saw some eyes drift toward my Gestalt, like a spacial aneurysm.I am not of this world.
bumpjust because
I just started writing this today. I didn't really have any clear idea, I just felt compelled to write, so I wrote.I'm not very good, but would like to improve.What am I doing wrong?In the cosmic blink of an eye, one's life is over. In several generations, his accomplishments forgotten. Even if he was considered an important figure during his life, and his deeds indisputable; they will go on to be questioned, belittled, and eventually unable to be recalled altogether.These were the thoughts that ran through Mika's head as she sat in her decrepit, peeling baby blue apartment, staring blankly at a typewritten page, which she had authored minutes earlier. Her gaze began to wander, scanning the four familiar walls surrounding her. One adorned a series of bookcases, spanning the entire wall with their wide oak frames, reaching the height of the ceiling, with the exception of one, which was thin, centered, and only waist high. The inhabitants of the various shelves were James Joyce, Hunter S. Thompson, Fyodor Dostoevsky, Franz Kafka, Cormac McCarthy, Albert Camus, and many more. The books were mostly hardcover, all in mint condition, as her fastidious demeanor dictated them to be. Her survey continuing along the room, the adjacent wall is completely bare, decorated only by the cracking wallpaper encircling a moderately sized round window, through which the view of a stereotypical suburban neighborhood, populated almost exclusively by old, white, conservative, home-owning retirees, can be seen. It's a safe area of the city, with low crime and high cholesterol. At the base of the window is a small table, lightly cluttered with textbooks, bills, and a cold meal from the previous night.The paper, still wet with ink, is violently ripped to pieces, landing daintily on the crimson carpet beneath her feet. “Trivial bullshit!”.Her face quickly becomes streaked with tears, and the air thick with stifled whimpering. At a time which is traditionally suffered through and then celebrated, her heart was filled with despair. Her mind racing with questions of meaning and importance. She stands up from her mahogany desk, stumbling as she tries to walk, only to eventually collapse on an old floral-pattern couch, burying her face in a pillow; a futile attempt to muffle her melancholy outburst.“Why must we all suffer through the same examinations of purpose over and over again, century after century? Are there no answers to these questions? Many great thinkers labored over these quires for the entirety of their lives and careers, never reaching a conclusion other than pointlessness; the very answer that initially sparked the line of questioning to begin with!” Her voice, broken and shrill, pierced through the polyester prison, filling the room with an audible suffering.
Cont.Her thesis was titled “The Spinning Cadence”, of which only the title had been written. Her aluminum garbage-bin was filled with page upon page of false starts, off-topic hypothesizes, and utter mad ramblings.The end of one's academic life is not the most ideal time to have a personal crisis, especially one as elaborate as this. It's understandable for a music student about to officially enter a field notorious for struggle and hardship to have tormenting thoughts about her future, but for it to evolve into an engrossing philosophical dilemma reaching far outside of just her own life was hardly prototypical.The room darkens as she lies motionless, hitherto not having spoken a word for weeks, let alone screaming with all her might. These are the most important days of her life; a time when importance itself is in question.
Hello /lit/. Lately I've begun reading and writing, as I'm currently homeless and I have nothing better to do. I haven't written for a long time but I find myself enjoying it. My librarian suggested that I write a personal narrative. Lately I've been thinking about my childhood and this is what I came up with. Any feedback is appreciated. Houses are bathed in soft light. Trees murmur as the wind flies lightly through their arms, shaking the morning dew from their leaves. They reach upwards towards the sun, trying to grasp it in their long arms. Among the trees rises a barren dirt hill. It stands alone, enormous, like the thumb of God. Projecting from the side a lone bluff, grimly surveying the world below. At the base of the hill lies a small pond. Little distance away from it a dusty road, twisting it’s way over the ground like a black serpent. The sun is at the height of it’s arc, coming to a standstill in the sky.
Baked aureate earth crunches softly underneath my feet as we make our ascent. The hot sun beats us down, burning our backs. My lungs ache and my legs are possessed by a fierce pain that holds me down to the ground, an ethereal tether. We reach the plateau, each of us breathing heavily from the exertion, and sit. Spread beneath is our world. It’s beauty is marred only by the rock jutting out from the hill. It’s bleak appearance draws my gaze, you don’t notice, you keep watch.  For a time we talk in hushed voices, careful not to disturb. We are still as can be in the evening air. I explode into action. I’m up and running, around the top, like a child. You join me, dancing and laughing. You fall into my arms, and the world is crashing down around us as I stare into your eyes, robin egg blue, for the second time. I could kiss you, but I don’t. Then you’ve gone, moving away as I try to hold you close, and dear, to me. I think I may have pushed you away. The pond turns opaque as the sky begins to darken, reflecting what is above. As the light from the sun slowly passes away stars wink into existence, taking it’s place. They dot the surface with pinpricks of light. Each one appears to be very close to the other. Slowly they begin to form a band, twisting like the black snake that does not seem quite so close anymore, here in the dark. A mobius strip has been created in the muddy water.  The curious wind has returned. I watch as it throws about my hair with wispy fingers. It roars, frenzied, tearing at me, trying to break my concentration. I’m staring at the bluff again. It appears to hang over pond, positioned so that if one was to jump he could land among the infinite stars. And I’m running again, like a child. I am a child, I’m ten again and this is a game. My tiny heart beats as I pump my legs sprinting towards the bluff, cutting my anchors loose with each step. The edge rushes towards me and I let go completely, falling or flying.  Bruised knees are in their own way a form of escapism, albeit an unpleasant one. Like most wounds they will heal, leaving behind only a scar. On those damaged foundations we will build anew.
The earth is made of choc-o-late,the sea is filled with wine,And all the stars in heaven's crownWith matchless splendor shine;Yet heaven, when she, looking down,compares her crown to mineA humble wreath of fennel leaf,feels somewhat less divine.For mine's a kingdom more sublimethan aught she comprehends;No handprint mars that lofty climb,--but mine abounds in friends.Nor deity on Helicon,nor maiden of the vale,Nor gypsy's magic tambourine,nor lovelorn nightengaleHas melody enough to singthe strains of my delight;For friends, what little joys we bringin measures more requite.And anyplace I go do foeand foe their wrongs repent,As though my smiling face the woe--ful warps the strife unbent.From Camelot to Evergreen,dear friends, all mankind,My joy is that of bonhomieand not to me confined.
Is it possible to write fantasy these days without it being generic?
http://pastebin.com/dVMHCeeenot bad.
America has become profoundly disinterested as a people and our government has mutated into a pseudo fascist corporate amusement park where only the rich have express passes. The recession and the youth of the eighties have raised a generation who are solely bred for the rat race. The young should just say fuck that and build our own industries and organizations, maybe we would ache and suffer in the short term but I would rather die next to people that labored to make their world better than die boxed into a cubicle slaving away at a sprawling machine so my children can get eaten by it too. Precious sleep was fought back by flashbacks to the beggar Al Capone in the waning moments of my trip clutching at me for cigarettes and young flesh. I had thought of my bed all day I was finally here and I felt like the first man on the moon. I couldn't stop thinking of the stream of consciousness I had paddled down to get here. I have doubts that the acid was still even affecting my mind, but with no break to let my mind adjust my thoughts were still warped and geared toward the fast paced trip. I pondered about an extended metaphor that the final stages of my acid trip reminded me of our once proud nation. Long gone was the bright lights, shimmering ideals, and great movements which once defined us. Only the warped skeletons remain and now we wander through them asking ourselves what we’re supposed to do with the tail end of it all. One of the final excerpts of a short story I just started.
A paradoxical philosopher, carrying to the uttermost length that aphorism of Montesquieu's, 'Happy the people whose annals are tiresome,' has said, 'Happy the people whose annals are vacant.' In which saying, mad as it looks, may there not still be found some grain of reason? For truly, as it has been written, 'Silence is divine,' and of Heaven; so in all earthly things too there is a silence which is better than any speech. Consider it well, the Event, the thing which can be spoken of and recorded, is it not, in all cases, some disruption, some solution of continuity? Were it even a glad Event, it involves change, involves loss of active Force; and so far, either in the past or in the present, is an irregularity, a disease. Stillest perseverance were our blessedness; not dislocation and alteration,--could they be avoided.The oak grows silently, in the forest, a thousand years; only in the thousandth year, when the woodman arrives with his axe, is there heard an echoing through the solitudes; and the oak announces itself when, with a far-sounding crash, it falls. How silent too was the planting of the acorn; scattered from the lap of some wandering wind! Nay, when our oak flowered, or put on its leaves its glad Events, what shout of proclamation could there be? Hardly from the most observant a word of recognition. These things befell not, they were slowly done; not in an hour, but through the flight of days: what was to be said of it? This hour seemed altogether as the last was, as the next would be.
He had never allowed himself to displace his consciousness into the rift. Perhaps he feared it would see the eclipse and deconstruction of his soul, something that; as a man a little too tied to the past, he could not abide the idea of. This did not prevent him from carrying out his work with due prejudice and diligence, in fact, he proposed to himself that the very reason he was able to perform the research he so enjoyed was due to the fact he had been uncontaminated by the vast, soul destroying expanse that would have been lain before him should he have chosen to don the technological vestments his subjects so often did in his presence.
brief but positive...I'll take that.
Hard to feel affected by this without a buildup, feels preacy/over-dramatic. I like the sentiment as the backbone of a story though.I looked at Tupac, he was looking off through the trees at the horizon. His outline shimmered as he walked.“Hey Tupac.” I said.“What?” he said.“Why do you think we’re here?”He swung his foot through a rock, trying to kick it down the path.“I don’t know man.”I stopped walking.“Do you think we’re here for different reasons?”He stopped walking and turned around.I said, “Like you being a hologram, and me being a person. Do you think we’re here for different reasons?”Tupac pulled out our last joint and lit it with his laser vision, he hit it and handed it to me. We kept walking.
I laughed, the last line killed a lot of my appreciation. Broad overreaching advice: Use the least amount of stuff possible to make the punchline. It feels like it hits you once then like rubs the hand around on your face.Good tho
I began writing this draft yesterday. Felt so nice, but what can I do to up my game?
Of course it is. Just because it might be a minority doesn't mean it's not possible.
kek
A short story flash fiction, reallyI lit up a cigarette even though my chest hurts. She told me that ship has sailed, and it truly has. I have been hearing this often and not once has it been unfaithful. At a loss for ships, I lay in bed with that whore phrase, make love to it.Early in the morning I leave the brothel and drag my self back to the gray empty harbor, lighting another cigarette under the streetlights in attempt to smother the feeling in my chest and in honor of things past. Of things gone and sailed, by others. Nothing awaits me but the seaside, and yet I do not feel abandoned. It needs my observing eyes to come to be, and to keep on being, my recurring gaze, immaterial, is what keeps the concrete and iron from dissolving, sugar-like, in the water. If I did not perform this observation, others would eventually be forced to rebuild it with gaze and noun, re-say the light refractions of solids.I did not have to pay the whore for her services since I am a known, respected figure in this small town. They all know I harbor the quay whereof their ships take sea.Good prose, dense shit. I'm saving it to my computer in order to read a few more times and analyze, but is there heardThis particular kind of indefinite subject doesn't work with there, it would be better phrased as "it is there heard..." or, IMO, even better as "it is heard, there,..."; also: an echo rather than an echoing would probably be better too, since you need a complement to what is heard and a noun fits best.Very good, though. Is it part of something else? Is there more, is it going somewhere?
Your first sentence makes me think it's starting in past tense and moving into present tense.I'd personally change it to "I light a cigarette" or "I spark up/spark a cigarette".
First paragraph:As the previous anon said, the beginning verb confuses with the tense shift. Establish that the story is primarily written in the present tense. I find the words “even though” to be clunky, could a single-word conjunction be used? The long vowels are not particularly attractive, especially since the utterance causes one to become breathless before the sentence ends. The phrase, “my chest hurts,” is pleasing. The extended metaphor of the ship falls flat and is unoriginal. Thus, the concluding sentence is unappealing, but I feel the sentence is better than the one preceding it. I would suggest editing out the third sentence; it does nothing.Second paragraph:I am not a particular fan of adjectives or adverbs, so the opening sentence of the paragraph irks me. “Gray empty harbor” could endure several rewritings, especially some light editing; there is a missing comma. This first sentence feels off balance and needs restructuring. It feels trite “in attempt to smother the feeling in my chest and in honor of things past”. Lots of telling and not showing. “Of things gone and sailed, by others,” this sentence should be taken out. The subjects are implied in the last sentence and this sentence just stopped me in my reading; its construction is jarring.I stopped reading.Hope you continue writing!
Any chance you can critique this for me?:Also, I know soul destroying is missing a hypen.
Very good, though. Is it part of something else? Is there more, is it going somewhere?It's from Carlyle's French Revolution.
http://pastebin.com/mCJUDzB1Chapter 2 is unfinished, but I've made over 1000 words already, today has been a good day.
I finally have my opening:My book is tedious, it has the smell of the grave about it; it has a certain cadaveric condition about it, a serious fault, insignificant to boot because the defect of my book is you, reader. You're in a hurry to grow old and this book moves slowly. You love direct and continuous narration, a regular and fluid style, and this book and my style are like drunkards.
Good point, I paid no attention whatsoever to verb tense and made a mess.Woah, god bless you, thank you so much for taking the time. lots of telling and not showingThat's the point, really, along with the ships metaphor why do you say it's unoriginal?. It's supposed to be a little play on the expression "that ship has sailed", with a sense of purposelessness/loss but that is not desolate because the gaze of the character whose ships have sailed keeps the harbor in place Berkeley influenced POV.Of course, my prose is far from perfect and if I must explain it this much then I did not do a good job, but I thought I'd clear my intentions up nonetheless. Alsono comments on clumsy language other than problems with the prose itselfEnglish is my second language, I am now proud.Ah, I love it when anons post other people shit on critique threads in order to test the critiquers. Well, at least another book made it to my to-read list.
Where is the rest of the story? Joking aside, the piece “suffers” because I have little context at hand. I enjoyed reading it. The first sentence is loaded with ambiguity. Who is “he”? How does he displace consciousness and why does he do it? What is the “rift”? I feel a strong sci-fi vibe here. While the first sentence does good to hook the reader, I felt the sentence is overdone with ambiguity, but this could be seen as a personal preference on my part as I like an establishing shot. There are some grammatical concerns. The third sentence could be rewritten again, my personal preference to enhance the flow of the sentence and to replace the semicolon with a comma and “see” to “mean”: “Perhaps he feared it would mean the eclipse and deconstruction of his soul, something that he, as a man a little too tied to the past, could not abide the idea of.” In the sentence following replace the comma with a semicolon, because the two independent clauses are not connected by a conjunction and I believe connecting the two clauses would break the flow: “This did not prevent him from carrying out his work with due prejudice and diligence; in fact, he proposed to himself that the very reason he was able to perform the research he so enjoyed was due to the fact he had been uncontaminated by the vast, soul-destroying expanse that would have been laid before him should he have chosen to don the technological vestments his subjects so often did in his presence.” I am not fond of “due prejudice and diligence,” but it works. Also it is long, but that is not really constructive criticism. Again I dislike that I feel I am not able to give more constructive feedback as the flash fiction feels like an excerpt.Sorry this took a while.
Well, at least another book made it to my to-read list.You should probably already know something about the revolution to a reasonable historical detail or be ready to interrupt your reading with research every few lines if you want to get a good grasp on this particular book.
Actually the last sentence of the first paragraph has a slight grammatical error. Honestly I felt I needed to direct my attention to prose. In the second paragraph the first sentence does display clumsy language with the use of the dependent clause; the dependent clause is overly long. Then I stopped reading, because of the prose.
Thanks for the feedback, it's really quite helpful, I only started writing it today, so it's a little rough, so I'll take all that into consideration, if you want to read any further, as it stands, this is what I've written:
Anyone?
The last sentence? Where? And, ah, that is still good enough. I'm still young, there's plenty of time.It's probably going to be an arduous read, then. Not that I mind, though.
I placed my hand on her stomach, waiting for the kick. It never came. Maybe the mother needed to be alive for that.My hand traveled along the curve of her belly and between her breast. I played the bongo before finishing my solo with a smack to her cameltoe.Critique?
Dude, c'mon.
What? Can't handle my style? Besides, no one else is critiquing my other work.
Your writing is absurd, but you know it's absurd.You're trying to make a point but although you know what it is, you want to post this snippet either alone or out of context to make it seem like you're more intelligent that people who don't "get it".
If anyone could critique my third draft of this, I'd be more than grateful.Particularly if anyone notices any comma-splices that I happen to have missed, or anywhere the writing doesn't flow particularly well.http://pastebin.com/1C96Rf0M
Actually I wrote that because it made me giggle. I was on /co/ and a post set my mind working. I dislike the notion that I set myself out to seem more intelligent. People comment that I am broody. I want to show I'm not. By God, I can be funny! Anyway...care to critique? I'm serious here at least.
I feel like you're either trying to experiment with grammatical conventions, or English is your second language.It works, don't get me wrong, there's some interesting sentence structure, however, the fourth sentence 2nd sentence, 2nd paragraph, is just a complete mess and unintelligible.I enjoyed reading it, like I said, it's oddity makes it interesting, aside from that one sentence.If you don't mind doing me a favour, could you take a brief look at the first few paragraphs of this:
it's oddityI should go to bed.
A racing heart bound to a tree, Pounding loud and dullSinews meshed in frigid limbsProbes that press and pry -A ventricle’s limit triedAnd the branches sway with a wanton music
Ah yeah, the genius tyrannosaur finally clambers down from his tower to dispense his phlegm among the peons. No bratwurst in these caves you Lilly-livered cunt. Monstrous applause for the Germanic reveal. Sploshing out onto the patio his innards slept a dance of ruinous acclaim. There can't be found this time of day a number so brilliant. Must traverse many a swamp for ye finds the holiest of sacraments. Eat a dinner of turgid lungs and mayhap you'll be able to enter His mausoleum. Statues guard this ring. Click-clack, click-clack. SWING. No more yearning for the knight. The opulent river-coons swing a tango for this begotten priest on the rings of Ploythaxmus. The bucket is emptied now.
the kind of thing that's fun to write when completely hammered then laugh about the next day with some friends when drunk again, or with yourselfIt's fun as long as you don't take it seriously
Bumpelstiltskin
it's awful and english is not my native language, but here goesI just started writing and am looking for feedback on how to improve, just point out everything thats shit pleaseSlowly creeping comes wearyness, comes fatigue and at long last sleep, sits down in the corner, watching you out of small, tired eyes. As time passes on they move closer with a cozy and peaceful smile on their small round faces. They sit next to you on the couch and you turn your head just a slight bit and nod politely. Over time, you feel the couch tilt ever so slighty to your new neighbours' side and as you look over, you could swear they look bigger than before. Not definitely, but perhaps slightly more voluptous. You start to feel soft fur brushing up against your arm as they spread out to accomodate for their new size. You knew you were right. A bit disgruntled and displeased at their sudden appearance you shuffle to your end of the sofa, trying to bring just a bit of space between yourself and the three unannounced guests. You look over once more and observe the once benevolent faces turn into gruesome grimaces, watching you with a self-righteous, sly smile. Their growth is undeniable now, one of them is again brushing up against your arm. Flight is impossible. Soothing sing-sang surrounds your thoughts, lulling you and tucking you into bed. They have taken control now, throning high above and looking down upon their prey, a mischievous grin spreading from ear to ear. Now it can't be long. There is no rush. Darkness engulfs you. Don't struggle. Submit.You look into the Abyss. And Jump.
Emery I am so tired.last week I wanted to die and I don't know why. I am ashamed I felt this way. I finished my last final at 9:30 Wednesday evening. I felt so down walking the empty linoleum halls and emptying my locker and putting all these big books into my sweater and tying it up. I went to the ladies room and I sat on the toilette. The Janitor had cleaned the floors. The smell was strong and I vomited a little. I felt cold like I have never felt before so I unwrapped my sweater and put it on and opened the stall door and looked at myself in the mirror for a long time. I was paler than my father and skinny as Phillip before he passed; it's a disgrace to be ugly. It's a disgrace to all mankind showing my face around these halls, opening my mouth to chatter chatter chatter. Islam is a monotheistic, abrahamic, religion articulated by the Quran. I know very little about it. I care even less about its teachings. What interests me is the specific practice of hijab wearing. I would wear a Hijab to cover me, they would think it an expression of modesty or commitment or faith, they would not know me.
I don't know if thats a stylistic choice that you intended but you start lots of sentences with "I" and they have a similar structure. Might be dull to read if it carries on longer. I'm pretty sure the "and ... and ... and..." in the first sentence is intentional and I quite like it, but the fact that your overall sentence structure doesnt change too much in the following sentences doesn't make it too interesting, although I liked reading it. Just some input, who am I to judge?also someone please take a look at this: 
Next draft of this section. http://pastebin.com/v80hz3g8
just gonna keep commenting on stuff while I waitwhen I started reading the first section you posted, I sighed because it felt like the whole "captilamsi is evil!!" shit you read on facebook all the time, only phrased slightly better. probably has a bit too much pathos and I also believe the whole "slaving away for the machine"-thing is overused nowadays. the sentence starting with "precious sleep..." was really confusing at first but for some reason the "clutching at me for cigarettes and young flesh part" really drew my attention and led me to read the rest of the excerpt. Correction: "bed all day[.] I was finally..."Generally the excerpt seems out of concept and hart to understand with prior explanation or buildup and the start includes too much pathos, seems overdone to me. Overall its interesting though
Actually just started this like an hour ago"In all my years I’ve never seen such a beautiful corpse.” one beige, ill fitting suit adorned detective said to the other. Purple lilacs laid cross her waist, perfectly scattered - too disheveled to haven’t been placed that way. Her scarlet rose lipstick smeared over her cheek, eyes somberly closed. The other suit went on about how it looked like a Rembrandt painting, though he likely only said it to sound educated. A flash camera POP interrupted their revery...or morbid infatuation over the fallen starlet."
people if nobody critiques others this thread will die dont just post your stuff help others out too
It's 4:30am, but this is no excuse, you deserve better than this crit. I am assuming ambiguity is intentional, I am also assuming you are trying to personify weariness, fatigue, and sleep, if I am wrong, either I am too tired and stupid, or you may want to reconsider this metaphor, I don't think my reading is entirely unreasonable. If I am correct thus far, sort of interesting concept.w several simple plural form issues  a self righteous smile self righteous smiles a mischevous grin mischevous grinsWord choice might need improvement. volumptoussensual connotations, is this intentional?sing-sangsing-song is a better choice, even if this was an intentional malapropism.the end is a little cliche I thinkdarkness engulfs you don't struggle and jumpmaybe write a couple drafts of the end.This was good, especially for an ESLAnon, goodjob.Darkness engulfs you. Don't struggle. Submit.You look into the Abyss. And Jump.
Everytime I revisit the passage I realize what it is I'm actually trying to say. It's going to probably morph more and more as the story behind it also goes through edits but I think I'm getting closer to what I'm trying to say.Very vivid but has some trouble flowing, maybe it's just me but the "to haven't been placed that way" line just kind of stalls it, also the description of the detective, nitpicking probably but hey that's what critique threads are for. I like that you identify them as suits first, was that entirely intentional?
the end is a bit cliche because I was trying something with the words, if you look at the 5 sentences before "you look into the abyss", youll notice they have 5, 4, 3, 2, and 1 words respectively but I realise now I should have focused on syllables instead. I was trying to increase the tension a bit by stacking those sentences on top of each other, leading up to the jumplike build-up, short pause you look into the abyss, JUMP
Whatever happened to the daily exercises guy?

I like this - kinda like a less bizarro Steve Aylett.
as  said, it doesn't flow very well and some sentences made me go back and read parts of them again to make sure I read them correctly but that could be completely intentional. Quite liked it overall
First excerpt from the same story...A sign outside the metro station informed us we couldn't smoke so I was glad that had we dropped acid instead. We had left the dull suburbs behind in interest of glimpsing culture, fine art, and as many public monuments as we could. I recall that it was the early afternoon and we’d come out in a party of four. An aspiring composer and reluctant psychonaut, an artist who entrusted her future to computer science but would rather be a tattoo artist, one boyish man who I imagined to be some kind of humanized sea lion, and myself dragged along on the promise of a concert in the future and one and a half tabs of twenty five. We were riding the orange line from the suburbs into the metro center. Normally traveling through the humid tunnels of Washington D.C.’s metro network is like being pulled through the perspiring sleeve of a career politician, but on a fine Memorial Day weekend the boggy capital had relinquished to us a dry and sunny day.
Your first sentence is bad Hunter S. Thompson. The following sentences are worse Hunter S. Thompson. Just from this paragraph I feel like your writing tends to take a rhythm of ending in predictable deflating contrast punchlines. This grows tiresome for more sensitive readers after just a few pages. And, given the stylistic influence and the setup, I have a hard time imagining you're headed for anything original with this story. Which doesn't so much matter in a lot of instances if you're writing about the movements of normal life and using those as framework for personalizing exploration. But patchwork gonzo Ferris Bueller doesn't easily lend itself to soul searching or original thoughts.Also it was pretty humid in DC last Monday.
Memorial day weekend, went in on Friday. Thank you for the tips though. I'll keep working on it..
Tomorrow the foreman will dismiss the packers from the third floor an hour after closing time. He will shower in the locker room and when he steps out he will avoid the mirror. At his locker he'll put his uniform on: it'll be a dark work-shirt, black slacks, etc..etc... then he will drive into the city and park at the warehouse.Tonight, he calls his mother at the home. Sammy is sick again, she phoned Martha to tell him that she would bring the kid over Sat. morning instead of Friday night because she could only schedule an appointment for Fri. afternoon, and she would be busy busy busy filling the prescription afterwords, but the kid would be at his apartment by Sat. evening at the latest, depending on traffic patterns and if he was hungry. His mother tells him to bring her the cream for dry skin, but he had already done that yesterday. After work, he stopped off at rite- aid and bought a pack of beer drinking was not a problem. By designating drinking days Tue. Wed. Fri. he had minimized inebriation and was now confident his face would droop less and his gut would tighten up after several weeks of brisk exercise for him this meant walking laps around the reservoir and burning on the park bench where his height allowed him an excellent view of the nubile asses of passing qt's. He bought her cream, and took it up to the home where an elvis impersonator set up in the foyer was gyrating for the silent generation..He was all shook up, because 103, 103, 104, 106 with the forecasted weekly average at 109 had cooked up that place; it was piss and meat loaf and shrivel up even though the windows were all open and the breeze had kicked up in the evening. In her wheelchair sat Martha the Queen Bee. She wanted her cream, and she weighed barely over a hundred now, so he picked her up, laid her on her bed, stripped the nightgown and applied it where it was sore or where it smelled. She asked him any women in your life since Sammy? Later they watched reruns but Martha was pissed and passed out of her mind how did she get into that in here? then started to complain about this and that and this and that and
At first I kinda hated it but I think you got some chops under that skirt.The minimalist stuff I am a fan of. Some bits like "drinking was not a problem" were quite affecting. The rest was a bit of a mess. First off. Write a proper story. Beginning, middle, end. Characters. Setting. Conflict. That kind of thing. It's hard to judge something that is a mess when you haven't got a structure to work off. I'd drop some of the goofier elements like etc. etc. and busy busy busy. It's fun but it's also shit. Drop the fancier language like 'inebriation' it doesn't suit minimal down to earth language. Also avoid some of the longer unpunctuated sentences. They're a bitch to read.
It's a bit dry for something about taking acid. Drop some of the stuffy language 'I recall', 'informed', 'relinquished', 'reluctant psychonaut'. I'd say drop the middle class shit. Fine culture, computer science, composers - uh. Stop pretending dude. You don't live in some world of literary kings. Be real.
another excerpt from my WIP novel, I've reviewed other people's stuff thrice already & will do more shortly.chapter title: Maurice Van Der Doelen, Stance Coach“Come in, come in. See those certificates? All bullshit. There is no Harvard School of Physical Positioning. There is no Oxford College of Applied Commercial Appearances. I think the Beijing Number One Faculty of Personal Space Management may be for real, but I sure as shit didn’t go there. And I tell you this not only without shame, but with pride. Because what I do here, what my clients learn here, is pure boardroom stance-based alchemy, my friend. And that can’t be learned in a classroom. Except this one. It can be learned in this classroom.” more here: http://pastebin.com/VJj4gwSW
Achka occupied the questionably named position of Secretary to the Undersecretary of the Secretary to the Director of Records of the Office of the Treasurer. His duties consisted of ensuring that the Undersecretary of the Secretary to the Director of Records of the Office of the Treasurer was fully resourced such that he could effectively resource the Secretary to the Director of Records of the Office of the Treasurer. It was essentially little more than a dick-sucking position. The Service was full of them. Achka sat in his office filing the occasional file or mailing the occasional letter, but he spent the vast majority of his time engaging in casual banter with friends or even complete strangers over the info-net, or under the Undersecretary's desk and between his legs. The Undersecretary had no complaints. In fact, the Undersecretary preferred it that way. Achka wasn't actually very good at his job people promoted on the basis of literal dick sucking rarely are and about three months in the Undersecretary had explicitly forbidden him from doing it, lest he fuck something up. Achka, of course, had no complaints. It wasn't exactly unprecedented. Secretary to the Undersecretary of the Secretary to the Director of Records of the Office of the Treasurer wasn't called a dick-sucking position for nothing, and it wasn't the only dick-sucking position in The Service.The Service, like all good public services, was funded by taxes and not profits. The incentive to perform well was small, the incentive to spend money wisely was tiny, and the incentive to create underlings you don't need for any other purpose than to have them ride you was attached to your body and demanding attention. It didn't exactly create a good reputation for the Achkakahisska race in the galaxy, but who cares? Got laid - worth it. Besides, everyone already knew the Achkakahisska were hyper-sexual anyway. It's not as if pretending not to be was going to fool anyone when they walked in on the President and the Director-General having a quickie in the humanoid oxygen-breathing stalls during a break in the Galactic Senate. So yes, in human terms Achka was little more than a taxpayer-funded prostitute to be whored out to his boss as required, but in Achkakahisska terms he was a respected member of society. He was the lubrication that allowed the cogs of Achkakahisska government to revolve smoothly, without grinding each other down. Everyone's a little more amiable to compromise and get on with the job in their afterglow, after all. Dick-sucking isn't easy when you've got a mouth full of fangs made for stripping flesh off of freshly killed prey and a barbed tongue, but with skill and dedication Achka could administer the medication required to bring the Minister for Agriculture to the table.And orgasm.not part of anything bigger, just something i wrote up literally right now. i'm kinda fascinated by my own idea though. i might take it further
I think you could tighten this up a bit with putting a bit more person into the narrator's voice:I'm not sure people say 'traffic patterns' conversationally. '..but he had already done that yesterday.' could sound more like the guy I think you're writing as 'but he did that yesterday.''...where it was sore or where it smelled.' He's narrating, not talking to his mother. I'm pretty sure he'd say 'stank' instead of 'smelled.''Nubile asses' is a word combo you would only ever see on the internet; I cannot believe that it has ever existed in anyone's thoughts.There's something there, but I think you could make the writing more impactful by really honing the sentences, get them as lean as fuck.Example: In her wheelchair sat Martha the Queen Bee. She wanted her cream, and she weighed barely over a hundred now, so he picked her up, laid her on her bed, stripped the nightgown and applied it where it was sore or where it smelled. She asked him any women in your life since Sammy?I think that just restructuring the sentences a bit gives them more urgency and tension:In her wheelchair, Martha. The Queen Bee. She wanted her cream. She weighed barely over a hundred now so he picked her up, laid her on her bed, stripped the nightgown. He applied cream where it was sore or where it stank. She asked him any women in your life since Sammy? No.I could be wrong though. It does happen.Mine is this if anyone fancied giving feedback. I posted it just a while ago, but now remembering to do it after a review:http://pastebin.com/VJj4gwSW
another excerpt:Department of Homeland SecurityCase ref: DHS/NN/458489Evidence Item ref:111/27/4Transcript of covert recordingEP: Ernest Piccolo, President & Chief Executive Officer, Piccolo IndustriesSB: Sal Buscemi, Chief Financial Officer, Piccolo IndustriesBP: Patricia Bookie Penette, Executive Assistant to Ernest Piccolo not present in room EP: Sal, you ever take a shit, go back to the bathroom an hour later and see that shit still  floating, looking right up at you, grinning?SP: Not grinning, no.EP: I don't mean literally grinning Sal, I'm not insane. I’m not your son. No offence, he’s a great kid, he’s my nephew or something and I love him, and I know you and Maria did your best, and by saying that I’m not suggesting you could’ve done more, although obviously you could, or he wouldn’t be such a crazy little prick. If your Peter had asked such a question, it would not be unreasonable to assume he was genuinely enquiring as to whether your turds were in the habit of taunting you as he no doubt believes his do him. But I am not your son Sal, and I almost certainly never will be. So just humour me and answer the question – did you ever take a shit and find it still there hours later?SB: I guess.EP: You guess or yes? It’s not the kind of thing a man forgets, Sal. Not a real man.SB: Jesus H. Yes.EP: Yes what? What yes, Sal?SB: Yes, I’ve taken a shit and returned to the bathroom to find it still there.EP: That’s unimpressive Sal. A man should never be defeated by his own shit.over intercom Bookie, make a note for Sal’s next appraisal – Sal is to be bonus-dependant on establishing mastery over his own excrement.BP: I’m not sure I understand that, Mr P.EP: Excrement, Bookie. It means shit.more here:http://pastebin.com/eLYdzDM6
http://pastebin.com/qj1NjvSmThe air is heavy and unmoving, settled on us like skin, moving only slightly when we do. On her I can see sweat through the dull glow of the street lights outside the ratty curtains of my small room. Outside I can hear traffic passing, and somewhere in the distance I hear the frightened scream of a car alarm. She puts the glass bottle down and slowly scoots back up the bed and into my arms. We make love and fall back to sleep.The rest is in the pastebin... Don't know why I would continue
Buuuuump
Overcast, concealment.Every moment of conversationI feel as a child doesfirst learning to swim,in an ocean.On deck they stare;why are they not lookingfor a buoy? Rope?A fisherman aboard? Well?Is he scolding themfor the greenhorn term, rope?Sorrow eyes have met mine,they do take pityas father wouldof an old diseased dog.For years I have ate from your children's leftovers.
I like it. I'm not sure I can justify that though. Or even explain it.
Can someone please give me a bit of critique on this?http://pastebin.com/1C96Rf0M
I'm glad someone enjoyed it, thanks.
I wanna read Shakespeare. Where do I begin?
greeks, alchemy, renaissance humanism...for real though, sonnets.
While not his best, Twelfth Night is easy to understand and follow. Also incredibly funny.
Julius Caesar is pretty cool and simple and short and fun.
before this thread fills up with literally every work shakespeare ever wrote as people try to say something that hasn't yet been said, the obvious answer is his greatest, most modern, most accessible playhamlet
came here to say thisit is shakespeare at his most shakespeariest.hamlet or macbeth, really. then othello or king lear. then all the other tragediesthen the comediesthen histories
I second this, it's gonna be as hard to read as anything else and is its best, why would you start somewhere else?this is pretty legit as wellI'd go with hamlet - king lear - macbeth - othello though.Then a midsummer night's dream right after before the other tragedies because it is 2muchfunbut that is personal preference only.
before the tragedies and other comedies*
Does /lit/ reccomend getting individual plays such as the Oxford World's Classics editions or the complete works Such as the Norton Critical Shakespeare
With Bloom.
read all his sonnets firstthen get his complete works and start from the beginning
plot
"themes"
novels
not style
I read for the prose
I read for any one particular thingdumbest meme ever
I read
"words"
Words
writing a novel in a "language"
I can't expect Christboys to appreciate themes, in general. They don't have much - if any - developed aptitude to discover them.I'm not even shitposting, religion inhibits desire for seeking more in this world by channeling it into a longing for the after world.
motifs
not getting your books custom-made with the pages in a random order so you don't accidentally read some plothow does it feel being a pleb?
translations
Take creative writing workshop.Class of ten with woman lecturer who starts talking about plot development and hero's journey."Implying I read for plot," I shout through cupped hands.Class glares at me."Two thousand and fifteen," I tell everyoneTeacher tuts and starts discussing character development in Hunger Games."Do you even read?" I shout. "Go back to plebbit"Ginger man to my left tells me to shut up."I bet you haven't even read Ulysses or Dee-Eff-Double-you," I tell himClass starts shouting at me, asking me to leave. It was all that ginger man's fault.I turn back to him"Your filthy fedora. I bet you read genre fiction."He stands up and tells me to get out."No," I said. "I'm the only real reader here. For I read for prose"He hit me right on the nose, the cartilage cracks, blood sprays over my desk.I get up and walk out, grinning to myself at how superior I am.Filthy plebs. I bet they're talking about Murakami now.
religion inhibits desire for seeking more in this world by channeling it into a longing for the after world.I have talked to 2 maybe 3 religious people in real lifego2bed brother bear
"memes"
Is anyone here firmiliar with Hegels thesis about the end of art?I find it very interesting, and i believe that he is partially right in his claim.For Hegel, art in its highest form, is is the sensuous expression or manifestation of free spirit in a medium such as metal, stone or color that has been deliberately shaped or worked by human beings into the expression of freedom.The funtion of art is to help express the truth about spirit and its freedom, in the same way as philosophy and religion does. But when philosophy and religion evolves beyond the limits of art, we no longer need art as a medium of truth. "Art, considered in its highest vocation, is and remains for us a thing of the past.Thereby it has lost for us genuine truth and life, and has rather been transferred into ourideas instead of maintaining its earlier necessity in reality and occupying its higherplace."My only problem is, did this really happen around 1830 The time hegel held his lectures on aesthetics? Arthur Danto makes his own similar thesis, but claims that art died around 1960 with Andy Warhol and the Brillo Box. For him, this is where art lost its historical meaning Whatever the fuck that means. My question to you is: Did art really end? If so, when did it end and why?
As longs as there is aesthetics there is art
Hegel is not claiming that art production will stop, i think you are missing the point. Art can still be made, but it will never have the same function again. After the end of art, Hegel says that:"Art can be used as a fleeting play, affording recreation and entertainment, decorating our surroundings, giving pleasantness to the externals of our life, and making other objects stand out by artistic adornment.”He is talking about an end of a specific era of art, not art entierly.
"Art can be used as a fleeting play, affording recreation and entertainment, decorating our surroundings, giving pleasantness to the externals of our life, and making other objects stand out by artistic adornment.”I never really considered art to have a function besides these. I certainly never saw it as "the sensuous expression or manifestation of free spirit".
implying art isn't granted through inspiration for the purpose to allow us to experience God in a more profound, approximate sense on earth
 certainly never saw it as "the sensuous expression or manifestation of free spirit".I kind of agree with you, i guess my formulation was bad. The funtion of art for Hegel is far more complicated than that, but really difficult to define. But i still think it is an interesting topic though.
what gives you that idea?
Come on guys, lets have a real discussion on lit. Im tired of all the memes and shitposting.Here is a quick summary of hegels aesthetics:http://www.rowan.edu/open/philosop/clowney/aesthetics/philos_artists_onart/hegel.htmHere is an article on Hegel and the end of art by Dano:http://www.rae.com.pt/Danto%20hegel%20end%20art.pdf
G-Guys?
Philosophy and religion have barely evolved, especially if you're stuck in 1830. Basically everything has been thought already; atheism had been reached almost as soon as deism came into place and all that changes are different phases and accentuations; it's like fashion.At the same time, more and more people get the freedom to be "artists" and dilute it - giving the impression that whatever age you're in, you're likely to consider it the worst ever.I really see no way to pinpoint or even define any point that art has died or radically changed. Certainly not with something as meaningless as Warhol.If you think about it - thousands of years of religion, philosophy, and art: But conicidentally, the moment this man lives, everything changes?
My serious post aside, does anyone else think there's a conspiracy around /lit/ and /fit/ worshipping this same weird doppelgänger in Rippetoe/Zizek?
So I've finished the books but have been wondering what life under The Mad King and King Robert Baratheon.The Mad King really was a fucking loon but he clearly wasn't stupid considering when he defeated his coffers will filled gold and wealth.What was life for the normal people like under him especially pre -rebellion?Same question for King Robert.Robert seemed to genuinely like the people and the people seemed to love him as well. He was only a bad King because he was ignorant.
Oh please, he wasn't ignorant. he just had a six in military skill and a zero in both diplomacy and administrative skill.
He literally would close his eyes and ignore anything he didn't want to see.
Lannisters are basically the jews of ASOIAF series. Robert did nothing wrong.
I see what you did there m8 ; playing as an Ironborn raider was fun as fuk
He literally had an entire hoard of gold he spent it all. Jon Arryn tried to talk with him about it.
Can someone tell me what's the best Divine Comedy English translation?inb4 muh translations
Alright, there aren't many different ones being sold. Musa is probably your best bet if you're no expert in reverb of middle english from middle italian.thx k
I liked the Allen Mandelbaum translation, but I can't tell you which is the best it.also nice quads4
depends if you want it in rhyme or not
People I trust on literature have recommended Mandelbaum. I have it but haven't read it yet so I can't confirm it for myself. Take that for what its worth.
Who else is excited as FUCK for Alan Moore's new book, Jerusalem? http://www.theguardian.com/books/2015/mar/19/alan-moore-jerusalem-spring-2016-publication"Alan Moore’s second novel Jerusalem – a fantastical exploration of his hometown of Northampton which runs to more than a million words in draft form – is slated for publication next spring.""The novel is said to explore the small area of Northampton where Moore grew up, ranging from his own family’s stories to historical events to fantasy, with chapters told in different voices. The author told the New Statesman that there would be a “Lucia Joyce chapter, which is completely incomprehensible ... all written in a completely invented sub-Joycean text”, while another chapter would be written in the style of a Samuel Beckett play, and a third would be “a noir crime narrative based upon the Northampton pastor James Hervey, whom I believe was the father of the entire Gothic movement”."Joyce is back, guys.
sounds like gingerbread to me
new bookdoesn't he draw comics or something?
Move over, Gene Wolfe
imagine walking through the woods and seeing this dude look at you from behind a big oak tree
He's over the hill. Did anyone read his softcore fanfic of Alice in Wonderland, Wizard of Oz, and Peter Pan?
It'll be crap.
"Tom Bombadil?"
Sounds neat.I've wanted to do something similar with paintings.He writes for the medium, of course.imagine walking through the woods and seeing this dude look at you from behind a big oak tree
top kek
it's pretty weird and the art style is horrendousworth reading, though
He seems to specialise in episodic structures... I don't know if he's as successful at crafting characters in novels.Does anyone know?
Alan Mooreruns to more than a million wordsNo fucking thanks. There are very few authors who I'd read anything that long by and he's not one of them.
/excited as fuck/Sounds almost like a blown-out version of Voice of the Fire. Not necessarily a bad thing, mind.
Sounds very much like Voice of the Fire, which was great.
I'm just starting Voice of the Fire now and I'm loving it, definitely checking this out too eventually.
tfw you'll never have a beard like Moore
What do you think of that first chapter?
I think I want to reread it, but it was pretty interesting. The prose was beyond frustrating, but it was interesting to view simple things like clouds from the mind of a idiot amongst nomads. I really found his struggle to comprehend the ideas of lying and philosophy depressing simply because of how innocent he was. That twist at the end was harsh, but expected based on Moore's style.
This.It's really just Moore attempting a pastiche of styles that he personally enjoys from other writers. But they were writers so genius that they moved literature forward. If his work is over one million words then a statement like that quite frankly needs to possess the same measure of genius. It needs to move literature forward. No offense to the man but we all know that he simply isn't as good as the writers that he's emulating. And I'm not going to read over a million words from a lesser writer.
He's better than the victorian writers he'd be emulating though his being pastiche makes it simply less interesting and better than most/all genre writers he takes inspiration from.I'm not expecting Jerusalem to change the landscape of literature who the hell reads anything looking for that, really?, but I'm confident it should be a diverse and enjoyable read.
Legitimately feel that Moore has some of the most underrated prose in the past century. Voice of the Fire and Unearthing are God tier, especially the spoken word version of the latter.And I don't like geek shirt but Neonomicon is awesome, Promethea is incredible, and Providence is starting off great.
I'm not expecting Jerusalem to change the landscape of literature who the hell reads anything looking for that, really?When it's a million fucking words it needs to live up to a much higher standard to be worth the time.
tfw no magic book
He writes for them, and they're only good when he is writing writing fanfiction. All of his works also contain at least one act of pedophilia and one act of rape.
I don't remember any rape from Hålo Jones
What would happen if Stirner met the Buddha?
Reality would collapse due to the impact of the impossibilities of that on the time-space continuum.
Is that Ian Hislop?
The Buddha would get BTFO'd.
They wouldn't speak the same language.
Noble eightfold path huh? Sounds spooky to me...
The would transcend the metaphysical
stirner would jack his robe, ear loops and such.the Buddha would then go and cry under his faggot tree.
buddha: "If you meet the buddha, kill him"stirner: *throws milk bottle in the buddha's face, shattering both the bottle and his face* "heh...let's see if lactose intolerance is a spook, mongoloid"
Stirner bebe?I love /tv/.
implying the bottle wouldn't just float right through him
What are some good books that deal with 'simple living' and frugality and minimalism and such?
Not a book, but mrmoneymustache.com
Beginning of LOTR. The Shire is pretty chill.
looks like a artofmanliness version of earlyretirementextreme.com
WALDENALDEN
If lying in the dirt in the dark is your idea of simple living, I recommend Beckett.
Try Stones of the Sur by Robinson Jeffers.
The Stranger got me pretty chill with its day-to-day life descriptions
Nausea.That's an analogy for poverty - the zealot author was one that endorsed poor folk to embrace their abject squalor.
Maybe read Snyder's "The Practice of the Wild" as well.
Stoner maybe?
I don't understand why everyone thinks Meursault is some sort of retard while he's got some pretty comfy hedonism going on in the pre-Arab part of the book. Seemed like a good life.
tfw you will never rage so hard the muses sing about it
tfw I made that picI have transcended into memedom.Also; R.I.P my boy Patroclus.
ayy
Sing, Shitposter, the fatal meme of Pe/lit/eus’ son,Which to the Anons unnumb’red keks brought, And many ejaculations to the realms of night Sent premature…
While we're on the topic, which translations of the greek trilogy does /lit/ recommend?inb4originallanguagefags
Fitzgerald was my pick; bretty damn gud
So you play Dwarf Fortress?It is sad but not unexpected.
the dwarf fortress part was perfect m8
why dwarf fortress though?
Had a stint with it during the winter. The lists of combat in the Iliad reminded me of the combat logs in Dwarf Fort. Was a fun game once you got the hang of it.Cheers lad ;
;Lewd
Hey 4Chan, does anyone know of any interesting medical preferably surgical in nature books? Even books about becoming/being a doctor. Also any books that can help you write better just by reading them because they are so well written would be great too.
“[Democracy] is a false idol–a mere catchword and an illusion of inferior classes, visionaries, and dying civilisations. Life has no ultimate values, and our proximate values can be little more than what we like to see or posses. “Right” and “Wrong” are primitive conceptions which cannot endure the test of cold science… Logically, men of taste should prefer to favor such things as strong and advanced men at the expense of the herd. Of what use is it to please the herd? They are simply coarse animals–for all that is admirable in man is the artificial product of special breeding. We advocate the preservation of conditions favourable to the growth of beautiful things–imposing palaces, beautiful cities, elegant literature, resposeful art and music, and a physically select human type such as only luxury and a pure racial strain can produce…"- H.P. LovecraftAny other good misanthropic authors, works, quotes?
not SchopietzscheAnyway, misanthropy is still based on some anthropology i.e. some concept of what human nature is supposed to be. It's merely a mirror image of humanism: instead of praising humanity nature it despises it. So not only it replicates the stupidity of humanism, it is reactive on top of it.
some concept of what human nature is supposed to beI rather think misanthropy stems out of what human nature COULD be, but isn't, not what it is 'supposed' to beIt's just 'I would prefer X, but humans are usually Y, therefore misanthropy'
I meant "supposed to be" in an "epistemological" rather than moral sense. The implication is that any concept of human nature is a supposition.
I'm a transgressive-fiction junkie and most of what I read is fiction either way, so tag along and call me a pleb based on this list.If you don't know a book let me know.
U made this thread yesterday . STOP LOOKING SOXIAL VSLIDATION FROM ANONYMOUS FAGWTS. Jesus.
Rate my pleb list-"ohhh he's so humble, he read ulysses but still thinks he's a pleb"Ignored. Posit your opinions and face criticism. Don't lower yourself like that. It's pathetic.
Daniel Galera
You're the "fetish" type reader. You have a certain emotional zone you're looking to get stimulated in a certain way. In your case, it's edgy stuff in protruding prose. You are not a pleb: you have taste, though it's really narrow.
I already told you in another thread The Wasp Factory is shit
It's because "Satan Burger" is into that fucking list.
I KNOW
http://www.artgarfunkel.com/library/favorites.htmltfw garfunkel is more patrician than you or anyone on /lit/ will ever beHello darkness my old friend
that top 5Based fucking Artie.
I bet he reads translations
Hello dankness my old friendI've come to meme with you again
ctrl+fno gene wolfewhat a fucking pleb
Fifty Shades of Greyjej
41.Portrait of the Artist60.UlyssesWhat a pleb.
I remember reading this a long time ago and thinking "How is it that, given that Art has read all this, Paul wrote almost all the good stuff?"
Based Garfunkel avoiding shit genre fic.
In the words of schopenhauer: always reading, never to be read.
“I tried Gravity’s Rainbow, and I thought it was fraudulent,” Garfunkel said
3. P.D. Ouspensky In Search of the MiraculousNot All and Everything, confirmed as pleb mystic.
RousseauFrommSeems like a wuss
I wanna get into Dubliners. Should I have a companion book or previous read beforehand?
Penguin centennial edition is all you need
Dubliners is the easiest Joyce book. You really shouldn't need a companion
A few quick Google searches to clarify some old Irish words is all I needed
You should try and get into a better author, from a better time period.
Chad pls go
no you fucking pussy, just read the bookmaybe get one with notes at the back like penguin modern classics to explain some historical references and obscure irish words if you think either of those things would throw you
This is the problem with Joyce readers, both avid and amateur. You obviously know nothing about Joyce except for the fact that "his books are hard;" you obviously know nothing about Dubliners except that it is written by an author whose "books are hard." If you find yourself asking for a companion book before you have even opened the primary text, then you need to ask yourself what the fuck you are doing when you read. People like this and even the more devoted readers of Joyce are all fucked for the fact they read him to *decode* him. Like he's some sliding puzzle you buy for a road trip, or the weekly crossword. It's people like this that make it seem like Joyce is a novelty, but I don't think he is - at least not entirely. You can get valuable interpretations out of Ulysses without a companion book. In fact, its most interesting themes are all independent within the text. Finnegan's Wake is another animal, but the point is that if you buy books to decode them you're probably not interpreting them. Like what the fuck OP.
While I agree that you probably don't NEED a companion book, even for Ulysses assuming you have an annotated edition, Joyce set out to write labyrinthine, complex books with Ulysses and Finnegans Wake, which are his most famous books, so it's not an entirely unjustified way of looking at him.Though yeah, it is silly to just see his name on any book and instantly assume you'll need a guide for it.
I agree with you as to the readers, but I think much of the issue is with Joyce himself - with his obviously not exact quotes 'I've put so much in it'll keep scholars busy for years' and 'you could recreate Dublin with this book' - making ample allowance for treating at least Ulysses and Finnegans Wake as fact-finding tours. I'm not saying he's responsible for that kind of limited interaction, just that his style is open to 'misuse' by people predisposed in that direction. It strikes me as a magnified version of the same problem Dante - whom Joyce loved and I think got some of this from - has periodically faced, with the philosophy and theology falling behind the nitpicking efforts to figure out why X Florentine makes it to Y level of the Inferno and what exactly the presence of an otherwise unknown Sienese on this stage of Purgatory indicates about that person's reputation in the early 14th century.
I jumped into Dubliners without anything and I was fine, I liked them and I think Joyce is exceptional at creating characters and developing them quickly and complexly. My favorite story was "A Painful Case" I think it was called. I'm not into love stories but it was the best love story I have ever read. But when people put all this stigma behind Joyce and think that they need a companion for all of his works is just what Joyce wanted. I think hes an amazing writer, but at the same time he was a pretentious person who got off to people telling him how insanely complex his works were. Things like Finnegans Wake were usually just complicated for the sake of being complicated.
But when people put all this stigma behind Joyce and think that they need a companion for all of his works is just what Joyce wanted. I think hes an amazing writer, but at the same time he was a pretentious person who got off to people telling him how insanely complex his works were.He also got off on farts.
Dubliners is the best book ever written
Haha true. Wish he would of incorporated it more into some of his stories.
Ulysses is the tease to Joyce's works.I was on portrait of the artist for a while, not the artist formerly known as prince, and I found it was an easier and more enjoyable read. Funnier too. That's all joyce is.
"Should there be Catholic SF? Absolutely! Suppose we change that question just a little and say, “Should there be Catholic art?” Answer NO, and a lot of the world’s greatest art vanishes. Humanists would say the Divine Comedy is fantasy, but they are wrong. It is SF, based on the soft science of theology. Theology has just as much right to that word science as sociology and the rest do."-Gene WolfeIs he right? Is the Divine Comedy sci-fi?
Are his book worth it beyond the new sun series and Latro?I read both but the first half of each was far better than the latter half.
No.
"Science Fiction" and genre division in general is an invention of the 20th century. It is an absolute anachronism to debate whether a work of the previous millennium has anything to do with it.
w-what a lewd girl
That's a cool shirt
source on that .webm?
Theology isn't any more a science than mathematics
Besides the fact that genre is a marketing gimmick, saying that theology is a "science" or that, for instance, religion = theology is to confuse metaphysics/cosmology for religious literature.
IE it deals with entities that exist only as abstractions in the brain
BASADOASADO
Gene Wolfe is always right. If he says something, it's true.
Yes. Just avoid There Are Doors, Pandora by Holly Hollander, and Castleview for now. Peace is a good place to go next. Or The Fifth Head of Cerberus.
Can't argue with the prose king.
He means social science.
It was to Dante what SF is to us now.Yes, very much so. Aside There are Doors his every work is really great.
Catholic SF
Ender's Game is Catholic SciFi, A Canticle for Leibowitz as well.
There are tons of Catholic churches in San Francisco. Not sure what this blubberbutt is on about.Anyone notice genre writers are prone to obesity.
is that the chick from game of thrones
 hurr durr guys what if we turn the fedora meme back on the Christians?leftypolenders game is mormon
B-but Oedipus is the first hardboiled mystery!
Yeah. She big girl now.
is this a clip from the casting couch with GRRM?
would hit it.she's legal, right?
FAS SLAG
your waifu a shit
But anon, all science deals only with abstractions. Or do you suppose an electron is the standard model is anything but a set of quantities that fit into the mathematics of the model?
ur waifus r shit
/lit/, what is your opinion of highlighting and writing inside books?
It's for spastic fucks. If you want to take notes do it outside of the book.
Notes are fine if they're actually helpful for a reader, like writing down the definition of obscure words, but if you're like my friends who just write shit like, "Wow!" beside a tense part in the plot, you probably shouldn't bother.
but if you're like my friends who just write shit like, "Wow!" beside a tense part in the plotkek
Great for analyzing classics. I joy down obscure allusions in pynchon novels and I take a lot of notes in Milton/Chaucer/Virgil simply because I don't get all the references/archaic definitions and I don't want to look them up everytime I reread
Its your book, you paid fr it, if you rally want there's nothing from stopping you buying another copy. I say go for it, provided its not something you picked up[ from a library. Ive been known to take notes on blank pages if I have nothing else available, its no big deal. Don't really see why this needed a thread but Im just drunk enough to reply
I like to bracket off whole passages/paragraphs in the margins, or underline some phrases, sentences or key words. Keeps it minimal but allows me to find my favorite passages again, or easily reference or quote sections in the future. I have a pretty solid memory of what I read but it's still easier to search for something I've marked than to trudge through large sections again.
Pick up a "Near mint" hardback book on Amazon for real cheapIt's fucking pristine, seems like it hasn't been openedSomeone has drawn big arrows pointing to page number 69 and 420 and highlighted them
What book was it?
Did this while reading Capital and it really helped.
for non fiction it's okay - actually a good idea imo if u don't care about devaluing your books and plan on keeping them forever. I'm a philo student, do it all the time and it's absolutely necessary for me.I don't see why anyone would want to do this with a fiction book. Unless you're doing some heavy duty scholarly analysis it will definitely be fedora and girls will laugh at you.jpg
I like to write in them. I tried keeping the notes separate, but it's easier to have the writing space on hand. The lack of space forces me to be concise, the writing helps me remember major themes/ideas/points in the plot/new words, and I feel like every time I finish a book, I basically have an analytical paper inside of it. Though it's obviously not that organized.
I can't bring myself to soil a book. If I absolutely must, I'll underline in pencil.I've had a lot of anxiety about marking or soiling pages since I was young and I have no idea why. I get the same problem when I try to take notes. I feel largely that I'll be really ashamed if I never finish or get bored and leave a very small amount of notation.
When I'm reading used books I bought at thrift stores, I tend to pay attention more to passages that are underlined. So there's that.
I like knowing that even as I'm rolling my eyes at the notes written in a used book I've picked up, somewhere under the same sky there is an anon rolling their eyes at the notes I've written in a book that's passed through my possession
I recently picked up a 1948 print of Tortilla Flat, with annotations that seem to be written around that time. I'm immensely excited to go through them.The idea that someone a 100 years from now may read my notes is enough reason to write inside the book for me.
I'm a philo studentwhy
highlighting in books is dumb, the ink fades over time and it's like you didn't annotate it at all. Also, switching between a marker and a pen every two seconds is inconvenient.Underlining master race.
Ivy League schools accept more philosophy applicants to med schools than premedsPhilosophy degrees are actually often preferred, because philosophy majors are almost guarantee to be really smart whereas premeds often cheat and game the system and aren't that exceptional
Personally I just use a folded sheet of paper as a book mark and write tiny notes on it. Don't like to carry a notebook around or marginalia
this is what philo students actually believesource: I'm philo
I'm not a philo student, but it's trueBut just imagine, if the dumb philo students you know are actually smarter than other majors, how dumb most college students really are
I prefer underlining if it's anything other than a textbook, highlighting looks too academic. I underline quotes or bracket sections, I rarely write anything in the margins.
Why not just use the blank pages that are towards the end to make notes instead of ruining the text?
Is pynchon really as inaccessible as my hipster friends tell me? I found a copy of Mason & Dixon at my parent's house and I wanted see if it'd be worth it to take a crack at it.
No just read it and stop over thinking it. If you like it you like it if you don't then oh well.
Try the DIY method of figuring out if someone's work is worth reading or not. It's the best way to answer that question, and it has the added benefit of not cluttering up /lit/ with threads like this.
He's not inaccessible at all. It's just that Gravity's Rainbow uses a lot of esoteric bits of information and can be hard to follow.V. also gets complicated at some points.Nothing he wrote is as hard as Ulysses or Finnegans Wake though.
I mean obviously if it were clearly over my head I wouldn't slog through it. I just don't read habitually, so I have a tendency to misinterpret books that a heavy with intertextual references, which would annoy me for a 1000 page book.
He writes in a style that's fun to read even if you don't know exactly what he's talking about so I wouldn't worry about it too much on an initial reading.
Mason and Dixon is way more accessible than Gravity's Rainbow. Having a hard time with anything but GR is sad. Mason and Dixon is the most beautiful novel I've read so far and was so good that I'd be okay with it if I never read a better book in my life. Protip: it's easy to end up on wikipedia reading about the people and events of M&D, but its not necessary to understanding the book.
discuss
capitalism has many faults and a return to spirituality would be a good thing in a mechanized, soulless amoral world.don't see what there is to disagree with him about tbh. when he's done with his marxist phase, as it is impossible to be an idealist for life, he will be the next offshoot of evola, detailing the madness of the kali yuga.
and a return to spirituality would be a good thing in a mechanized, soulless amoral world.It is, if the point is to make people satisfied with their condition of agents of a mechanized, soulless, amoral world.There's a reason why when societies reach maturity "schools of life" start replacing their "schools of thought"
implying capitalism *sniff* is not *sniff* much more *sniff* spiritual *sniff* than any *sniff* form of religion
Obviously meant to quote 
bourgeois wankerbelongs in the gulag
I think he makes a few mistakes but he would make a good PM if he runs in 2020
bump
My biggest problem with Brand is that he hsells this idea that revolution and left-wing struggle is this cool sexy thing, which I only wish I could believe in, because when you actually get to know the Left and its history you realise how, from the outside, it's probably one of the least appealing political enterprises in existence. This is more or less why I've learned to appreciate Chris Hedges a lot with experience: the way he seems completely dead inside is a lot more consistent with the way I feel when I realise I have to force my way through yet another grad student's philosophy paper or another economic history book filled with comparative data about the welfare systems of Germany and Portugal in the 50's.
how the fuck does anyone actually think thisBrand is one of those cunts who yells people down, assuming that they don't have a point without ever actually listening to them. He'd be an awful PM.
Unless of course we consider that the concept of property is preposterous, like a Native American chief, Great Elk or one of them, who when us lot By “us” I suppose I mean white Europeans. You might not be one; I hope you’re not, actually. Sorry for unconsciously addressing this book to imperialistsGandhi, an extremely efficient revolutionary, is perhaps most admired for his excellent deployment of “nonviolent protest.” The ingenuity of nonviolence is not immediately obvious to us, the inheritors of a world built upon martial means, but the principle is almost like mathematics. Authorities are trained to deal with a particular kind of conflict, violent conflict, so by using violent means you are entering the territory that they are best qualified to control. Also, by becoming violent you are tuning in to the frequency that you are trying to overcome, the frequency of violation, violence FM.“Be the change you wish to see in the world,” said Gandhi. If you want a nonviolent world, you cannot use violence to achieve it.Human beings, who want the best for their families. David Cameron said, in a rare foray into compassion, “Hug a hoodie.” He was right—we should. We should also cuddle a copper. Was that a bit “Yeah, man,” a bit reductive? It will be: The solution will not be rarefied, the Revolution will be televised, and it will be easy and based on simple things, like interconnectivity and union. Or love.In fact, I must mention that I was interviewed by the police during the writing of this book, and the WPC who questioned me was so resolutely lovely, judicious, and kind, I nearly gave up on the whole revolutionary caper. There were cups of tea and codes of conduct and tales of public marches in her former life. In fact, though, this just confirms my thesis that people are beautiful and Revolution inevitable. We don’t need to grow compassion in a petri dish; everyone’s fine—we just have to scrape away a few repellent systems.
He'd be better than Cameron and blair mate. I think he needs to flesh out his ideas some but he's got a basic grasp on political philophy and he's read capital by thomas pikkity so I think he could help take us in the right direction.
He'd be better than Cameron and BlairFucking empty headed actor on his ivory tower with his useless platitudes would be better?Worm.
By “us” I suppose I mean white Europeans. You might not be one; I hope you’re not, actually. Sorry for unconsciously addressing this book to imperialistswhite guiltFucking hate that bastard already.Gandhi, an extremely efficient revolutionary, is perhaps most admired for his excellent deployment of “nonviolent protest.” The ingenuity of nonviolence is not immediately obvious to us, the inheritors of a world built upon martial means, but the principle is almost like mathematics. Authorities are trained to deal with a particular kind of conflict, violent conflict, so by using violent means you are entering the territory that they are best qualified to control. Also, by becoming violent you are tuning in to the frequency that you are trying to overcome, the frequency of violation, violence FM.Fairly well said. Most people see Gandhi as some kind of saint who never wished anything but peace, but the truth is that he was a brilliant strategist. He realised a violent revolution would not be as efficient as a peaceful one. A peaceful one would also receive an international recognition. Mandela realised the same. If you want a nonviolent world, you cannot use violence to achieve it.Idk m8, it's worked all throughout history. See Roman Empire, American Civil War, World War 2, etc. etc. Human beings, who want the best for their families. David Cameron said, in a rare foray into compassion, “Hug a hoodie.” He was right—we should. We should also cuddle a copper. Was that a bit “Yeah, man,” a bit reductive? It will be: The solution will not be rarefied, the Revolution will be televised, and it will be easy and based on simple things, like interconnectivity and union. Or love.This guy seems like a fucking hippie. "love will fix all our problems". No wonder these fuckers turn Communist/Marxist. In fact, though, this just confirms my thesis that people are beautiful and Revolution inevitablePolice=evil bad guys is such a retarded black and white perspective and I get the vibes that he thought so before a cop invited him for tea and biscuits.
does zizek really believe this?
Who really cares about politics if it's not real politics American politics.
Fairly well said. Most people see Gandhi as some kind of saint who never wished anything but peace, but the truth is that he was a brilliant strategist. He realised a violent revolution would not be as efficient as a peaceful one. A peaceful one would also receive an international recognition. Mandela realised the same.The Indian revolution would have never happened if everyone followed Gandhi only. There were actually many violent groups that did a lot of work and as a collective were arguably as important as. Gandhi is just the cool peaceful dude that looks good for papers m8.No real social change has always been achieved without a bit of violence.Idk, seems like a rich dude talking middle/upper class romanticized revolution ideas to me. The type of person that when shit gets real condemns a lot of actions of people who actually need shit to change.Haven't read, so it's not like my opinion means anything. But I think I'll pass it, thx :
Brand is an insufferable cunt. All he does is string political buzzwords together with made up intellectual sounding words in between them.
newspapers*has ever*damn I'm sleepy sry
Russell Brand would be the first one to hide or pay for protection if a revolution broke out. Or maybe he'd just move abroad.
If you don't need more reasons why Russell is a fucking idiot. He did a interview with Owen Lewis for the guardian.
empty headedHe's actually quite intelligent and lucidly spoken, my friend. Not sure how you judge smarts.
What font should I use for my self-published book?I was thinking this, but I want to know what you guys like.
Adobe Hebrew.
oy vey
If that's it, it's lacking glyphs, italics, bold, small caps, etc.
I write in Times New Roman with 11 sized font for the first draft, edit it in 12 and finalize it with 14.
dubs confirm
Just don't use times new roman. You scream amateur.
Write in LaTeX
Wingdings is the only patrician font
Garamond
You either go bolded and italicized papyrus or you go home.LaTeX isn't a font, idiot, it's a document preparation system. It's better used for long archival documents and math papers. There's literally no need to use it on an individual writing project other than novelty.
he's just saying that because whenever /sci/ slows down he sneaks in here and thinks "wow i must be the only stemfag here. let me give my quirky stem perspective on literature which is amusingly inappropriate but ultimately superior"
 This post screams shallow.
latex uses its own distinctive font by default, Computer Modern, idiot.
Irish uncial
LaTeX is a typesetting system.It isn't "just for" science and math, it was designed to create beautiful books. But you don't write in it, you typeset with it. Sure there's a default font, but with XeLaTeX you can use system fonts. Times Roman is for legibility in narrow columns. Unless you're typesetting a newspaper, there are lots of better alternatives out there.
Day Roman a mighty fine choice. Yes sir, it is. Just the other day my grandbaby Donna says, "Day Roman a mighty fine choice."
GARAMONDCHARTER SILTITUS Cyberbit Basicmiktex portabletexstudio portablemicrotype package
it's called a typeface you goon
TNR above 10 pointsjesus wept
Here's one: Dutch Medieval Book:http://www.fonts.com/font/canada-type/dutch-mediaeval-book/complete-family-pack
MT Impact Shadow
I wrote everything in sans serif. People say a serif font is better for actual reading but I don't see it at all--sans serif is so much cleaner and smoother. It's beautiful.
When was the last time you saw a book published using solely a sans serif font?
Never, and it's a damn shame.
Jokerman is the way to go
always used to be passionate about historytook a university course in STEM/business for a good chance at a long-term stable jobnow I'm in an office job Imagine 80, 100 years of reflecting on the paths not taken
studying history want to change to philosophydont want to end up in an office job
Imagine 80, 100 years of reflecting on the paths not takennothing beats hedonism, you know it, so instead, go to as many orgies as you can
I don't enjoy sex
Where do you find these so called "orgies", ma'am?
I studied history. I wish I had an office job.
craigslist
Negative hedonism is the way.Epicurus is the man for you.Goes to studies history
We must synthesise
Wut. You'd probably also have an office job as a history grad.
Keyword being 'probably'
may as well just kill urself my man
i took one semester of history courses before i realized that i was going to be learning what i would regardless of my life choices. even if i joined ISIS or moved to africa, i would still read history books and research subjects that interested me.i couldn't see a future where i would be happy having my independent efforts directed and controlled by a professor and the GPA systemi went to economics because i would have honestly never learned any of this stuff on my own. i can even apply some of the principles and concepts i have learned to my interpretation of the past.college just never struck me as a place for passion. to be honest, i would prefer not to go at all, but we need at least a bachelors degree to compete in the job market.
how come?i couldn't see a future where i would be happy having my independent efforts directed and controlled by a professor and the GPA systemWhy would a degree stop you from doing independent research outside of school? What can a professor do if the information you present is legitimate? Imo, university is a great way to challenge your own opinions and knowledge and motivate you to become more productive. You wouldn't allow anyone to restrict you from learning if you really care about that particular field of knowledge.
not getting a bachelor's in History and then go TEFL You missed out anon.
tfw in grad school for the long haul to become an historian
tfw forgotten employee and read and work on my novel all day
sounds like a good feel 2 me
 study STEM  make 90k/year  only spend 20k/year, invest rest mfw I can quit working at 35 and never worry about money again
i have a ba in history and i'm a lawyer. study what you enjoy!
History is one of the subjects that are generally taken as prep for a law degree throughIf OP wanted the job/prospects he has now, he HAD to take STEM
, 
"The Byrgenwerth spider hides all manner of rituals, and keeps our lost master from us. A terrible shame. It makes my head shudder uncontrollably."
"The red moon hangs low, and beasts rule the streets. Are we left no other choice, than to burn it all to cinders?"
Would you tell a starter -writer to begin with short stories because ______ ?
because they're shorter?if you first short story is complete shit you've spent like 10-20 hours on itimagine writing a 1000 page epic and then realizing upon rereading that its garbage
Imagine though that the person has confidence in her abilities, and regardless wants to make a career out of it, so the hours won't matter much.
its still easier to get short stories published than a novel, and if you have some published short stories it will make it easier to get a novel published
Do you value novels more? Sounds like it.How sure are you of that? - short stories getting more easily published.
because a beginner at any thing should start with something small or they'll regret it
Do you value novels more?no, i thought that you did but sorry if that was a wrong assumption.Short fiction journals are very numerous and the vast majority are passion projects, if your story is enjoyable it will get in.Novel publishers are less numerous and get fuckloads of submissions, they will only publish the things that they think will give them the most money. It is very hard to get a literary novel published nowadays and if you're writing genre it will have to compete with hundreds of housewives sending in their generic but somewhat marketable harry potter / hunger games / 50 shades inspired stories.
I need a cringe recommendation. What book has the most forced, obnoxious, tedious, preachy, self-righteous Christian message?Hard mode: can't mention The Bible.
Summus Theologica
inb4 some shithead says paradise lostOP, my answer would be the coral island by ballantyne
The Bible
Descartes' Meditations
Why?
you're such a boring person
Crime and Punishment
Fedor Plebstoevski
Graham Green's three catholic novels are insufferable. INSUFFERABLE.
The chronicles of Narnia. Anything by CS Lewis really.
Fuck reading and writing, I want one of these the pic related, just a little cutie -- she an even be over 18, I wouldn't mind much.
You see that exit sign over there? You know what to do.
little trap lel
wanting "she"fuck off plebeian
For those who want to discuss language learning/languages/etc.Je suis en train d'etudier francais. Je veux vraiment à parler couramment ou, peut-etre, a un niveau acceptable en France, notamment les aspects d'ecrire et lire. J'avais etudie avant commencant au universite, et je souhaite d'ajoute à ma connaissance de grammaire, vocabulaire, etc. parceque en ecole ils m'ont enseigner pauvrement. O bien, maintenant est maintenant et hier est hier. J'habiterai avec ma grandmere, qui est francophone et le parle, cet ete.Quelqu'un ici qui a quelques idees pour practiquer entre maintenant et puis? Quelques forums francais ou je peux ecrire en francais, peut-etre?
Anyone here ever learn Turkish?I'm taking it next year, my only other experience with foreign languages is spanish and slavic languages.
I think Duolingo is working on a turkish course right now, which would probably be out early enough that you can try it out ahead of time. Of course Duo is only really good for about the first two or so weeks of learning by when you should finish all of the lessons if you're actually serious about the language, no matter the language
 étudié le français quatre ans lire en français aimer hommes français professeur dit "anon, vous ressemble une ivre italienne quand tu parle françaisAll my dreams are dashed.
OP ici, bougez a Canada, ou tout les gens parlent francais lentement, et avec un accent americain nord-est. On abaisse le bar, bien sur
I have a small amount of background in Spanish and know many Latin roots, let's see if I can decipher this.study french for four yearsread frenchspeak with french dudesprof says "anon, you sound like a greasy eyetie trying to speak french"
here are some corrections, i can go in depth if you want:etudier le francaisapprendre a parlerles aspects d'ecriture et de lectureje souahite ajoutter a ma conaissanceils m'ont mal enseigne accent at the last ethat expression afterwards doesn't mean much in frenchj'habiterafrancophone et le parle = redundancypratiquerentre maintenant et cet ete don't know what you meant by puis, which means afteri was born in france but grew up in nyc, the CNED helped me a shitload for learning although idk if it's free this was a while back. also i probably wouldn't have become as fluent if it weren't for my parents forcing me to have frequent french conversations with them. best of luck, you're already doing pretty well
OOoo~ J'aime les hommes canadiens aussi.6/10Professor says "anon, you sound like a drunk Italian woman when you speak french."
I hate that Japanese is logographic.Although I can follow a spoken conversation reasonably well to the point that I had little issue living there a few years ago, I still can't read it for shit.It pains me to think that I have an easier time reading and understanding the French written in this thread, despite my experience with French being limited to a single, bored afternoon on Duolingo of which I never followed up. Likewise, I could learn Hangul in another afternoon, and I would suddenly understand written Korean better, even though the only Korean I've "studied" is that which passively filters into my ears as I watch their soap operas.Fuck logographic writing systems.
I'm almost finished with French Duolingo, but I still feel like I know nothing. Where do I go from here?
It's not so bad.Start with the Kana, most people learn them both in a weekend. It's okay if it takes you longer, print out a chart.Learning the Kanji isn't the struggle to memorize the meaning of 3,000+ characters. It's about being able to read and figure out what each new Kanji means using its radicals as context to understand them.Download a Jsho on your phone and learn the radicals.It's not so bad. I started studying it after I gave up on my drunk Italian sounding French.頑張って!
Check out the /int/ language learning guide. You shouldn't use duo lingo by itself.
Thanks a ton! I still rely on google translate a tiny bit just to quickly get words I don't know -- I don't use it for entire phrases, just to pick up new vocabulary words, and my grammar is shit as you've picked up, but thanks again, really helpful.
that expression afterwards doesn't mean much in french entre maintenant et cet ete don't know what you meant by puis, which means afteractually, I'll bite for these two, since you were so kind to offer.1. know of any idioms that mean something similar?2. how would you say "between now and then?"
Learning Spanish you learned to talk in slang in two weeksChinguense esa, jotas.
Can anyone recommend me a book or something for Spanish? I can write and speak okay but I'd like to refine my Spanish more. Any Greeks can confirm the items at the top right are good enough?
Why would you ever learn the native language of Germany?Anyway, I'm keeping on track with my italian, so I won't forget it, and I've started to learn japanese on the side about two years ago.Learning a language is more of a listening and watching matter, though. Most people won't learn a language by reading shit, unless you are a savant.I've been using WaniKani to learn Kanji. I'ts bretty good and does most of the work for me. Lifetime membership, yeah
I'm learning Esperanto. Hopefully I will soon be able to William Auld's works.
-Philosophy-GermanRich vocabulary for philosophy, one that doesn't translate properly or wellTendency toward clarity and specificity, with even the notoriously dense authors simply requiring acclimationMost important and seminal thinkers in philosophy for the past 200-300 yearsMasters of movements still cutting edge and relevant todayFrenchLimited, non-agglutinative vocabulary, translates fine to EnglishTendency toward deliberate obscurantism even at the lowest level, allowing for total charlatans to masquerade as legitimate philosophers to hipsters for decadesA few important movements, mostly simple undergraduate level Enlightenment era or only of interest to women and hipsters 20th c.Masters of fraudulent movements that are clogging philosophy and culture today-Literature-GermanGreat masters and innovators in Romanticism, Realism, and ModernismMellifluous but precise poetry from a language well-suited for itCovers great philosophical themesSeveral great masters like GoetheFrenchMostly derivative works of saccharine romanticism or outright romance, of little interest to modernsLimp language, 'weak'-feeling, no clear stops or divisions, tendency toward the saccharine and effeminate, inferior in flow to fellow Romance language Italian which also has a superior corpus of poetryMostly interpersonal, emotional stories, designed to titillate rather than enlighten or cause introspection, good for female readersMore prolific than profound Sartre-Culture & utility- GermansPolitest people on earthIndustriousPowerhouse of Europe, leader of the EUEither win wars or lose them when the entire planet joins inFrenchNotoriously rudest people on earthNotoriously indolentFlagging relevance, second fiddle to Germany in EULose wars before they start
Whenever people point out France having weeks-long vacations as a basic standard of living thing is because they're lazy I point out that the Germans are the second most industrious people on Earth and have them too.
How should I start learning Russian? I tried learning grammar first, but the sheer amount of rules was overwhelming. And I read somewhere that its impossible to completely self-learn Russian unless you interact or live with the Russian language daily. Is that true?
This was one of the most objective dissections of two cultures I've ever read in my life.
Pourquoi pas juste, lire?
Too bad we germans will be outbred by inferior negroid and muslim cultures.
Pirate Rosetta Stone, and buy some dual-language books from a Goodwill.If you have money, then I can't relate much advice. Hire a tutor or something.
je souhaite ajouter à ma connaissance
Anyone wanna gelp me create a conlang
i've been labeling stuff around my mansion with french words is this a good method i would like to learn french but it's soo damn difficult to pronounce
Can anyone recommend me a book or something for Spanish? I can write and speak okay but I'd like to refine my Spanish more.Lee la poesía de Federico García Lorca
I read somewhere that its impossible to completely self-learn Russian unless you interact or live with the Russian language daily. Is that true?You could really say that about any language. What ultimately matters is trying to "live the language"--read books, listent to music, watch movies, and ideally converse with natives.Trying to apply grammar rules to memorized vocab lists like a robot will only get you so far. As a human, you need to get an intuitive feel for the language.
Nice memeLiterally falling for a meme
2015Ne parolas Esperanton, la lingvo internacia
Il faut pratiquer, se relire et se faire corriger, en évitant si possible par un Français. Ils sont pour la plupart incapables de parler leur propre langue.
Esperanto /reddit/
using the word meme
I'm learning French to read their comics.
I was in the same position as you. Buy a French grammar textbook I used Easy French Step-By-Step, download Michel Thomas's complete French course, and use Anki to train your vocabulary.
I started learning German some time ago but one thing has been bothering me. Why is it virtually impossible to find German subtitles for movies be it a German movie or other? Don't they have a subtitle community? Do they dub everything?
Germany is has a ridiculously large and robust dubbing community.
*industry.
I have to choose between learning Chinese and Spanish for my upcoming freshmen year of college. I want to learn Chinese because I took it all four years in high school so I'm more comfortable with it, but I also want to learn Spanish because I'm a bean and there's nothing worse than that dirty look abuelas give you when you say you don't know how to speak it. Which one should I take?
Didn't they declare French a dying language recently?
Chinese. You can learn Spanish in your own time later.
kekAnyway, French is growing steadily thanks to Africa. in someting like 2050, most of French speakers will be African.
Anyone know good sources for learning Latin? I know just a tad bit at the moment and I have a few textbooks, but if anyone has some nice online resources, I would greatly appreciate them.
Damn it.I'm Hungarian and it's the same in my country, but atleast there is an existing subtitle community and we don't necessarily have to rely on shitty dubs.
If that is true then I might as well drop duolingo now, I'm somewhat halfway through the Spanish one and can comprehend random Wikipedia pages somewhat, but if it is as you said I'll just try other methods
nuttensohn
Should I learn German or Russian first?
Why don't you all just learn via the L-R method? Not only is it the most efficient, it involves reading literature too, which is what I imagine most of you want to learn new languages for anyway.
It doesn't sound time efficient to me. After one month of grammar drilling I was able to read adult literature with the help of a dictionary.
You can interact with me ._.
I was able to read adult literature with the help of a dictionary.That's pretty much the same thing as L-R itself, only slower.
 aimer hommes françaisEpouse-moi.Je suis français et plutôt mignon yeux bleus, cheveux noirs. Je suis aussi patricien comme baise.
To be honest that's a pretty sneaky pasta, it's only natural that unexperienced people would fall for it.
From https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/French_language:Native speakers77 million 2015[1]L2 speakers: 140 million 2015[1]Official language in29 countriesAdministrative/cultural16 dependent entitiesNumerous international organisationsI know this is a meme, but it's a rather intiguing one. Like, will American ever overcome their cuck complex towards France ?
Any Greeks can confirm the items at the top right are good enough?They seem alright but keep in mind you're buying three separate books to learn one language. Most university courses use Hansen & Quinn's "Greek: An Intensive Course" since it's the premier textbook for learning Greek quickly. But it teaches you through brute force; there's no room given at all to baby you into the language and the toughest concepts come in the first few chapters. tl;dr consider how much money you want to spend on this and if you don't want to spend $60+ buy a used copy of Hansen & Quinn
I just looked it up and it said you spend 80-120 hours reading children's books. And I doubt you will be able to write or speak coherently afterwards either. Drilling grammar is the best way to learn a language; I don't understand why some people are so allergic to it.
The textkit and Latin Discussion forums often help people with questions. What textbook do you have?
朋友,你的中文怎么样?
Expound further
What? No, you start with long novels you're familiar with, the longer the better, because the idiolect of the author shines through in the first few dozen pages.Learning method developed by polack schizo to learn languages as efficiently as possible1. pick a book that you like and are familiar with2. Listen to audiobook and read book at the same time until you learn to separate the words of the audio in your L23. Listen to audiobook and read the translation at the same time, repeat as many times as necessarywebpage from the originator of the method describing further:http://users.bestweb.net/~siom/martian_mountain/!%20L-R%20the%20most%20important%20passages.htm
But literary translation are usually not direct.Have you successfully used this method? Becuase I am sceptical.
Native Chinese struggling with English here, I can write much better than I speak, how do I git gud?
Not that good tbh. We never learned characters except for the basic ones like 我 and 怎么样.对不起我的中文不好.
It's too hardcore for me, but I tried it a little with L'Étranger and after a few hours I could definitely see how effective it could potentially be.
Don't feel sorry, Chinese is a hard language to learn, keep at it and it may open unexpected opportunities in your life, like get laid easily in China
I've never had to deal with such a radical language difference as that, but my advice would be to be conscious of your tongue and the shapes it makes when you speak practice in private, obviously and try to imitate native speakers' accents.
I tried it a while and it wasn't a good idea. It's more of a vocabulary builder that doesn't replace solid grammatical bases.I learned three languages only by learning grammar, producing text, building my own databases on Anki and then slowly reading novels and short stories.
Is the accent really necessary? Because trying to come up with a proper phrase in real time conversation is already challenging for me, now with additional mental effort to be conscious of my accent I am afraid I won't be able to hold a conversation...And I am a "slow" person in general, most of time I just couldn't even think of anything to say however in my native tongue I can be much more talktive, and conversation quickly deteriorates into awkward silence.
It's ok, your race isn't really that intelligent.
are you a twelve year old
Do not take such an obvious bait. Please.
Newfag to German here I'm learning it so I can read German Philosophy like Hegel and Schelling properly do I need to learn the International Phonetic Alphabet? Will it help? Also is learning grammar the most important thing?
No, IPA is useless unless you plan on specifically study phonetics/phonology, a language at its core or learning more than two unrelated tongues.
Buy or borrow a reference grammar, then stare at the case charts until your eyes bleed.
since threads like this pop up regularly on /lit/, I was wondering if it might be worth making a Goodreads group for people who want to learn French and eventually other languages through free online resources and exchange. I haven't put much thought into how to go about this yet, but it sounds fun and if enough people are willing to put in the effort, it could work! anyway, hmu if you're interested and we can take it from there: goodreads.com/red_wine
It sounds interesting. What do you have in mind?
threads for /lit/ users to find willing partners for linguistic exchange through Skype for example, a collection of tried & tested online resources easily accessible programs & pdf files, literary recommendations for learners according to their skills/goals, etc. as I said I haven't thought much about it, but I'm sure there are at least a few of us who could benefit from this!
There already is the /int/ thread, I guess.
I suppose, but who knows, maybe an initiative that is tailor-made for the people of /lit/ might be better-suited to some learners. anyway, I have to go cook now, but if anyone is truly interested they can message me via goodreads.
Would love to.Not quoted anon, but I'm learning Russian from a russian teacher as an undergrad. Thing is, I'm graduating in German and hopefully French at the same time, there's little chance I'll be able to keep studying russian in college simply because classes take all of my time. Little thread related rant, sorry about it. I want to be a polyglot by the time I'm 25, and even if I only study French and German, that's going to happen. So since that's a reality, I want to push myself more with russian.
Where do I sign?
Hey OP, I'm French, good luck with our language. The French community on the Internet is not really big. I would suggest you to watch movies or follow youtubers some are decent like Doxa, Minute Papillon and if you want to learn casual French you can follow "funny" channels like AntoineDaniel, SLG etc.. Read a lot of French litterature, it's helpful, Camus is easy to read, so is Voltaire or Dumas. Michel Onfray is a good modern philosopher imo.If you have any other question, please be my guest.btw we are not that rude, I only think that French people are relatively more emotion-driven, stressed and a bit stupid than most of the other European countries.
Hahaha c'est vrai que c'est pas glorieux le niveau ici. Tu viens d'où ?
"greasy eyetie"please don't change anon !
Merci! Je suis en train de lire Molloy le propre traduction par Beckett, lequel est, jusqu'ici, m'aide, bien sur. Beaucoup de mots lesquels je ne connais pas ainsi, et beaucoup de plus lesquels je ne connais pas du tout.
Dr. Thompson, insightful writer or drug addled lunatic? Or is he great because he really is both?
Do most copies have the drawings in them?
The mass produced ones do.I picked up a dirt cheap one at a wholesale clearance and was pleasantly surprised.
Ralph Steadman is a cool guy.
The latter. He was something special.
Why has there been no movement to practice writing like he did? Gonzo died with him it seems, I started writing a short story about tripping acid in Washington DC spending the day in an art museum and then wandering through Northeast trying to find a concert. I take a lot of inspiration from Hunter but worry I might just come across as a hack imitating one of the greats. Based on a real experience of course.
what was he a doctor of?
post-19th century you cannot be both sober and insightful.
google
Drugs weren't even that big a part of his writing. His persona just ended up being shaped that way.
bothGeorge McGovern called him "The most accurate least factual"as a fanboy i agree with him
ph.d journalism from Columbia
That's a good observation.They were a big part of his life though, even if just for the persona he told stories through, he felt the weight and obligation to fulfill that persona his whole life.
But I'm not talking about his life. I'm talking about his writing.
National Portrait Gallery? Man that third floor modern art exhibit really is something else when you're tripping.
That's fair, I guess I've just always been of the persuasion that a man and his words are two parts of a whole.Smithsonian American Art Museum, you ever realized museums are just places for people to gawk at things, I saw the electronic superhighway or whatever it's called during the peak of the trip and was thoroughly stupefied. The story is coming along really well actually too, started like last week and have knocked out a few pages I'm really happy with.
Why has there been no movement to practice writing like he didHe was part of the New Journalism. There are plenty of writers like him. Check out the anthology of that title by Thomas Wolfe. Main authors are Truman Capote, Joan Didion, Thomas Wolfe, Hunter Thompson, Gay Talse, George Plimpton, John Hersey.
Yeah, now that I actually think about it, there's no one just like Hunter but I suppose that's just the nature of art. I have a lot of those guys on my back log of reading. Thanks for the list.
Try Terry Southern's collection Red Dirt Marijuana and Other Tastes, then proceed to Candy and his novels. He's a minor figure, but he has a similar sense of humor to Thompson, but most of his output was pure fiction. That collection, Red Dirt, is one of my favorites. It's a mix of non-fiction and fiction. If you want an idea of what his humor is like, he's best known for writing Dr. Strangelove.
I really like Hunter S. Thompson but the reason there hasn't been anyone else like him is because those that try are basically just poorly aping his style.I think Gonzo Journalism has a lot of potential as a continuing movement but first it needs to get past the fact 99% of people who subscribe to it are just trying to BE Thompson
Gonzo is just another way of describing New Journalism. See 
Sounds like a plan. Thanks, man. Dr. Strangelove is great.
I despise him, but you may also like Norman Mailer. Try Armies of the Night.
Threw it on the list for this summer.
He seems like a uniquely American genius. I wonder what folks in other countries think of him.
I'd love to read Fear and Loathing on the Capaign Trail alongside Buchanan's book on Nixon's Comeback. Apparently they were friends.
Fear and Loathing on the Capaign Trailit's alright, do get it.
Have you read The Great Shark Hunt or Hell's Angels? I'd read either first, unless there is something esp. alluring about the tall grass of the '72 campaign.
What is it about Thompson that brings out the worst in people? I've talked with a large variety of people about him, and it seems like every drug using deadbeat is convinced they're going to be the next Thompson. They act like them going to drug festivals and doing all manners of hard drugs is the way life should be, and I don't get it.. Dude was an intelligent writer who did drugs, not this revolutionary drug-addled superhero these people make him out to be.
He's the king of the weird and they all know it. For what it's worth though, drugs are pretty great.
Is trying to have Thompson's style just impossible
Aping his style seems pointless even if it was possible because you would just be in his shadow as a writer.
good lad but too memed up by himself and the plebs
there were and are plenty imitators, they just aren't as funny or interesting.
Is there anything even important to write about anymore as he did?I mean, while he was writing there was the flower-child movement in the late 60's which he was at the epicenter of in San Francisco, the Vietnam war, numerous scandals and whatnot.If there was a brilliant, young journalist up and coming what could he even write about? No one wants to fight against anything anymore nothing that doesn't infiltrate the precious interwebs, but that's also because there's nothing to rebel against.The world is the most peaceful it's been in most of human history, the occupation in the middle east isn't much of a war, nor is it a war to rebel against since its a voluntary war, not drafted.
I'm reading Nausea by Sartre now and there are times that I find myself reading in HST's voice. Anyone else pick up that he got some of his style from Sartre?
I got halfway through and spent more time on the wikis of politicians of the era trying to get the references. I have it sitting on my "to-read" pile still
There's war all over the world. Fascist and pseudo-communist regimes crushing the populous under them. There's a ton of shit. Vice is shit, but they cover good topics. For example, African warlords who fight bare-ass naked with machine guns and eat the raw hearts of other generals they kill, Bogotan death squads who practice "class cleansing" and firebomb the homeless, the Ukrainian decline and fight against the state and then the ethnic russian rebels being bankrolled and supported by the Russian military, IS's pure ideology and even their jihad against the Taliban, etc. Those are all live wire topics. Anyone worth their salt could turn those into amazing stories.
Most of those would fall under combat journalism though, I'm talking mainly domestic journalism. I was just thinking the kind of stories you could get by freelancing in the horn f africa or whatever, but is there anything interesting to cover in the states anymore?
VICE is turning into this.
Continuing on the subject of psychedelic writers, what does /lit/ think of Terrence McKenna and his works? Namely "Food of the Gods"His stoned ape theory seems batshit insane. I've been listening to a lot of his public talks on YouTube, and I'm not sure whether he's enlightening or brainwashing me.Is he a crazed hippy trying to justify mushrooms and make a quick buck? Or is he something altogether more serious?
What changed?
He's entertaining, pretty resourceful as far as history of psychedelic drug use goes. Just don't take his conclusions too seriously.
America has become disinterested as a people and our government has turned into a pseudo fascist corporate amusement park where only the rich and famous have express passes. People seem to think the things they read in history books only exist on paper and it's made a generation who are solely bred for the rat race. I think honestly the young should just say fuck that and build our own industries and organizations, maybe we would ache and suffer in the short term but I would rather die next to people that labored to make their world better than die boxed into a cubicle slaving away at a sprawling machine so my children can get eaten by it too.
the waning political interest is itself an interesting story. Also with the death of the middle class, trends towards homogenous communities, Capitalism eclipsing democracy, and a polarization of morality on the "extreme right and extreme left" I think there are still interesting stories.
He's one of those genius idiot types. Food of the Gods was a great/fun read.
Now see, this in itself - while not exactly journalism - is the kind of stuff a modern Thompson would write about, what he'd critique. Not just a blatant, "This generation is a bunch of pussies" or whatever
numbing
It's actually a part of the final sentiments and page of the short story I'm writing I mentioned earlier.
I'd like to read that actually
I don't have much now but I think I might post a thread about it once I've finished the first bit of it in a few weeks, it's called Acid Trip Number Six.
I'd like to see that thread
I think he might get wrongfully dismissed because of the drug stuff not by young people /lit/ types thoughI think he was great
I love listening to his talksCheck out his one on Finnegans WakeAs far as his ideas go, he has a few nice ones while some are just insane. Some are both.
bump
???

complete shitNo, Vice started out poorly aping new journalism/counter cultural stuff, now it's just another click-bait based advertorial
this is exactly the kind of stuff I wanted to write about, but I'm too diminutive and scared of seeming pretentious/the bad kind of edgy
think Thompson is pretty goodhave never done drugsno friends or contactsI just wanna know what it feels like.
Drug-addled lunatic who had plenty of insight on drug-addled lunacy.
I always thought the "doctor of journalism" thing was a joke. I feel stupid now
Great writer on American culture. Too little regard for hard facts to be taken seriously as a journalist. Very much so a 'meme author', held up by drug users as a hero. Still a great and monumental American author.
you ever see an orange sky, burning off the coast of the nevada desert?you ever seen a man cough up half a lung and leave it there before posting his vote?you aint seen nuthin
Even Thompson is accused of that. Fuck the critics. Unless of course they all criticize you for the same specific thing, in which case they're probably right.
what makes something pretentious/edgy and apt social commentary/critique or good story tellingwhat's the line?
Is it entirely true that its a pussy generation though. Everyones too scared to actually fight The Man so they fight battles that were already won in the 60's/70's and pat themselves on the back for it.
Funny thing is, I don't know if I could answer that without sounding pretentious/edgy, but here goes. I think it has something to do with having experience and keeping a moderately open mind. To avoid sounding pretentious/edgy, you've got to not only know what the hell you're writing about, you've got to go into it with an open mind. You've got to really pay attention to your subject, and accept that your preconceived notions may, in fact, be all wrong. Too many assholes who think they've got something to say wind up bending the truth to fit their narrative. Fuck those guys. To make apt social commentary, again you need to really observe society, understand the way it functions, try to see it through a different lens by stepping outside of your comfort zone. As far as being a good storyteller, that just takes practice.
ThisAlso, dont make the mistake of copying all your opinions from some political viewpoint. Thompson never pigeonholed himself like that but alotta Thompson wanna-bes do. Source: I went to uni with a bunch of marxist Thompson wanna-bes
I feel like it's harder to do that now.I feel like society is much more insular, you can't really just wander around as much.An anon mentioned earlier that, from a domestic American standpoint, there is little to discuss that hasn't already been tackled by generations before us. Many of the things we'd say are wrong with society now were still a problem back in Thompson's heyday, only they're more muted and exist heavily in the invisible space we call the internet.I don't know, this is just a hermit's two cents. I'm finally going back to school in the fall. Maybe I'll meet people and have the "experience" and be proven completely wrong.
There's plenty to discuss, it's just not being discussed because the American media is in a real sorry place right now. Most of what you get in the mainstream is bipartisan bullshit and even "underground" media outlets are filled with nonissues that the twin extremes of Tumblr and 4chan keep perpetuating. There's a depressing amount of half-truths, exaggerations, and occasional blatant lies that all sides use to frame their narrative. We could use another Thompson right about now.
momma?
A really cutting and insightful Thompson style book about Occupy would have been outstanding.
Or even something about all this buzz about police brutality becoming more and more apparent.
That would have been so great. Ugh, why'd he have to die?
we will never get a book by thompson about the racial injustices black people have to suffer due to a white police state in Americagod damn shame
If black people ever got to work on time, maybe they'd have good jobs like the police.
black people not getting to work on time is the reason cops are murdering themfuck off back to /pol/
lmao
The best of his work is astonishing, entertaining, and educational. A superficial reading of his writing misses everything but the entertainment. Thompson shares a trait with Orwell that comes out from time to time. It's a self-aware naivete. Part of his genius was finding and engaging the people who could explain a story or event, allowing him to pass that analysis on to the readers who themselves did not understand - and would never have a chance to otherwise.For all his wild and whimsy it is these parts - that solid and coherent analysis - which leaves modern professionals to whisper his name among themselves, while the wannabes play at the image and party it up.Journalism today is sales and marketing, pushing the product presented at face value. A comfortable racket for those who play ball, and Thompson himself said so.He also had a talent for being in the wrong place at the wrong time so often that he occasionally hit the jackpot. This is known in the trade as Hard Work, something else people seem to miss when discussing him.His book on the Hells Angels is an example. This is not his best work, it got stuck being and remaining an outsiders view; something Thompson admitted to. We now have far greater works on outlaw motorcycle gangs, and some insiderly ones, but Thompson's was the first and it helped make his name. People who want to follow the good doctor's path need to get out there and be somewhere different, and work-work-work.
First article in Great Shark Hunt
Deep web. Follow a guide. It's possible.
bump
I'm def an HST fan, but i don't being it up much because for some baffling reason people don't think he's a good writer or credible or whatever.I like him because he wrote engaging material about subjects i otherwise wouldn't give a shit about. Definitely out there but he had a pretty astute outsider's perspective on a lot of the events of his time. I also love him for his lifestyle, i feel liked he died as all great writers did, too early to get real shitty
I really need to read Great Shark Hunt.
If you want to be more like a person, you don't try to directly copy them. You immerse yourself in the things that influenced them.New Journalist fans should start here.
Throwing it on the summer list.
Nobody cares about your experiences on drugs, if that's what you think is appealing about Thompson's work, then you really just don't understand his message.
I don't, I was just saying that's what my short story was about because a big part of it is the drug culture.
Thompson's career was on a curve. He started out as a much more conventional writer and slowly addled his brain with drugs where at one point his writing talent intersected with just enough craziness to be brilliant. Fear and loathing on the campaign trail, fear and loathing in las vegas were great works. Then he kept declining and went more and more drug addled until you get to his work in the 90s which is just stream of drug addled thought.
There are thousands of people like you who are hack imitators who try to write just like thompson and take drugs. It isn't unique and you aren't special.There are lots of writers who write in Thompson's style, they just don't try to write exactly like him like hack imitators like you.
The quality of his writing drastically decreased when he started trying to fulfill the 'hunter thompson persona' once he got famous, he was way better before that.
You haven't even read my shit, bro, yeah the post is kinda fucked and worded poorly but c'mon man at least reserve some judgement.
This is the opinion of suburban twats with no grasp of what's going on in the world because the only news they get is the occasional fluff pieces on the news.Russia is still fighting a guerilla war with ukraine, a couple weeks ago they captured 3 soldiers, tortured them to death and a lot of fighting broke out. There are 4 wars going on in the middle east, there is no occupation at the moment are you really so fucking unaware that you didn't know we stopped occupying iraq/afghanistan? The syrian civil war, The rebellion in yemen, ISIS vs shiite iraqi military, Civil war in somalia the list goes on.The world isn't peaceful at the moment by any means, the middle east is going through one of the most violent periods it's gone through in the past 500 years.
This sounds really childish, anyone can start a business. Also these notions about being a 'cubicle slave' are rapidly dying because most of those jobs are disappearing with the advent of the computer age. It kinda sounds like you're 14 and just read fight club.I mean build our own industries and organizations? what just for young people? So you'll hire people based on age not on merit? good luck being competitive. It doesn't sound like you understand the world at all.
Don't forget Israel!
I can tell already you're a hack imitator because I was in the same mindset and doing the same things in the height of my thompson fandom. I think most Thompson fans go through a brief hack imitator phase where we do a lot of acid and try to write like he did. Looking back though I can tell I was a hack imitator and when you look back at what you wrote in a year or two you'll realize the same.
he started out insightful but then the drugs took overdid you know he went to Zaire to cover the Ali/Foreman fight?No you didn't because you never read the article, right?Because the article was never written.Because he never left the hotel he was so high and drunk passed out beside the swimming pool.Sometime after Campaign Trail the booze and drugs and the _persona_ took over and took priority.
computersending slaveryyeah just like the cotton gin dididiot
I'm gonna have to reassess this whole short story now.
You're clearly a moron. First off working a cubicle isn't 'slavery' no one is forcing you to do it dumb fuck. Secondly, the majority of those jobs were entering raw data and breaking it down, jobs that computers do easily.Tell me more about your brilliant 'we build organizations and industries just for young people' plan retard. You sound like a 14 year old suburban white kid with no grasp on reality.
I remember writing a story during that time about my youth in florida about the 'war on drugs', the 'legal' pharmaceutical thugs who kept house wives addicted to synthetic coke and heroinnes and the prison complex at the time. I thought it was really good stuff but I ended up trying to write exactly like Thompson, I didn't realize how much of an imitating hack I was until I was looking through erowid and saw how many people were trying to do 'gonzo' drug experiences and how bad the thompson imitations came off.
I think what I was trying to say at the time, it still is under a lot of construction as far as choice of words and sentiments go, is that rather than spend my own life inheriting the conventions and ideals of those before me it would be more fulfilling to set out and find what gives me peace on my own terms, an new addition that isn't expressed in the draft posted here is that it's possible that all these paranoias and ideals are something only I feel and that the big uproar I make about them could be totally private and that ultimately it would be more understanding and powerful to try and reach out to understand first rather than teach. Also the cotton gin guy is not me.I'm still developing my own style and although Thompson is very much an influence I spend most of my editing time going back and revising and changing my voice to reflect my own thoughts rather than contorting them to evoke something else, which is interesting because that's kind of the whole point of the story. Something I'm kind of realizing just now.
Tell me more about your brilliant 'we build organizations and industries just for young people' plan retardI am not that anon but I think you misunderstood his argument.Anyway I'll defend myself cuz why not.working a cubicle isn't 'slavery' no one is forcing you to do itNo matter where political theories fall on the spectrum it's sort of an agreement among intellectuals that the term 'sales associate' instead of 'wage slave' is probably the penultimate ideology of the West. I worked in engineering for a couple years at a fortune 500 co and while I liked my job there were certainly "engineers" there who were slaves to their career path.the majority of those jobs were entering raw data and breaking it down, jobs that computers do easilyI mentioned the cotton gin before. The same argument was used then by its proponents. Slavery is necessary because the cotton industry requires lots of labor. Cotton gin cuts the number of people needed to tend to the industry in half, so half the slaves will be freed of their work.But with the invention of the gin the cotton industry grew 100x and suddenly the reduced labor couldn't compare to the growth of the industry as a whole.Needless to say as computers replace the pen-and-paper bureaucratic jobs they're replaced by programmers who spend the same 40 hours a week building software. The only difference is now they are forced to work with frustrating electronic tedium.
heads up that  is not me.I am 6612413.
You sound like a 14 year old suburban white kid with no grasp on reality.ad hominem
The difference is that where before you would hire 100 raw data entries, now you pay one IT guy and buy one piece of expensive software. The people who design the software and the guy who maintains it both get paid better than those who entered data.There are certainly those who work tedious jobs but to call it slavery is a little absurd and dramatic.
The difference is that where before you would hire 100 raw data entries, now you pay one IT guy and buy one piece of expensive softwareWhere before you hired 100 slaves now you pay one slave and buy one cotton gin.I see no difference here sir. Who's making the cotton gin? What happens when there are 100x the number of cotton field there were before?The people who design the software and the guy who maintains it both get paid better than those who entered dataUnfortunately this is false in the long run. They do ~now~ because it's a new skill. What happens when more and more people get CompSci degrees every year for the next few decades? Capitalism has this funny way of taking all that value derived from the newfound efficiency and centralizing it in the hands of whoever got there first decades after the efficienct procedures are made.Think about it. We've been making exponentially more efficient technology for the past 50 years and everyone STILL works 40 hours and a week and more people work minimum wage than ever in the US.The reality is that you're claiming there's some sort of efficiency but the pay-off doesn't go to the workers. It never did and you have to be a fool to think it will in the near future or that computers are "different."to call it slavery is a little absurd and dramaticI'm sure that it sounds absurd and dramatic to most people though not my old coworkers, however, who'd agree with me; even the right-leaning ones. In my mind it sounds absurd due to ideology, as I have said.A simple exercise: think of "sales associate" as being to "renting" or "leasing" as "slavery" is to "buying" or "selling."I think if you realize this it doesn't sound so absurd of a claim.
There is a very active effort to end the war on drugs, which is a very significant battle. Occupy Wall street and protests against the Iraq war were huge events but they didn't get the deserved coverage in mainstream media. People are fighting for things all the time, even though you can't see it in mainstream culture.
You're clearly a moron. First off working a cubicle isn't 'slavery' no one is forcing you to do it dumb fuckour current individualist, capitalist, market driven societies are clearly not creating fulfilled human beings. Considering the material wealth we have we are doing an awful job at creating harmonic and happy human beings. All attempts at alternative thinking should obviously be encouraged
http://pastebin.com/v80hz3g8 Still very rough and very changing, it's come up a couple times that I might be just aping thompson's style and I thought I'd just post a good highlight from it for anyone interested.
bump
Nobody said this anonyou are making up your own argument
his late stuff is pretty much a hacky impersonation of his earlier better stuffultimately he made the right decisionhe wasn't contributing anything of value anymorejust adding more shit to the shitpile
fuck off
a We do not learn from history because our studies are brief and prejudiced. b In a surprising manner, 250 years emerges as the average length of national greatness. c This average has not varied for 3,000 years. Does it represent ten generations? d The stages of the rise and fall of great nations seem to be: The Age of Pioneers outburst The Age of Conquests The Age of Commerce The Age of Affluence The Age of Intellect The Age of Decadence. e Decadence is marked by: Defensiveness Pessimism Materialism Frivolity An influx of foreigners The Welfare State A weakening of religion. f Decadence is due to: Too long a period of wealth and power Selfishness Love of money The loss of a sense of duty. g The life histories of great states are amazingly similar, and are due to internal factors. h Their falls are diverse, because they are largely the result of external causes. i History should be taught as the history of the human race, though of course with emphasis on the history of the student’s own country. Are Glubb's writings on the fate of empires unfairly overlooked or was he just an eccentric who liked to talk about middle-eastern history? I think that what he observed and wrote about needs to be discussed far more often but his work doesn't seem to have any relevance anywhere. I can't even remember how I heard about him.
Look back over the past, with its changing empires that rose and fell, and you can foresee the future, too. -Marcus AureliusHe said that during the height of the Roman Empire
That's pretty interesting. How many past empires would Marcus Aurelius have even known about?I suppose that even just knowing the history of two or three would give you the general idea of how things fall apart.
By that time Akkadia, Mesopotamia, Babylonia, Egypt, Phonecia, Greece, Alexander's Empire, and Persia had all had their time in the sun and faded in power or disappeared completely.
it's tinfoil nonsense
I thought he was pretty fair and reasonable.
There is that ol' angry contrarian retard who didn't even read it.Nothing in here is 'tinfoil nonsense' I can tell you didn't read it, you're most likely thinking of all the stupid shit comparing USA directly to Rome. This Essay stays in the realm of fact and isn't making ridiculous comparisons.
There are a couple of pages dedicated to his antics, written by Kapuscinski.
Alexander's conquests are the whole reason we have western culture today. Show a little respect. The rest of Europe took much longer to develop than Greece. Rome only became possible after Alexander had removed most all threats from eastern empires.
Because people believe in Progress now and are on The Right Side of History, right, comrade?
I'm looking for some feel good books, something light and at least somewhat cheerful. Haven't read much in that area but what comes to mind are.The Housekeeper and the Professor - Calm, not much happens, very light. Cosmicomics - A bit strange but calm.
TV was made for people like you, so just watch some more of that.
Because we need less people reading and more people being pretentious fucks about reading, amirite?Geez.Go jerk off to Tolstoy or something. Pamper that ridiculous ego and leave the rest of us be.
idk go read comics or whatever genre shit reddit recommends, if you want some feel good shit. or keep watching shitty tv shows. I don't caresaged btw
I like how it's assumed that I'm an illiterate loser because I want advice on how to go about exploring areas of literature that I'm unfamiliar with. Good job of reminding me why I rarely visit this place.Here have a good song.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=k2V3NrvThlg
just fuck off holy shit
Marx’s key insight remains valid, perhaps more than ever: for Marx, the question of freedom should not be located primarily in the political sphere proper Does a country have free elections? Are its judges independent? Is its press free from hidden pressures? Does it respect human rights?. Rather, the key to actual freedom resides in the “apolitical” network of social relations, from the market to the family. Here the change required is not political reform but a transformation of the social relations of production — which entails precisely revolutionary class struggle rather than democratic elections or any other “political” measure in the narrow sense of the term. We do not vote on who owns what, or about relations in the factory, and so on — such matters remain outside the sphere of the political, and it is illusory to expect that one will effectively change things by “extending” democracy into the economic sphere by, say, reorganizing the banks to place them under popular control. Radical changes in this domain need to be made outside the sphere of legal “rights.” In “democratic” procedures which, of course, can have a positive role to play, no matter how radical our anti-capitalism, solutions are sought solely through those democratic mechanisms which themselves form part of the apparatuses of the “bourgeois” state that guarantees the undisturbed reproduction of capital. In this precise sense, Badiou was right to claim that today the name of the ultimate enemy is not capitalism, empire, exploitation, or anything similar, but democracy itself. It is the “democratic illusion,” the acceptance of democratic mechanisms as providing the only framework for all possible change, which prevents any radical transformation of capitalist relations.Why is this man allowed to speak in universities? He's basically advocating an anti-democratic coup.
He doesn't seriously advocate anything, save for increasing his own bank balance by blabbing off to some internet teenagers.
You're not paying attention to what he's saying. Republicanism isn't democracy and Capitalism is inherently anti-democratic.
He's basically advocating an anti-democratic coup.2015believing we live in democraciesAnyway,2015listening to meme philosophers
He's basically advocating an anti-democratic coup.Marxists have controlled European academia since Frankfurthurr durr I don't know what dictatorship of the proletariat isThis has been a common academic viewpoint for a long time, bud-o
Still 20 years to see all the marxists die.We will make it
Actually what he's saying is spot on
He is right though, most people with a fully functioning non-ideological brain agree with this.Other people go saying everytime "if you want to change something, vote, in the mean time just work" thinking that they will see a change through votations.
He's completely right though. Democracy as it currently stands is just an extension of upper class power where the plebs can choose which rich person represents them.Consider the lack of a an open general public discourse in society. People can't speak or listen to new ideas, they can only vote on a handful of ones selected by people/groups with the financial backing to make it an issue.What's really scary is thanks to industrialized education and media, even our morality is becoming a market product
implying the demos should remain powerful
Are you talking about America only or the entire west?
Read the sticky
advocating a totalitarian ban because Zizek is antiequalitarianismOh the ironing
I often tell people to just imagine the scenario: Hitler is succesful in Europe, a peace accord is achieved, but then he passes away. A new election will be held where the new Fuhrer will be chosen by the people. The two are members of the nazi party, the media is controlled by the nazi party, etc. It may seem like anyone would be able to see through this sham, but soon the heavy campaigning would begin Because after all both really want to be the Fuhrer the different sects of the party and the media will choose their candidate, their small differences will begin to obfuscate their Nazi consensus, people will start picking on these differences "X is better for women!" "Y has a better welfare plan" and soon even the most staunch opponents of the Nazis will see voting as the best way to change things, because the Nazi system may be bad, but we really need to stop X this election. This is more or less the situation we're in. One group has won, and now we can pick between their two wings.
Why do you reject the idea that universities should be places of free expression, OP?
He's basically advocating an anti-democratic coupThere's literally nothing wrong with that.
Totally agree with him. We need to start giving more attention to our practice of power outside of established political forms. The "stroll through the institutions" or whatever that phrase is in English is a dead end full of fatal "compromises".
of the the poltical does not equal the economic.so if you change the political you still might not have changed anything about the economic. This is why worker ownership of the means or production still works through bourgeois laws and will not solve anything. we have to go further
Which are some essential books on film theory, history of cinema, and related stuff?Was planning to get pic related. Never read any book about cinema before.
Just get the David Bordwell and Kristin Thompson books Film Theory: An Introduction and Film History: An Introduction. They're basic textbooks that will teach you what you need to know when first learning about the cinema
Film Theory: An IntroductionSorry this is actually Film Art: An Introduction, but ti covers a lot of theory
The book you posted is pretty cool, but you really gotta like Tarkovsky to get through it. He's incredibly pretentious and arrogant at times, and while I somewhat enjoy his authorial voice and his ideas, it makes for a frustrating reading. Also, look what textbooks universities use to teach Film Theory and buy those? Or find the ebooks, don't know.
Film Art: An Introduction is good.Have pic related, most are useful for film theory, will post details of any requested.
Is How to Read a Film any good?
Haven't read all of it, just excerpts that interest me. But from what I've read it's good as an introduction to almost all of film. It covers history, critical theory, technical stuff. Good book overall.
Going to bump with excerpts. Maybe something will start a discussion.

Well, I'll throw my two cents in. Anybody here read Deleuze's books on cinema?




Haven't, what ones are worth looking at? Interesting ideas in them?


Going full /lit/ now.
Last one.
These are my film books. The ones I would recommend the most for starting out would be Film History and Film Art if you want to take a more serious approach, or The Story of Film if you want a more casual reader approach. Poetics of Cinema is a very good book as well but I'd read that after the others. Andrew Sarris' American Cinema is also very good. Happy to answer any questions.
all that Tarkovskymuh dick.Where did you get all of them? Which one's are good?
so many unreadyou aren't a film director
Not OP but really appreciate the info. Have any of you read Film Theory and Criticism? Is that any good?
This for editing
I've read most of all of them actually, they just have fairly good spines.For Tarkovsky the books I enjoyed the most were his own Sculpting in Time, the book of interviews, and the book by Robert Bird. The others all have their strengths and are still quite good but I enjoyed those the most.
Cheers, I'll start reading it. For anyone else who's interested, it's on libgen:http://gen.lib.rus.ec/book/index.php?md5=2e2ffe93d98d47078732ab725425c096
Reminds me of The Meaning of Meaning
I am in need of a reverse dictionary, or perhaps just a powerful thesaurus. I have done some cursory searches, but my results are always lacking, and the sources I find are only effective up to a point.And so I come to you. I am certain there are English words which exist which define 'to cool quickly' or 'of great historical importance', but any and all of the thesauri and reverse dictionaries I find are shit.What does /lit recommend? Does /lit even use such resources, or should I seek elsewhere?
Glaciate.Epoch.
Rather to congeal... Not to freeze.
Thank you, Anon.
anyone on good reads?
Barry Pierce is OP.That's all you need to know.
I tried it once. Didn't like everybody knowing what I was reading.
If you want you could only add them once a year or twice or every decade who the duck cares anyway
quite understandable as people tend to judge people based on what they have read no one cares tbh
add request?
goodreads.com/red_winehere's mine, it needs updating thoughthere are also a couple of /lit/ groups if you're interested in that OPhttps://www.goodreads.com/group/show/67886-lit-revival-of-the-revivalhttps://www.goodreads.com/group/show/29373-lit
that pic
I meant profile picture
I prefer my old one
As for now you can keep your profile hidden from other visitor.I indeed just use it as a digital library.
bump
I ain't telling you mine. It ain't nobody business but mine and the lord.
*tips fedora*
Foul whore, you will never be able to reassign fedora-tipping to a different group of people.
bump
Bump me, daddy.
sent :^https://www.goodreads.com/user/show/36672922-dawn
privateB-but anon, how will I know if we have any books in common?
Also, this is me:https://www.goodreads.com/user/show/32443560-erik-lind
https://www.goodreads.com/user/show/32443560-erik-lindfransman/10
private profile
hej
goodreads.com/atom_cableI write reviews.
There is only one good reviewer on goodreads and if you can identify them then you are the ultimate patrician
Okhttps://www.goodreads.com/user/show/35959535-crito
Do you mean Manny?
fuck no
The only good reviewer on good reads has been posted on this board exactly twice and both times by me.
Hadrian?
No
yeh, it's me
It might be you....
made it public friendos :^
2bad 4u bc ur a pleb
i only started reading this year... p-pls be nice
https://www.goodreads.com/user/show/42639826-rafael
This was meant for  smh
https://www.goodreads.com/review/list/35515738?shelf=read
I've already added some of you from a past thread, I think, but here: https://www.goodreads.com/dvx_dvx
Szplug?
Anyone here listen to Re: Joyce? I found this podcast after finishing Ulysses and looking for some secondary material to help get more out of it. I've found it to be really good. Sometimes I think he makes connections that aren't really there but for the most part it's been enlightening to listen to and to hear what he has to say about seemingly mundane portions of the text. What's your take on it?Also, any other good lit podcasts? I'm going to be driving a lot soon and could use some for the road.
I've been aware of this for a while because Delaney appeared on another podcast I like and I want to listen to it after I read Ulysses. But I don't think I'm going to get to anything Joyce for a while. Been looking for other lit related podcasts, but haven't found anything that isn't lifeless oration. On an unrelated note, I met Frank Delaney in high school. He gave me good feedback on a short story.
Anyone here listen to Re: Joyce?No need.he makes connections that aren't really thereAcademia as a whole has been doing this for centuries. It's actually why nobody takes it seriously, anymore.
after finishing UlyssesHow many people here do you think have actually done this? You can probably count them off on one hand.
I'd say over 90% of what he says is relevant considering the author. A few of the more minor ones seem a little stretched is all. If you think you have Ulysses all figured out on your own then you're delusional.
I've read Ulysses twice in my life so far, and I never once thought of it as something to "figure out". Why would anyone?Is this how you lot approach literature?
I have read Ulysses 2.5 times
I've read Ulysses twiceBullshit. Ulysses is not a difficult book from the standpoint of understanding the base meaning and message or even the "plot" so far as there is one. The thing about this book is that there is so much more under the surface that only enhances the experience and adds layers of meaning and depth. Odd little references here and their are not needed to understand the book but they are illuminating when you do understand them. That's what Delany's podcast and other sources like Gifford's annotations help with. I don't believe anyone who has read the book twice would be unaware of this.
*there. I blame typing on my phone.
This entire post is evidence as to why you need someone to hold your hand through Ulysses. You're not a good reader and you don't think about what you read. Just because you've read and understand so little about the world, culture, and history, doesn't mean everyone else has the same bad footing.
Ok, anon. I'm sure you're smart enough to figure out all the references in Ulysses, including obscure Irish cultural references from the turn of the century, all on your own.
It's not even an issue of being smart due to how obscure and subjective to Ireland and Joyce's time a lot of them are. If anyone says they always knew exactly what Joyce was referring to on their own they're a liar or a retard.
I am Irish and I had read Portrait of The Artist, Hamlet and Dubliners before reading Ulysses. I also have a working knowledge of Irish history and Catholic theology. I wouldn't say that I know exactly what Joyce means 100% of the time but I was still able to do so for the most part on my first read through and even moreso on my second
Roderick on the Line is the best podcast.
Hmm. I just looked up Hamlet. Sounds interesting.Anwayz, it's cool you're from Ireland and actually read other books before Ulysses, but I'm from a suburb of Kansas City Kansas represeeeeent! and went straight from Bridge to Terebethia to Ulysses. Obvs, I need some help getting this, LOL.I just want to get all the references. They're like hidden PokéMons, and I gotta catch 'em all! Just call me Lit Ketchum.
This is pretty much what the other guy is saying. That is why having someone else's view on the book is nifty. You get something new out of it.
There is an entire chapter about Hamlet in the book, why have you not read it already?
Best episodes for a newbie?
Who, in your opinion, is the most interesting philosopher?By interesting I mean ideas wise, although feel free to give your own definition. Recommending the best text which expresses said ideas would be appreciated.
None of them
For me, it's Rousseau. His Discourse on Inequality is my favorite piece he did, but to be honest all of his work is an insightful read.
Plato/Heidegger/Zizek
rousseauany relevancy in 2015why are people still stuck in 17-19th century reflections ?People like you and the marxist are all chains and balls, preventing us to move forwards. Think with your time and adopt the deluzien definition of philosophy in finding new concepts through new problems
Zizek.
Cioran.
Thoreau, especially when he is describing plants and animals in detail.Pure perception of things without trying to fit them into some theory is the most patrician way to go about philosophy.
adopt the deluzienvomit
theoretical framework*
Alain Badiou is pretty fucking interesting
Laotzu or Christ. Those two are the ones I follow the most.
Vomit at the spelling, his nails, or are you just some kind of Sokalite? Deleuze is god-tier.
St. Thomas
this is just obviously not true
enjoying a plageristimplying Aquinas isn't just Aristotle for chirstians
Alfred Korzybski. Read General semantics Non Aristotelian
OP said interesting, Rousseau's works are interesting. Does interesting equate to relevant to right now? Not necessarily.Besides, Rousseau's philosophy of authenticity and critique of modernity is clearly still relevant to society today.
None of the analytic philosophers are interesting, they all just masturbate over the same boring shit no one outside of their academic circle actually cares about.Sartre is an example of an actually interesting philosopher who's works relate to how people actually feel, not just endless premises and conclusions.
what are 'plagerists' and 'chirstians'?
Speak for yourself, pal.
works relate to how people actually feelSo, in other words, philosophy for plebs?
If philosophy isnt relatable to normal people it loses all it's intuitive appeal and becomes literally worthless.
why can't philosophy be more like chess, black and white?
...are you me?
e4
The word you're seeking for is "relevance".And pick both.
c5
that feel when I'm uglier than this guy
Nc3
Ideas. Husterl. He wrote 'ideas'.
You sunk my destroyer.
Aquinas did reject a fair amount of Aristotle's ideas you know ? eternity of the world and the status of universals to name a few And the fact of the matter is that allot of Aristotle's works are lecture notes which different commentators have interpreted in their own ways. Averroes and Aquinas had VERY different interpretations of Aristotle on Philosophy of Mind. Aquinas never plagiarized Aristotle either, he was one of the ones who demanded direct texts from the Greek world rather than ones from the Arabic world so that they could be sure to know what it was the Aristotle was getting at and do justice to him.For me it would have to be John Duns Scotus, for all his subtle ontological distinctions, his understanding of human and divine freedom, his complete dedication to giving a rational account to all of Christianity  he is one of the few who made a whole treatise to justify the Immaculate Conception and developed tools useful for understanding the trinity, haecceities, the foundation of possible world semantics, the univocity of God  normal terms are not just analogous to the way we talk about God, there can be common measures , contingent causality, ect, ect, the guy really made the whole domain of logical possibility and necessity his own. Don't start on him without either a great translator like Martin Tweedale, or secondary texts to help you understand. His prose is notoriously difficult.After that I would probably give it to Leibniz because he combined the logical rigor of the Scholastics  something severely lacking in early modern Philosophy outside of the universities with the innovative mathematical and scientific concepts of the age. Leibniz is tough because so much of his work was just in personal letters, and often that is were he really shines, but "New Essays on Human Understanding" is his famous beat down on Locke, which is pretty great. Al-Ghazali for third: For being the first to really deny causation since Parmenides, and doing so on much more rigorous and interesting grounds. Pretty much everything worthwhile in Hume starts here and was carried on through other Occasionalists like Malebranche until Hume took out the theological focus but kept the rejection  or at maintained least skepticism on causality. Russell carried on this path and it is still an important strain of thought to this day given were we have come to in Science. "The Incoherence of the Philosophers", or alternatively Averroes' " The Incoherence of the Incoherence" which contains the whole of the former book in it with objections.
Nf6
f4
Merleau-Ponty's views on perception, animism, and interactions with the Other are fairly interesting.
Books that are difficult for you not because of their style but because of how they make you feel Pic related. I'm reading it now and enjoying it but can only read 3 or 4 chapters a day because it manages every time I pick it up to overwhelm me with disgust and sorrow.that fucking passage where his kid starts crying and they take him to the doctor that mall trip I'm not even finished with Part 1 yet
Anything by pic related. I like his work but it gets very intense.
wasting your time with Don DeLilloDon DeLillo is even sub-par to losing your life, shitposting all day on 4chan.
retardWhite Noise is incredible. Every sentence is relevant in some way
bestest book
Who would you recommend instead?
He'd probably reccomend pic related.http://s000.tinyupload.com/index.php?file_id=99073585134447685753
pleb confirmed Read Underworld OP. It's far more positive.
lithub.com/alejandro-jodorowskyWhat I do is not magical realism. I do realistic magic.-JodorowskyWhy do artists vomit snowflakeisms like this. Like when Gregg Allman said "we're not a jam band, we're a band that jams"Can we have a thread for pretentious/stupid things writers and artists have said? Inb4 Corn Father
"No Skrillex, mayo isn't an instrument."- Scott Stapp, Alter Bridge
an artist is a performer, a performer puts style before substance.
"Honesty is the first chapter in the book of wisdom."- Thomas Jefferson, USA
"I feel like part of the vanishing breed that thinks a writer should be read and not heard, let alone seen. I think this is because there seems so often today to be a tendency to put the person in the place of his or her work, to turn the creative artist into a performing one, to find what a writer says about writing somehow more valid, or more real, than the writing itself."William Gaddis
But Jodo is a psychopath wizard suffering from drug induced visions all the time OPHe's entitled to be an asshat snowflake. Plus he's fun.
You can always care [about what others think]. You probably always will care. But don’t let it dictate your choices and what you want and what you want to accomplish and who you want to be. Don’t let anyone get in the way of that. That’s being yourself.- Jenna Marbles, Youtuber
"we're not a jam band, we're a band that jams"That's the pot talking.
Gaddis is based as fuck
God Gaddis is the best. I'm just finishing up The Recognitions and it is honestly one of the best things I've ever read. I also found it hilarious that Pynchon was such a Gaddis fanboy that when he started publishing stuff people thought he was just Gaddis writing under a pseudonym.
When we have fights in our family, they don't end with an apology. You make up by getting back to normal. Like you'll call and say, 'You want to go shopping?'- Kourtney Kadashian
iirc Pynchon supposedly wrote his stuff without reading The Recognitions. I absolutely loved J R, I decided to read White Teeth because it's been sitting here forever and then I'll start on The Recognitions.
what the fuck
I've had to deal with everything but everyone has helped me, including Sir Alex Ferguson, to get through. George Best was a good friend of mine. We loved each other, we both knew where we were coming from.- Paul Gascoigne, Footballer
Why do artists vomit snowflakeisms like this.Perhaps because catchterms like "magical realism" or "post-modernism" or "the voice of our generation" are mostly journalistic memes and independant writers don't like to be lumped under this when they're doing something else.Also perhaps you can't describe everything with internet memes unless you specifically create new memes each time.TL;DR: Learn2think m8
Perhaps because catchterms like "magical realism" or "post-modernism" or "the voice of our generation" are mostly journalistic memes and independant writers don't like to be lumped under this when they're doing something else.This is called "thinking you are a special snowflake".
but what if someone actually isn't as talentless and awful as the lowest common denominatoris it a crime to imply so
The fact that labels and genres exist for a reason and are useful makes them pandering to the LCDThis is what edgy teens who shop at hot topic actually believe
Thinking you're a special snowflakes applies to teenagers who want to think they're different simply because they feel different, despite behaving the same as most other teenagers. It doesn't apply to people who actually work in a field and don't necessarily use the same method as everyone else. If you work on stochastic processes and someone calls you a stastician it's natural that you'd want to object, even if some people in your department are actually doing statistics and the difference is not obvious to most people.Or do you think anything remotely "magical" should put swept under magical realism god forbid we learn to make distinctions ! just like anything out of the ordinary is being called "surrealist" nowadays ? I'm starting to think too much exposure to 4chan has rotten your brain.
What is pompous about this, Gaza and Best were both alcoholics
Again refer to the exact parallel of the Greg Allman quote as you are clearly too heavily invested in defending whatever retarded shit an author says. Does that not seem like superfluous bitching for the sake of it to you?
That's not vomiting snowflakeism, that's snowflakist vomit.
 you are clearly too heavily invested in defending whatever retarded shit an author saysI'm mostly invested into people spewing less shit where I can read it. The "special snowflake" meme is neither funny nor interesting and is way overused here. And shittalking authors for making distinctions is silly. If you can't stomach people being careful around labels or refusing some of them don't post on a literature board. Does that not seem like superfluous bitching for the sake of it to you?See, this is the problem with giving too much credit to internet typology. The Allaman quote in OP is not bitching, it's playful, not-too-serious posturing at worst, it is to be expected when artist depend on public image for their livelihood hint: it wasn't much better before, artist simply depended on powerful protectors. And it's not nearly as serious or annoying as OP make it out to be. The only people bitching here are anons on the internet. Which is fine, but "le you're a special snowflake" and "le you're pretentious for not being a doormat" memes are annoying.TL;DR: I don't like people forcing everything into a meme debate when the general level of intellectual rigor is already appalingly low. Not all author that look the same at first glance need to be called the same, and they're not being edgy simply for pointing this out.
The internet is serious businessThis thread wasn't supposed to be for stupid/funny quotesJodorowky and Allman aren't massive druggiesOkay
100% correct.
Oh for fuck's sake of all pretentious shitbag film-makers you go and spew your inane garbage on poor Alejandro when you haven't even seen his movies, shame on you.
How many books does /lit/ read simultaneously at one time?Do you think switching between reading different books decreases your enjoyment and appreciation of them? I always tend to read two books at a time switching between the two when i feel like it. I also try and make sure that one is fiction and the other non-fiction.
simultaneously at one time
3 - 6, dependin on how I'm feelinI know a kid who sometimes read 20+ at the same time. That must suck ass.
a lotmaybe don't care though since i'm not autistic.
two or more
simultaneously at one timeyou need to read multiple books on grammar, one at a time
1 at a time for me. I've got 2 classes starting on Monday so it's going to increase pretty soon.
+1 for one at a time, otherwise I would have never finished IJ or The Brothers K
always one a time. two tops but that's it.
, 
I have barely been getting back into reading since the beginning of the year, having read only an embarassing eleven books all the way through out of like fifteen attempts with the majority of those being novels. Yet this tiny amount of literature at such a slow pace has already stimulated my brain in a way which is troubling. Even without reading I was an overthinker but noeiI think CONSTANTLY. I can't stop analyzing and reading into things. I was watching Bill Bye the Science Guy earlier and I seriously started thinking "Isn't this the best example of the way science uses the spectacle of religion against religion?" I did it without even trying. What the fuck is going on? I mean I wouldn't have a problem with it if the shit I was thinking about was actually worth something but so much is just psuedo intellectual bullshit like the Bill Nye thing. What do I do? I can't even enjoy shit anymore because I over think it all
Get into woodworking
wow a rare and trips in one postcongratulations, OP
saved
you can't stop it from happening you can only keep it to yourself. Also, a thought is only pseudo intellectual if its half baked, so if you want to avoid shit opinions just think more about it.
Fuck I'm sorry for all the spelling errors I'm posting from my phone and all that Its not even a rare tho
you have to understand no one ever leaves /lit/, so when an importer of rares comes in, even if they're middling tier rares, they're still new to us
your post is so spot-on it's beautiful and has literary value
I know that feeling, you becone highly objective of the content you absorb. As a content creator I find it helpful but you gotta tap into something within you that is naturally biased so you can have a 'genuine' opinion of text instead of just a super analytical opinion which might make u look like an edgy contrarian.
you avoid becoming a pseudointellectual by becoming a genuine intellectual.though in your case, anon, it's probably not worth the attempt.
Read more philosophy
Hi op, I can relate to an eerie extent, having just gotten into reading in the last year or so. from my experience it works like this: read some books that force you to see the world differently, like starting to climb a mountain and having a higher vantage  dissect everything in your life and daily experiences to annoyingly abstract levels  stop caring about thinga that used to motivate you  worry about being naive stoner level philosopher  read more books and and reach the top of the mountain, only to reveal further higher peaks  realize your over analysis has been misguided and now aimless  mildlydepressed.jpg  decend the mountain back to the valley with the clueless plebs  head for the next mountain  repeat
Should I actually start with the Greeks or is that just a /lit/ meme? Also if I should all of the Greek thinkers or just a particular few?And wouldnt reading more philosophy just make it worse?
https://docs.google.com/document/d/1y8_RRaZW5X3xwztjZ4p0XeRplqebYwpmuNNpaN_TkgM/editfollow the guide
I will try to shill this book here"It'th tho thimple," said Millette Snipes, "a thad poem, but thovery very thimple.""The greatest lines in English poetry," replied Darconville, "are al-ways the simplest." He lifted a lectern onto his desk and leaned for-ward on it. "I have something for you — call it, if you will, 'The Prin-ciple of Trim.' The poet, you see, is rather like the seagull who has aperfect process for desalting water, although no one can explain how itworks: he baffles out of a given line, if he's the enchanted metaphor-sician we hope he is, that which otherwise would directly explain it."Darconville wanted to make this clear."The simple line seeks to outwit, not merely resist, the complexity ofthought it noncommittally grows out of and, by definition, filters outthe ideas it must nevertheless, to be great, always raise, do you see?"As he felt the presence of that one girl near him, he listened distrac-tedly to the voice that didn't seem his. Who are you? thought Darcon-ville. Who are you? He tried to concentrate his whole nature in oneterrific effort to summon up, that he might dismiss it for once and all,the formidable magnetic mystery on his right that drew him so relent-lessly off the subject."And therefore the greatest lines always imply the longest essays,discourses, metaphrases which the poet quite happily leaves to the agi-tation of critics, schoolmen, all those academic Morlocks who studythe brain of a line after its face has come off in their hands." Darcon-ville looked around. "Do you want me to repeat that?" cries of "yes,yes"Darconville thought for a moment. "The ring of a mighty bell," heexplained, "implies, logically, a technical if less melodic success in theshift and whirr of its gudgeons, a secondary sound that can be muffledonly in proportion to the genius of the campanologist."Glycera Pentlock, throwing an exasperated glance at her neighbor,Martha Van Ramm, recklessly resumed scribbling away in her note-book. But Ailsa Cragg, chumbling the tip of her pen, gasped andblurted out, "What is a campanologist?""Use," said Darconville, "your definitionary. It's one of the last fewpleasures left in life."Poteet Wilson looked aggravated. Wroberta Carter spun her pencil.And Barbara Celarent whispered a slang word which, though unbe-knownst to her, was once held in common usage by the daughters ofjoy in fifth-century Babylon.
"Language," continued Darconville, "often disguises thought. Thesuccessful poetic line, never discursive, is always thought extensivelyprofound — and surely, upon the examination that is our burden, willbe — but at its very essence it is the furthest thing from it. Beauty onlyimplies truth, as fuit implies est. The poet doesn't say so, however; thefactophile does. Poetry is the more imperfect when the less simple. Thenature of great poetry — a perfect art attempted by imperfect people—prevents the direct concern with truth and can only suggest by singingwhat it secretly shields by showing. The greater the simplicity statedthe greater the complexity implied, you see?" Several girls put up theirhands. "And putting aside for now the implications this has in thehuman personality, in affairs of the heart, know only that the reader isleft to assume whether or not what the poet stated in Beauty he knewas Truth."A yawn was heard, followed by the jingling of some Scandinaviannail-jewelry."Bear with me? God alone is pure act, never in potency, whereasfinite things are metaphysically composed of act and potentiality. But,in poetry. Beauty is act, you might say, Truth the potency involved byinference in that act, and of course there follow many attendant ques-tions that can be raised : will Beauty wane as Truth waxes? Is one thesynonym, or the antonym, of the other? And what of the old idea thatBeauty, meeting Truth, must always corrupt it — the Beauty that turnsTruth, as Hamlet said, into a bawd? What are the implications — theessential question must be asked — of the Ideal?" A heavy inert apathysettled over the class. "We must consider the final lines of anotherfoem of Keats, 'Ode on a Grecian Urn.'"The students, exhaling sighs, actually seemed to decompress. Itdidn't matter. Darconville, perhaps not even aware of it himself, wasbusy sorting out matters in the depths of his own mind." 'Beautyis Truth, Truth Beauty' : I call this Keats's Comfort — heis saying his prayers and, embarrassingly, is overheard. It is a correctepistemological utterance, you might say," continued Darconville,"made aesthetically incorrect at the very moment it is introduced intothe poem. Beauty is Truth, Keats forgot, only if and when the didac-tician is there to say so by whatever means he can. Arguably, Beauty isTruth precisely when it does not say so, just as, turn about, a holyman disproves his holiness as soon as he asserts it. Ironically enough,then, this, the most famous line of Keats, while starkly...
simple-indeed, it is genenlly accepted as theclassic example of such — deniesexactly what a simple line must be valued for, asserting what shouldbe implied, attesting to what it can't. The line expresses what it doesnot embody — or, better, embodies what it has no right to express: a beautiful messenger appears delivering ugly news. It's a paradox inthe same way that —**Darconville paused, turned to the blackboard, and chalked out awide rectangle. He wrote something and backed away for perspective.This boxed sentence is false"The paradox here is clear,** asserted Darconville, is it not? If thesentence is true, then it is false; if false, then it is true." Various eyesroved in troubled scrutiny over the board. "Do you see? A liar saysthat he lies: thus he lies and does not at the same time. The jeu deis fun grammatically," warned Darccm\il]e with a smile, "buthow vulnerable would be your philosophical calm if thistransmitted into the behavior of a human being? Careful," said Daiconville,"with your boyfriends."The girls tittered.It was an academic matter, of course, and yet, incredibly, Darooo-vile found himself thus preoccupied, searching to apprehend a figurein the distance, an interval so wide, for a thousand reasons, it dulledthe edge of consequence but a distance nevertheless that also warned,by its very remoteness, that no real exchange of feelings was possible, amorbid underbreath, as if aloofness itself, whispering, told him todesist from that which he must be inevitably excluded. And yet howoften, even from childhood, had this been the case in his fife! And sohe listened to what he thought, serving to clarify a matter at the heartof things and verify a falsehood. It formulated his final remarks."The artist," concluded Darconville, going to the window and star-ing out at a group of hardy catalpas 'When a logical paradox to him--self becomes, I suppose, the most unpoetical of men.* A cardinal wentsnip-snip-snip in the trees. "I don't know, perhaps Keats had one glassof claret too many, loitered palely, and was overcome with the neces-sity of writing a Line that could acknowledge two simultaneous but incompatibleforces within him: poet and priest. He becomes a pomologist" - Aibba Gragg looked frostilyat Darooavffle and sucked a
tooth — "trying to get fruit back to its paradisaical best. 'Beauty isTruth, Truth Beauty*? It's a concio ad clerum: a sermon to the clergy,wherein the poet is attempting to cheer himself up — in a fit of un-steadfastness, say? — and is at the same time begging us to accept notonly what we should but also that which, poor poet, he more thansufficiently allowed us without special pleading. The poet's own voicehas interrupted him. He is awakened by his own snore. The line,which I disgressed to explain, is only a false bottom, collapsing an oth-erwise beautiful poem — and one which provides, perhaps, the best sin-gle commentary we have on the sonnet, 'Bright Star.'" Darconvillewas finished. "Are there any questions?"There was silence."We're clearer then," asked Darconville, "on the meaning of thepoem?""It hath to do with the thufferingth and thorrowth of life."Everybody groaned."I believe that young boy," came a sudden voluptuous drawl fromnear the back of the room, a low magical level of loveliness which ab-sorbed with a kind of absoluteness any rival utterance that might havebeen offered against it, "was just sayin' the most obvious thing in thewhole wide world."It was the kind of female voice that Juvenal somewhere naughtilydescribes as having fingers."He was talkin'" — she touched her tongue to her upper lip—"about love."Most of the girls, in icy silence, stared straight ahead."I'm sorry," said Darconville who, although not taken in — he'dseen her back there at the beginning of class and almost with amuse-ment had been waiting for her to speak — nevertheless feigned surprise,"but I can't seem to find you here in my roll-book. You are a senior,aren't you. Miss Poore?"It was too much. Every head in the entire class — excepting one stu-dent's, whose head was lowered — abruptly shifted from the teacher toher, the only student's name he had known! And there she sat,confident and cool, wearing a nubby placket-front shirt trimmed inbeige to match a black velvet dirndl.Then, very slowly, Hypsipyle Poore lifted off her sunglasses and,with one lingering provocative glance, revealed eyes as limpid as thepools in Heshbon by the gate of Bathrabbim — and everyone there
could have sworn she winked as with a cryptic smile she breathedsoftly, "Well, should I see you after class?""Love has been mentioned," said Darconville, who saw he had aminute or two. "And suffering, as well. The history of romantic disap-pointment, I don't doubt, often does nothing more than document theschism between Beauty and Truth or, better, proves that Beauty, whenit becomes an end in itself, often yields no Truth. The simple line, insuch cases, had no complexity within it — there can, of course, never betoo much. A knowledge of many things is possible, it's been said, butone can never know everything about one thing, though, sadly, oneperhaps tries. The relationship with a boy or girl you spontaneouslytook for perfection-in-beauty but didn't sequentially know by ex-amination-in-truth can result in disaster. The implications of theIdeal? Who can really know? It is the chance one takes when one fallsin love — the discussion of which," smiled Darconville, "is perhaps be-yond the province of the classroom here, agreed?"The girls laughed — and prepared to leave. But Darconville, alert tothe chance, quickly took up his class roll and began to call attendance."Muriel Ambler""Here""Melody Blume""Here"The students, by turn, acknowledged their names. But for the sus-pense it might have been interminable, the list seemed so long. Here.Here. Here. But which was hers? Was it there?"Sheila Mangelwurzel""Here""Christie McCarkle"A carrot-top put up her hand."Glycera Pentlock""Over here""Isabel Rawsthome"A thunderclap! — then a flashing light across his book. Dazed, al-most unconsciously, Darconville called out the remaining non-names,reflecting on this alone : only love makes the pain of lifting a shy heada grace. It equally unlocks a silent throat with the knowledge in theplaintive soul of what must be done, and so was, in the tender-takenbreath he suddenly heard, soft as a swoon, say: "Present."And sculptured Aphrodite, in loose-flowing alb, stepping slow andfragile under the loops of dripping ring willows, puts a finger to herlips, shakes out tearshaped petzils from her flasket, and then holds highher holy lights which silver and bewitch the common wood where two,long asleep, sweetly wake under the baldric of a new heaven to blushat the silence, pause, and faintly hear a goddess whisper in a voicelower than leaf-fall: ''Tomorrow shall be love for the loveless, and forthe lover tomorrow shall be love."In short, Isabel Rawsthome looked up and smiled.
That's it. I hope errors I missed to fix by quickly pasting the passage here will not be too much trouble.
what you feelin about it?
bump
, 
What are some books that have the same kind of atmosphere or feel as the chronicles of the black sword?
Michael More CockKek
I guess you could say after reading this series I want.. Moor cock.
Is /lit/ the most depressed board? Does this mean it's the most intelligent?
what
no
what is /r9k/
is /lit/ the most depressed boardKek, no. See 
Is lit the most depressed boardMaybeIs this the smartestno. /sci/ is probably the smartest board.
the most introspective and the least distracted by entertainment. theoretically anyways.it's not that you must be depressed, you should find the world depressing. you shouldn't care about happiness, you only need to be happy enough to get through the next day and do your work reading, writing, or a hopefully productive 9-5 job.most young people seem to be able to see the writing on the wall, ever since i was 12 it was cool to hate everything.
taste is more important than intelligenceart of selection mes amigos
nah, that's just a pointless bourgeois distinction
what's the best meme jazz album black saint love supreme or kind of blue
Well, Kind of Blue is one of the best records ever made in any musical style.
awesome taste dude
ayyy just bought kind of blue on vinyl today. The James Joyce of Jazz.
Out of all of these I prefer Black SaintI guess that makes me a pleb
sweet thumbs up
i'm starting to like a love supreme the most but i'm with you for the time beingthey're all cool tbhwhat do you guys think about BOSSA NOVA
Black saint is my favorite of those three, love supreme is probably top memeI love sketches of spain from miles
sketches of spainawe-inspiring taste
I used to be really depressed, but now I'm desensitized to it and just trudge onwards in life hoping I'm heading in the general direction of happiness.
are you depressed OP i have some cures for that you know
Thx bbI like my jazz the way I like my ennui: baroque
I smoke too much weed to be depressed and believing one's own intelligence to be superior in some way to an imaginary median intelligence is a sure fire way to never learn anything. /lit/ is a collection of people though and I'm sure some of them may actually be intelligent and depressed.
define intelligence
intelligenthalf this board thinks evolution is a spook
Who has patrician taste here?
no and nofirst one would probably go to r9k, second one is correlation not causation
not you ;^
/mu/
Far from it. Maybe old /lit/, but this place is trashed now.
Why not Bitches Brew?
You can thank /pol/ and /r9k/ for that.
I'd say /sci/ is the most intelligent when it comes to "book smarts." /lit/ is a close second, however.
And /mu/. The amount of people that flooded in here because this board seemed smarter is hugely responsible.
Is depression a worthwhile experience? I didn't enjoy it but I feel that I learned a great deal from it
what'd you learn
experiencenigga I've had it for over 4 years now and it feels more like an ailment wtf you know boy
That the whole muh chemical disorderis bullshit. And depression is simply laziness in denial.
not everyone can be superior ubermensches like us man
depression is nothing but a state of mind. A realistic one. They give you pills because you're not supposed to be realistic.
Have you ever seen a 'depressed' teen who wasn't just a lazy slob?
most young people seem to be able to see the writing on the wall, ever since i was 12 it was cool to hate everything.I only dropped religion at 22. It's not so much history but attitude imo.
but what if you're active and still depressed
I can empathise with those who have it more, I know what it is to be truly happy, I know what it is to be truly unhappy, I understand what it is to be completely devoid of emotion and I feel I know myself better for it.it feels more like an ailmentLike I said, I didn't enjoy it but that does not mean I did not learn from it.I'm assuming you are some fat arrogant american who dismisses anything outside of his/her own limited experiences as a nonsense
This. This whole chan is fucked with that spook. Where are we supposed to go to get away from them?
Intelligence alone is subpar to experience + knowledge.Have you seen those "bright" kids that do so well in school but can't think about anything but pleasing their bosses?
I'm struggling to see a major difference here.
Depressed is an overused term for unconventional unhappiness. If you're active and 'depressed' then it's because you are simply not happy with what you're active towards. Being happy is not hard regardless of what lazy people say.muh chemical disorder im not lazy
/pol/ is the second most depressedthey all secretly want to die in nuclear fire
I get depressed usually in October of every year until like February and then I'm straight. It's weird.
I don't actually understand how the brain works so I'll just fall back on what my pappy taught me on the farmway2go yokel
are emotions even real
are you real
Depressed is a term to justify laziness. Anyone who is a NEET welfare foodstamp leech can just say "but i'm depressed', and society turns towards sympathy, instead of kicking them in the ass and making them work.
My Twisted World will become one of the most important books of the 21st century. Prove me wrong /lit/,
Stop calling me lazyShow me sympathymuh chemical disorder are our eyes even real?
as real as an eel and a bad banana with a greasy black peel
samefag
...your point?
maybe if I repeat myself I won't look like a dumbass Billy bob joe used to slinging pig shit around now understands neurology, well I'll be dammed
I don't understand how a conversation works
I get the joke. Ba Dum Tsk!
lol
You're whole argument is that depression is just laziness masquerading as something it isn't, You obviously don't know what depression is, understand how it or your brain works and obviously have no interest on educating yourself about it so what is the point of even conversing with you?
Does this mean it's the most intelligent?/lit/ is full of Christfags and commies.
you're being kind of mean to him calm down
A time will come when you realise THE MOST INTELLIGENT doesn't actually imply MUCH INTELLIGENCE.
There seems to be a fear of acting outside the lines, it goes to a point where intelligence becomes a restraint instead of a tool. Without a doubt this bookish-like behavior has existed for quite some time but do you think our new "Information Age" has been a significant contributor?
what if there are different types of depression
He's probably go a muh chemical disorder lazy
I see a lot of pretty bummed out people in the literary life threadsdays spent in coffee shops or libraries reading and just scraping by with some cynicism ? in their writing posts?

If depression is just laziness then explain David Foster Wallace.
idk but i'm drunk enough to say that i'm definitely one of the smartest people on 4chan and /lit/ is my homeboardi think that's just because i'm too bad at computers for /g/, too good at math for /sci/, and too allergic to stupidly specific subgenres for /mu/ thoughi'm also depressed a lot but i think that has more to do with dysfunctional family and chemical imbalancesmy roommates like the 8th smartest person i know and he's fucking happy all the time
Suicide is clearly the most sincere act you can carry out
Fatness.
if depression is just lazinessNo one here actually thinks that. It's an epic troll. However, the lethargy that comes with depression is indistinguishable from laziness. Depression can cause laziness, and laziness can lead to depression, but the two aren't the same.
what if the only emotion is fear and it's being played on in multiple ways by something that is not an emotion
http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Seasonal_affective_disorder
Stay gold, Ponyboy.
Autism or a literary life and degree and career forced upon him by his english educated parents.
What plays on emotions if there is only one and it can't influence itself?
nothingness
Brah that's like there's an innate ennui and I don't like that idea. Say something nicer.
fuck you
mes amigos
genuine knowledge, I've always considered intelligence to be more of a measure of curiosity and willingness to learn from all things and see outside oneself. I'm not really an authority on anything though.
curiosity and willingness to learn from all things and see outside oneselfGreater intelligence gives you a greater opportunity to collect knowledge for the sake of curiosity and willingness.
this
 Is /lit/ the most depressed board?no, /r9k/ wins by far in that regardI believe /soc/ too the most intelligent?I honestly think this is the "most intelligent" board of the ones that I know/frequent. People here have overrall better insights and more "quality discussion" less opinionated than many boards, for example, as in actually trying to discuss something instead of just trying to win an argument.ofc it also has the dankest memes
/sci/ is just full of autistsI don't see how that stops them being smart. /lit/ is the most pretentious board, that's for sure
just means it's the most wanky
A fair point which is worth exploring, intelligence is a such an beautiful and elusive thing to me. I think it comes and goes at times really.
oh shut up, you fucking idiot. "I just read Crime and Punishment and I write some shitty poetry, I know the truth of the world and it's not pretty" - /lit/. Fuck off. Bukowski and Hemmmmmingway are hacks for perpetuating this bullshit.
The most intelligent boards are /ck/, /ic/ and /diy/.
/a/ or /ic/ is the most intelligent/fit/ or /fa the least intelligent/r9k/ the most depressed/pol/ and /soc/ the most depressing/s4s/ the least depressed
word
/a/the most intelligent/fit/the least intelligentBullied dork detected, /fit/ is far more intelligent than most boards. You must think that strong=dumb brute.
If you invest so much time in your appearance, you are an idiot. I wouldn't call someone who's passionate about any real sport an idiot, but bodybuilding is just mindless narcism./a/ may not be the most intelligent, but the top 10% of /a/ tops the top 10% of any other board.
Is /lit/ the most depressed board?No that is /r9k/Does this mean it's the most intelligent?/lit/ is farely retarded
bodybuilding is just mindless narcismFatty detected, people who bodybuild for appearance almost always fail, most of /fit/ actively make fun of people who lift for girls and things like that. but the top 10% of /a/ tops the top 10% of any other boardThis is retarded, /a/ is above the average 4chan intelligence but nowhere near boards like /ic/ or /ck/.
I'm slim. Do you really think they don't lift to get their dicks wet? Do they train to fight boars, or what? Of course they don't admit that they lift for girls, course it's despicable.I listed /ic/, but the problem with boards like /ic/ /diy/ and /ck/ is that it doesn't mean you are intelligent just because you have one special /hobby/talent. The discussions on some of the manga threads on /a/ are really in-depth.
Do you really think they don't lift to get their dicks wet?Again, no I don't. They might do it to build confidence, see how strong they can get, lift with friends or just because they enjoy the act.Of course a few of them might lift for girls, but for the most part everyone has their own reasons and girls are more of a side reason.I listed /ic/, but the problem with boards like /ic/ /diy/ and /ck/ is that it doesn't mean you are intelligent just because you have one special /hobby/talent.The discussions on some of the manga threads on /a/ are really in-depth.They discuss theory just as much as practice. It isn't just 'hey look at what I can do'. /ic/ are always discussing art/researching/practicing for example.I like manga too, but lets face facts. Compared to hobbies like building or artwork, manga doesn't require much and doesn't have much depth
I dunno man some of the earlier arcs in Berserk are pretty cool.
Okay, I agree on /ic/, but I still think /fit/ and /fa/ are for idiot. Though I never visit /fit/ and /fa/ so you might be right.
Though I never visit /fit/ and /fa/ so you might be right.If you had told me this from the start I would had both known to ignore you invalid opinion and known you were from /a/.
/dicky/?
I'd say all of the hobby boards other than /v/ and its relatives can be considered moderately intelligent in all things and very well versed in their specific fields. I'd say of the boards I've visited the ones focused on traditional art /lit/ /ic/ etc tend to have well thought out opinions and be more focused on discussion than name calling. /sci/ has a lot of very intelligent people as well but they seem to only know their one field. /mu/ is pretty intelligent at times but their collective depression and self hate spawns quite a bit of juvenile discussion and 'dank memes'. /fa/ is rather average in its smarts while I'd say /a/'s self-moderation helps keep its quality rather high, especially for such an idiot infested passion. /tv/ is retarded. /fit/ is medium tier /sp/ is god awful and all of the porn as well as /r9k/, /sp/ and /pol/ are just hilariously badI don't know too much about the other, less frequented boards.
i always had this feeling that /a/ is one of the most intelligent boards, it's weird, they seem stupid most of time
Okay, I thought being on /fit/ and /fa/ is interchangeable with "people who are interested in bodybuilding and fashion".
not that much money in STEM academia as people think, still a lot of money going into social research etc.
Basically this, my sister is doing Gender Studies right now and expects to walk away with 100k a year at minimum.
Gender StudiesWhat a joke.
/lit/ is depressed because /lit/ reads /lit/ and takes it seriouslybeing the most intelligent board on 4chan is a bit like being the biggest turd floating in the tankhowever, /po/ comes up with some amazing stuff sometimes
No 4chan board is intelligent so it doesn't matter.There may be intelligent people that browse this place, but because of the culture they just ask retarded anyway, so it doesn't matter.
Ikr sociology masters look at around 100k aswell
i had it for 8 years, but i'm hoping the past 3 aren't just a phaseit's still exp in the end
No shit lmao
s-s-stupid STEM fagsliberal arts m-masterrace reporting in....
2015not becoming an english teacherLiterally stupid
being a male teacherGood luck finding a job
Hemmmmmingway? How is he perpetuating it?
I already got one anon.Good luck with the retail ;^ 300k starting r-r-r-right guys ?
http://www.forbes.com/2010/08/11/college-degrees-best-salaries-leadership-careers-jobs.htmlI'd be pretty depressed if I was starting on 35 k a year...
"Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know."Cynical, tfwnogf virgins on /lit/ have a poster of this quote above their bed. Whenever they're feeling particularly blue, the just tell themselves it's because they're too intelligent, and all those people out enjoying life and having fun? Well, they're stupid.
retailimplyingNot to mention a retail manage probably makes more than any public school teacher
To be fair, simpler minds are entertained by simpler means. I'd say a good portion of the happiest people I know are of average intelligence. Or in love. Love is more or less a form of madness though
I said masters, that was from 2010 and america. Btw im refering to research positions.
You totally miss the point
/r9k/ is the most depressed board/soc/ follows, but they try to overcome their depression with rate threads/lit/ comes next, we accept depression and let it flor through us
"Happiness in intelligent people is the rarest thing I know."Hemingway said p-q and people believe q-p because that helps them to deal with their sadness and stupidity.
Love SupremeKind of BlueBlack Saintin that order. Black Saint isn't even the best Mingus album.
Jesus christ dude, how could you even seriously think that? The assumption that anyone who cares for their appearance is an idiot especially considering how important appearance is in order to make it in life is such a clear sign of insecurity it's almost sad.
/r9k/ is traditionally the most depressed but all the complete wrecks have moved on to wizchan and the like over the years, /soc/ is just the insecurities collective. /mu/ actually seems more depressed than people give them credit for, just look at half of the most popular albums there it's all stuff like Deathconsciousness or Untrue or even Hospice and Pinkerton.
considering how important appearance is in order to make it in lifeimplying this isn't a bad thingI admit that I am ugly, but I'm not insecure. I also don't talk about things like dating, where appearance is of course important. I'm talking about people who get their sole self-worth from their appearance.
/tv/idk m8, I find the board pretty funny/witty. Same with /pol/. Yeah, you have a shitload of retards there as well, but they mostly stay in retarded threads. You'll find quality threads/posts where people know plenty within the fields of history/science/philosophy/political ideologies where they know how to properly formulate their opinions.
Ornette Coleman's Free Jazz is better than all three
Music is almost an entirely emotional experience so it makes sense that those with both strong sadness and intense apathy would gravitate towards it. The former because they can relate to it so well and revel in their feelings and the latter because it's often the closest they can come to really feeling something. Also it helps people realize that they're not alone in their feelings and that is a huge boon. source:I was depressed for several years and my only real solace that wasn't just escapism was music. Despite being significantly better, I still feel most at home listening and playing
Time 2 Share /lit/Share anything guys upload EPUB, Mobi, Kindle etc.Post your MEGA/Mediafire/Zippyshare/Filefactory/4shared/2shared/rapidfiles/rapidgator/etc links and your Google Drive/Dropbox/ folders Any links such as .PDF or planetebooks will be disregardedI'm going to start by requesting "The Book of Disquiet" by Fernando PessoaWhat I have to offer: Crime & Punishment in mobihttp://www.4shared.com/file/dymeZ4ucce/Crime_and_Punishment-_Fyodor_D.htm
Nice meme
This is a meme you diphttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=p5GjY-_8jR0
OP HERE , IT"S TIME TO SHARE BITCHES
share threads on /lit/ are a bad idea and shitlook in any of the sites in the sticky op. I found it in bookfi for sure.
Last time we got good links and lots of undiscovered book titles so keep your fucking mouth shut you pessimistic cuck
Book of Disquiet .mobihttps://mega.nz/#!Exs1hZ5C!QTu8r7ozydhX_HX_xnfWuHV-6Ag3K0l9vQlcP1O4e7EMy request: Does any one have any more translated stuff from Fernando Pessoa? I saw someone do a dump of some clippings a while back but lost the pastebin link.
Only 5 posts down, and I find a book in a readable format I've been looking for for a while. And you still ask if there's any point to them.
 I meant this one in the above post.
illegal activityjust pay for the books you cheap poor faggot
readable formatNot him but I am about to illuminate your world with one mere word: calibre.
Can anyone help out? vvvvvvvvvvvvv
Yeah, good luck converting PDFs into anything readable. If it's a PDF, 99% chance it's not going to be converted without annoying errors and random line breaks and such all over the book. Blank pages, random symbols, page numbers in the middle of the page. Fucking PDF!
What does /lit/ think of Brett Easton Ellis?
postmodernism is masturbatory garbage
Made banality trendy. Pass.
i enjoyed lunar parkhe's entertaining on twitterhis podcast is decentnot a great writer
He's more of an artist than people give him credit for. And he's a top tier troll.
he's great
Seconding these, his Twitter is pretty funny. podcastgot an episode you thought was particularly interesting?
BRETT

this image is repulsive
I read Less than Zero when I was 16 and coke addled. It made me reevaluate my life. Then I went to the mall. I had a cheeseburger in the food court. I went to a party that night. I think somebody got stabbed there.
The show was even worse.

this tbh
Bret Easton Ellis is setting the bar impossibly high with the debut episode of this new podcast, "The Bret Easton Ellis Podcast". Podcasts: post-Empire, apparently. His guest is none other than Kanye West, who joined him to chat about movies, binge-watching Breaking Bad with Kim Kardashian, defying age, and a lot more.
EllisPostmodernGet the fuck out.
He's an edgy asshole who thinks that he's so cool because DUDE I SAY OFFENSIVE THINGS ON TWITTER THAT EVERYBODY WANTS TO SAY BUT IS TOO SCARED TO BECAUSE IM COOL AND DONT CARE LOL MAN
Rules of Attraction  Lunar Park  WHO GIVES A SHIT
Gtfo First couple of seasons of kath and kim are goat
I only read American Psycho, but after the appeal of the absurd edginess wore off it did not take more than a few chapters for it to do so I found it difficult to continue. I do not see myself reading another one of his works; I didn't feel myself benefiting at all except for the opportunity to masturbate to the scene of him walking around with a decapitated head hanging off of his erect cock
fuck this guy* arms pitchfork *
Is that the guy who wrote Less Than Zero? I love that book
Now Norm Macdonald, that's a guy with a gem of a twitter
then you have less than zero taste, buddy
I feel the power of the cringe overtaking me.IT IS A GOOD PAIN.
tfw accomplished authors shitpost worse than anyone on /lit/
#rektSt BEE confirmed for new DFW
one-hit wonder hack thinks he can talk shit about DFW
Kath and Kimever goodNext you'll be trying to convince me that Fat Pizza is good.Face it, The Castle is the only time an Australian comedy in a low-socioeconomic setting has actually worked, and nobody has managed to do anything but ride its tattered coattails through mud and shit ever since.
His characters and settings change, but the themes are comically identical.
The sad thing is BEE is on par with DFW.
He points this out in the first chapter of Lunar Park.
Just a gem of a guy, really.
F-Fools.*tips*
admitting that he has no rangeIs that like the literary version of Angus Young admitting that AC/DC just rehashed the same album over and over?
Kind of. It also solidifies Lunar Park as GOAT
Oh, well in that case he must be a genius
No wonder he's so shit if that's how he responds to criticism.
S.E. Hinton for college kids
2d season - Bruce Wagner episode was great1st season - Rob Zombie and Ti West epsodes
www.ideologylit.comLESS THAN A WEEK BEFORE SUBMISSIONS CLOSE EDITIONWhat is this?A brand new literary journal. We are still narrowing down our voice and style, but that's where you can help. We are currently accepting unpublished prose and poetry for Issue #000 Genesis until May 31st.Issue #000?This is a kind of a trial issue. Originally, #000 was going to have published works from established authors, just to demonstrate what an issue would look like. We decided to let #000 be open for submissions so we could include some original writing.Starting with #001, we will have much more regular submission and publishing schedules as well as containing only unpublished works.How can I submit?There are two ways to submit. You can e-mail us at submissions@ideologylit.com or you can use the anonymous submissions form on our website.We will respond to all submissions.What's accepted?All unpublished poetry and prose. Every issue also has a sort of "competition," centered around the theme. The best submissions that feature this theme will headline each issue. The theme for Issue #000 is "GENESIS." You can read more about the guidelines on our website.Is this the first literary journal from /lit/?No. There's been others in the past, perhaps most notably TAR: The April Reader.I'm not interested / stop spamming / this isn't /lit/-relatedWe're sorry to hear that. All threads on /lit/ will be called "IDEOLOGY: A literary journal" and will be started under this tripcode, so please add that to your spam filter and you won't see us anymore.
tfw 500 word essay due in the next week;_;why do the writing gods conspire against me
Did you check your spam folder like that one guy in the other thread told you to?
how long do you usually take to respond?
Yes, we will be checking our spam folders. I don't believe anything has been classified as spam yet.We'll be responding in the first half of June. We won't be responding until submissions are closed.
What happened to TAR? Was anyone in on that?
So how many submissions out of what you got so far are you actually going to be using?
It fell apart due to inner turmoil between the editors.Those who cared about quality but heads with those mostly Prole who thought TAR should be all-inclusive and publish most of the shit that was submitted.
closing submissionsYou have no idea how to run a magazine, OP.
I'm a v good layout designer for both web and print if you need any help w that
Shoot us an email at about@ideologylit.com!
tfw want to submit but scared of rejection
Rejection sucks but it's not that bad so long as you're not waiting a long time for it. Their last day for submissions is what? Tomorrow? You won't be waiting more than a week or two since they're closing them up pretty soon.
This is gonna be such trash haha
I think its a cool idea even if the content isn't exactly the greatest.
good idea, but it's only in english, so a lot of /lit/ users, that know, like me, english just a few, can't participate, unfortunately.
this is an english language site, what do you expect?
I'm thinking about submitting a poem, but I'm worried it would be too short. It's only 10 lines, is that alright?
Nothing. It's logical it's in english, but nonetheless, there is no /lit/ board or equivalent in many language.
how is ten lines too short for a poem?
Must the submission be in english?
While we are not opposed to foreign languages in a work, the submission must be comprehensible to at least some extent in English.
Looks like shit tbh
Get a Duotrope listing.
Why not a "foreign language" part in the journal, in other languages ? It can be a good idea, no? with translation, for example
Seconding this Something like one or two foreign language pieces per issue would really diversify it
I'm not them, but I imagine the issue there would be having enough editors who can actually read through foreign language subscriptions to properly evaluate them.If this is run by primarily English speaking people, how do you expect them all to automatically be fluent in every possible language or even more than one or two?
Just translate it yourself. Why are people outside of the anglosphere so entitled?
Because you touch your wee wee at night.
The idea I had of it was that the writer indeed translates it himself and submits both the original and the translation, and if it's accepted both versions will be included
What would the point of that be? They still most likely wouldn't be able to evaluate the non-English version and if you know English well enough to translate it why not just write an English submission to begin with?I'm sure there must be some literary journals out there that handle foreign language submissions but this seems like a really tiny operation that's just starting out so you're expecting way too much from them.
what happens when you don't receive a reply?i submitted a poem via your submission applet on the website. shouldn't you send out some arbitrary message saying it was received?this wait is so stressful tbh i'm almost wishing i didn't even bother with it.
They said they wouldn't reply until after submissions closed. Also supposedly they were going to implement an automated submission received thing, but I don't know if they actually did yet or not.
I'll bite. Story on the theme of Genesis, submitted.
I guess you're rightAs a reader, I would've enjoyed seeing something other than just english though
whew, that's great news. i can calm down finally. i've been reading through my old tar pdfs, so this should be fun to make it into the first issue
if you know English well enough to translate it why not just write an English submission to begin with?Could be worthwhile for readers with an interest in translation or just languages, even if they don't speak the other very well. Still, it's a bit too out-there for them to include specific rules regarding this.
We love translations, including English translations of hitherto untranslated works by other authors.Unfortunately, we remain an English literary journal. If you decide to translate your own foreign language work into English, we will consider it, but we will only publish the English translation. We would be happy to note that it is a translation and indicate/link to the original somewhere else though.Please relax! If you used the forms on our site, we definitely received your submission. If you e-mailed us, so long as you spelled the address correctly about@idelogylit.com or submissions@ideologylit.com, we will have received your message.shouldn't you send out some arbitrary message saying it was received?they were going to implement an automated submission received thing, but I don't know if they actually did yet or notWe will be implementing this for about, submissions, and subscription emails once submissions close for #000. It's a good/standard function that we missed in hindsight.
Fuckin chill, bruh.
start book, read ~200 pages in a daygo to bed thinking "I can't wait to wake up and read that dang book"never touch book againAnyone else do this?
every time i start a book, that's how it ends, 50, 25, maybe even 74 pages in on a good day
Nopestart, book only read 2 chapters in a daygo to bed thinking "tomorrow I'm going to read 100 pages"read 2 chapters again
damn I miss spaced ;_;
tfw summertfw time to read voraciouslytfw start w/ History of Western Philosophytfw 1000 pagestfw summer over
I know some of you say that you must read all of this and that it is goodand there are some of you who will say that you need not read it for it is badBut can we have a compromise?What are the ESSENTIAL parts of the Bible that one must read to have a grasp of its importance in Western culture/literature?
Genesis, Exodus, psalms, Job, Daniel, Mark, Luke, Acts, Revelations.
But can we have a compromise?No just read all of it you sodomite.
TFW no Ecclesiastesseriously, WTF? it's the most /lit/ book in the Bible.
No one who has read the whole Bible can not mention Isaiah.
most of the bible is essential. I would say leviticus and numbers aren't but everything else is.
God wants us to read all of it.
All of it, faggot.
It really depends. If you want know more about the diaspora, you read Daniel, Deuteronomy, If you want to know about Christian Ethics, all you have to read is the Sermon on the mount, Mathew 4-"something"In short, Reading the entire thing is somewhat ridiculous and a waste of time.If you are interested in Jewish history, the old testament accounts with Babylon, Egypt, Assyrians, Sumerians, etc, etc.In all honesty, the best way to read the bible, is to read a few chapters in a history text book, and then apply the Jewish Biblical literature to it. This is also good for the Pseudepigrapha when you get to the end of the Old Testament, because it will explain how the schism was about to accrue.
In short, Reading the entire thing is somewhat ridiculous and a waste of time.#justplebthings
Shut up Jew.
but you're the Jew
are you a dilettante or did you go to community college?
If you REALLY think its worth the time, you are probably no doubt engaging in proselytization
Just read a children's bible. They have all the interesting and important stories with none of the detailed instructions on how to sacrifice a goat.
The Pathos of the Pre-Law Era...Then the Law under Moses,And the Advent of The Christ.Here are some slightly modernised Medieval precepts which emphasised a more pragmatic approach to Genesis.
Or i just enjoy reading and like to read good literature that has been affirmed as good by billions of people for over a thousand years. Why do you plebs hate reading the bible so much? are you worried you will find something that makes you realize God is real?
Or i just enjoy reading and like to read good literature that has been affirmed as good by billions of people for over a thousand yearsThe popularity is as a religious text, not literature.Why do you plebs hate reading the bible so much? are you worried you will find something that makes you realize God is real?Because a chunk of it is boring Jewish history.
Yeah but it has none of the cool stuff.31 And the firstborn said unto the younger, Our father is old, and there is not a man in the earth to come in unto us after the manner of all the earth:32 Come, let us make our father drink wine, and we will lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father.33 And they made their father drink wine that night: and the firstborn went in, and lay with her father; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose.34 And it came to pass on the morrow, that the firstborn said unto the younger, Behold, I lay yesternight with my father: let us make him drink wine this night also; and go thou in, and lie with him, that we may preserve seed of our father.35 And they made their father drink wine that night also: and the younger arose, and lay with him; and he perceived not when she lay down, nor when she arose.36 Thus were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father.lol
I have a Masters degree in Religious Studies, If I "found" God, it didn't come from my 5th time reading the bible, sorry. Not to mention, when you use comparative analysis, you start to find syncretism across different religions Judaism and Christianity included. That is probably the hardest pill for theologians to swallow, the fact that their stories already existed in different cultures. For example Zoroastrianism predates Judaism, and their myths are nearly identical to what we find in the old-testament.
The popularity is as a religious text, not literature.If it didn't tell high quality engaging stories it wouldn't have resonated with so many people. And also Dante, Shakespeare, Milton, and Melville among others wold disagree with you as they treated the bible as part of their literary tradition.and If you hate reading about history and you think the bible is boring I have to wonder about your reading level and comprehension, no offense, you seem like a nice person, but it has some of the most entertaining tales in literatureJesusDavidsolomonMosesIsaiah If you don't like it I guess that's your opinion but I feel bad for you. I think you're missing out on something that has brought me and a lot of other people a lot of joy.
no Ecclesiastesno Isaiahnone of the epistles Come on son.
This must be the virgin Mary's story too lol.
That hasn't been an issue for theologians for a while now due to the rationalization that the stories in the Bible were originally oral, and Genesis itself implies this at multiple points. I doubt you have the degree you say you have, but even if you do that doesn't make you an expert. I've heard many notable individuals in the field of religious studies say something about a religion that was blatantly incorrect.
rationalization This is what theologians do lol. There isn't any actual unbiased analysis. Look for the fault or correction and ye shall see.
Well thank you for admitting you are a theologian. I appreciate that, because it allows everyone in this thread to know your perspective, your ethos and this clears my suspicion of your obvious attempt to take control of this thread through proselytization.I am not a theologian. If OP is a theologian, he should indeed read the entire bible while adopting a theological ethos/perspective on the material. However, if OP is not a theologian, and indeed wants a secular interpretation of biblical literature and historical events, my recommendation is more than adequate.
If you actually have a masters degree then I would suppose you read the bible numerous times and enjoyed it. I was speaking about the people who have never read the bible and reject a pathos they don't fully understand. I have incorporated into my personal faith Joseph Campbell's mono-myth so the cultural appropriation doesn't really interfere with my own faith. I could elaborate on this if you were curious.
Anybody is capable of being biased, not just theologians. The fact that Genesis indicates that the stories it is telling were known about in the culture reveals that the author of Genesis understood that he was not creating stories but rather concretely revealing a people's own history to themselves.Also, if the Bible is true and said events actually happened, then it actually makes more logical sense for said stories to spread throughout other cultures and peoples. Hilariously, if these stories were found only in the Bible, that would a strong indication that the Bible ISN'T true.
Whether or not am I a theologian shouldn't matter, and you didn't include any refutation of my point at all in your post. You just went on and on about how I'm a theologian as if that somehow proved your point.
The Logos of the Law Under the Prophet Moses.
Joseph Campbell has been deconstructed more times than I can count. He is, to use in the field, an "old scholar" much like Mircea Eliade. We still use Campbell, but mostly the same way people use Freud. They are an example of where the field started off, and where it is now. In other words, we use Campbell in our theories and methods courses for undergrads so they can see how other scholars have deconstructed their work. But if you find comfort in Campbell's work, okay. I'm just letting you know its not very relevant to where the field is now.
Did you actually read my post. I found a middle ground for us, but you just like to argue, so it seems.
This, but maybe add in both books of Samuel, the later portions of Isaiah concerning the "suffering servant", Jonah, John, and First Corinthians, Romans and James.
Read- Genesis, first half of Job, first half of Daniel, first half of Jonah, one of the Gospels pick any, it doesn't matter, though I prefer Luke, Romans the rest of the letters are basically the same, and Revelations. Skim - Exodus, the fall of Jericho, a few Judges Samson, Gideon, David/Solomon story Samuel and Kings, don't reach Chronicles, it retreads Kings and is shit. You can read children's books for these as an alternative and they even have nice pictures.Proverbs/Psalms - Get a calendar. You can flip through it if you're too impatient to wait a year.Don't read the prophets, those are for jews
that doesnt mean the field isn't a regression from campbell.
I've read some deconstructions of him but I felt they were a little overcooked and much of what they said didn't directly challenge his theory. Can you point me to any good deconstructions of Campbell?
This is a good start. My alterations-Psalms, there are too damn many-Daniel, read one of the Samuels or Kingses if you want more OT+Ecclesiastes+John, the most poetic book in the Bible-Mark unless you really want to read 3-4 gospels+Romans, I don't really care for Paul's epistles but they're essential to understanding ChristianityRevelations I could go either way on, it's super entertaining and one of the most fun books of the Bible to read, but it's theologically almost null and feels out of place with the rest of the Bible to me. I can't believe it wasn't edited out by the Church. But it's fun.
Okay, that is your opinion. If you feel that way, I encourage you to explain why by submitting an essay to an academic religious studies journal for review. Otherwise, people, like myself, are just going to keep moving the field in a different direction one that personally support.
And finally, a rough consideration of the Ethos of God's Advent Here on Earth.
can you point me to any good deconstructions of Campbell or any books that go into where the field of religious studies deviates from his foundations?
did one of you guys post on /pol/ yesterday by any chance? someone had this orthodox bible - english study edition that I would love to know where they got??
Jonathan Z. Smith's Imagining Religion: From Babylon to Jonestown.
Thank you friend.
bump
What book are you studying tonight, anons?Esther for me.
I'm going and having another look at ruth and if I have time epistles before I say my prayers.
I'm working my way through the Old Tastament right now, nearly finished the histories, and honestly out of everything I've read I'd only recommend the first half of Genesis and the first half of Exodus. Samson was cool I guess, so read the like one chapter that he's in. I can't wait to finish skimming Chronicles and get to the actual wisdoms.But for gods sake at least skip Leviticus, Duerotomy, and Chronicles
first half of Genesis and the first half of Exodus.whatever you do OP don't read half of a book and put it down. Especially not Job.you would be better off not reading it at all than reading half of it and thinking you've "got it"if you're serious about learning about literature read everything. except leviticus
Revelation, not Revelations! Fuck!
Genesis, Exodus, Psalms, the gospels, the Pauline/pseudo-Pauline letters, Judges, the books of Samuel, Job, the Song of Songs, Acts, Revelation.
And Ecclesiastes.
The God Delusion.
Job and Matthew.
you should be familiar with much of it.
Especially not Job.Especially Job. Just read the first half and the ending. Nobody really cares about his rambling friends and especially not the faggot who inserted his own shit in it centuries afterwards, when God himself shows up at the end and delivers an epic smackdown explaining why they're all wrong.
we must esteem what is right, not what is popularSo Eve was right to eat the apple?
I like the part where God kills everyone in the world, its really Christian and forgiving
What's happening here22:13 If any man take a wife, and go in unto her, and hate her,22:14 And give occasions of speech against her, and bring up an evil name upon her, and say, I took this woman, and when I came to her, I found her not a maid:22:15 Then shall the father of the damsel, and her mother, take and bring forth the tokens of the damsel's virginity unto the elders of the city in the gate:22:16 And the damsel's father shall say unto the elders, I gave my daughter unto this man to wife, and he hateth her;22:17 And, lo, he hath given occasions of speech against her, saying, I found not thy daughter a maid; and yet these are the tokens of my daughter's virginity. And they shall spread the cloth before the elders of the city.22:18 And the elders of that city shall take that man and chastise him;22:19 And they shall amerce him in an hundred shekels of silver, and give them unto the father of the damsel, because he hath brought up an evil name upon a virgin of Israel: and she shall be his wife; he may not put her away all his days.22:20 But if this thing be true, and the tokens of virginity be not found for the damsel:22:21 Then they shall bring out the damsel to the door of her father's house, and the men of her city shall stone her with stones that she die: because she hath wrought folly in Israel, to play the whore in her father's house: so shalt thou put evil away from among you.
If a virgin is raped in the city and doesn't cry out loud enough, then "the men of the city shall stone her to death." Deuteronomy 22:23-24
*She was warned!*
You're an idiot and your advice has been discarded. Anytime anyone tells you to just skim or skip the middle of a story or book, especially one that isn't even hard to read, you know they're a posturing pleb.
yfw god gives you a quiz and its all insignificant details to prove you read it
Hey lit, what do you hate the most about your favorite book?
Pleb-ass image kill yourself
Machiavelli is not pleb.Unless you mean portal, then I guess we agree.
there's one character that says he'll return, but he never really does
What are some good books for a video game playing ADHD ridden manchild such as myself?
I sort of got the same problem. I find when I wean myself off video games reading becomes so much easier and enjoyable.What sort of books have you enjoyed in the past? Find books like that.
If you don't mind children's books, Ende's Neverending Story is a nice trip.I think Kafka is readable too, short and has a hazy quality to his work that if you played Silent Hill 2 or other 'quirky' games you might like.
Ready player oneNow scram
booksslow down, you aren't ready for thatgo listen to some classic literature overviews or presocratic philosophy on youtube in the background while you do other things. after a week of this you can pick up a bookthat book is shit, i'm 23 and couldn't make it past the 5% mark, a horrible montage of 80s shit i don't even understand
23born in 91/92No surprises.
the bible
how do i make money /lit/?
You spread those sweet ass cheeks of yours. I'll tell you what, little white boy. Mmhhm damn is the air tonight fine.
I get paid to shitpost on 4chan. Do you want to know my secret? Please send $24.95 to P.O. Box 343, Miami, FL 33114. Traveler's checks only.
Pretty much this.Or... get a job
do we know the performance of the fund of Chom ?
hey can someone help me outi know hes against many american institutions and is anti capitalist but what does he propose be done about it?
okbut how does someone become RICH
no one becomes rich with /lit/its an inescapable miserable life state of course, jews tend to find a waysee 'Pinker'
I'll treat you mighty nice, yes sir I will. Once our sweat done mix you'll say, "yes, sir, you treat me mighty nice."
invest sensiblydon't buy things you don't needuse the public librarykeep all of your change in a specific location and take it to the bank once a monthsell the books you don't want to used bookstoresmurder the homelessdo work around the neighborhoodget a second jobor a first job ;go to yard sales and buy things cheapthen sell them for a profit to people who don't know any betteronly drive to places you absolutely need to, walk everywhere elseselect all the foodthat should be enough for now
Okay, Uncle Tom
Shill on /pol/.
Have a great idea.
Those don't exist anymore.
if you are a girl, become a official-whore in a wealthy cityif you are not a girl, become one
From the lectures of his I've listened to he advocates independent, grassroots political activity to little by little sway the political tide towards anarcho-syndicalism.
By spending money!
these are all relatively good tips but I feel like murdering the homeless should appear much earlier in the list
That's the funniest of those two
Learn how to play the stock market. Play it right and live the NEET lifestyle, with cash ;
Online Pokerselling drugsconning old peoplesteal copperget a job
You don't2015not living the ascetic life
exceed at being an artist/athlete/bullshitter
asceticis that crow bringing them a cheezburger
Develop marketable skills and work on your salesmanship
what the fuck is 2 mill? nothing.
you think so? i was trying to keep it on the subtle side, maybe draw the attention of the simple sorts to the spoiler tag. i'll work on it.
Hello, /lit, any sites to find .pdf copies of art/photography books?I'm looking for these in particular:The Decisive Moment -http://www.goodreads.com/book/show/6048685-the-decisive-momentHaunter Air - https://www.goodreads.com/book/show/9462270-haunted-air
bump
I want to be a huge sellout and make millions of dollars by writing a shitty YA trilogy that's adapted into a four part movie series. What tropes and commonities must I confirm to in order to succeed in my goal?
Romance/ Love StoryA lot of mystery and suspenseEasy and quick to read with simple ideas and clear languageA hero/heroine who is "special" in some way
Five groups you enter based on a silly test.
Write a novel about different aliens who are brought together to do battle to the death to decide which one of their worlds is worth saving, when the others are killed the loser has their world destroyed.
Did you know that not only is there a paranormal romance section in most chain bookstores, but also that it's second in total sales only to erotica?Get to it.
Imagine how much a mash up of supernatural, young adult, erotica about people who go through silly tests would sell?
Do YA and erotica even go together?
Did you even see the new adult fiction thread?
There's only been a handful of massive YA events like Harry Potter and Hunger Games.There's a middle ground of course, but you have to write A LOT of teen and kiddie shit. A few series, build up a fan base.Basically, it can't be done unless you genuinely love YA and wanna write for teenagers.
Don't need to imagine it.Vampire Diaries.
I'm pretty sure it's more of a matter of luck than some hokey shit like "genuinely loving" it.But the chances of striking it big writing YA are roughly the same as winning the lottery so you're better off taking the latter route since it's less effort and more dignifying.
White main character. They're quiet and prefer to be alone. Bonus if they like to read. Bonus if they're a social outcast. Bonus if they're conventionally attractive, but they "don't know it yet".White love interest. Opposite of main character in personality. Bonus if they're a vampire/angel/demon/whatever sexy bullshit is trending. Bonus if the main character's family doesn't approve. Bonus if they're actually REALLY INTELLIGENT, but their bad boy/girl demeanor makes everybody think they don't do well in school because they're just too cool for conventional learning.Bonus if both characters like to draw/write.EXTRA bonus if the love interest plays a "cool" instrument OR drives a motorcycle.
Except for the school part and the opposite crush, I'm pretty much that protagonist, didnt realize until a few months ago that I was "handsome", was getting really paranoid about ppl moatly girls looking at me
Yeah, for every Hunger Games/Divergent there's probably thousands of YA series all sporting these features , but with hardly anyone reading them. Everyone's already on the gravy train hoping to land some of the YA bucks.
has to be for femaleshas to have a lot of feelings simple to read
A black kid who is struggling to accept his homosexuality because of the oppressive patriarchy established in the house.
Actually friends with a guy like that.Gets sad and boring real quick.
Have a young teenager join the heroes and die to symbolize the loss of innocence.
I can't seem to stop reading books and interpreting them with patriarchy/kyriarchy theory. It can be interesting, but it fills my head when there's other stuff to be looking at.How can I open my interpretations up?
Marxist theory.
Got to be a bait thread, I don't believe someone browsing /lit/ is so deluded good job, got me to respond
You need to stop viewing things through the lens of social justice. You have to be able to acknowledge sexism while also being able to push it to the side and ignore it and take the story for what it is.
stop being a faggot
Spook theory aka all social justice dismissed
spook theory
When I read, I feel distracted by my own wandering mind not distractions around me, and seem to engage in constant daydreaming. Sometimes this daydreaming is a welcomed diversion off the main route of the text, and may even be intellectually productive. The majority of the time, though, it is more of a purposeless wandering of my mind, blurring the focus, causing me to lose my way, only to double back to where I left off with nothing to show for it.Of course it isn't as simple as "reading fast is good and reading slow is bad." But for those of you who consider yourselves to be good readers, what are your techniques? Let's try to have a productive thread where people share their own experiences of reading well, and how they developed such a quality.
Bump
I feel distracted by my own wandering mind not distractions around meThe thing is that wandering of the mind is caused by growing up around those distractions. Because of the internet, and other aspects of modern life, your mind is trained to jump around from subject to subject as it already does from page to page, thread to thread, post to post. So when it tries to focus on just one thing, it doesn't know how to do that and makes up for the lack of distractions by making up its own diversions.If you're still young and your brain is still developing, you can try to get your brain back to a one track mind by simply reading more and using the internet less.
I agree with this. I suck at reading.I just spent 3 hours reading 20 pages - just the prologue - of a small A5 book. it's what I call "cultural ADHD", as I spent all my teenage years flicking about between bullshit on the internet and wasting my life away. it's engrained dangerous thought-patterns that continue to hold me back.when people get annoyed at having to wait through 5 seconds of an ad on a youtube video there is something seriously fucked up with your brain. you're literally addicted to cheap easy instant-satisfaction, and have no idea of the notion of emotional and psychological investment, and the journey of doing something, and, perhaps, achieving something.
emotional investmentstop being so americanyou are too obsessed with emotions, The goal to not have a goal is to have less worry, to have less burdens, to be less pessimistic especially when you compare yourself to others. Furthermore, you replace this habit by something else philosophers, theologists call that god, it is writing for people in litterature, it is research for the scientific and so on ; in any case it is some sort of a immanence-transcendence. Whatever you call it, you will be left with unordered thoughts and something creative somehow will come out of this.
cultural ADHD
Carry each distraction to completion so you may have knowledge gained from it and then you will never return from such a diversion empty-handed.
Read a book that's actually interesting to you and your mind won't wander
I do not visit /lit/ frequently but I saw the movie and thought it was amazing so is Inherent Vice as good as the film or better ? Why ?
Haven't done either but the book is supposed to be 10k times better.
Start with Pynchon's Gravity's Rainbow.
I like the book better. It's not monumentally better but it's Thomas Pynchon so it's automatically really good.
The book is better than the movie no idea why you would butcher the ending this much. Most of Pynchon's other books are superior though, Gravity's Rainbow, Against The Day, Mason & Dixon.
I just don't think it was a very good idea to have PTA adapt a Pynchon novel. He's out of his element. Pynchon would be done best by someone like Bunuel, or Lynch, or the Coen Brothers. The directing style just wasn't as good as it should have been.Excellent acting, though. Joaquin, Martin Short, Joanna Newsom, Brolin, and Owen Wilson all gave off wonderful performances.Have we found pynchon's cameo in it yet?
Didn't mean to imply PTA was a bad director. He's just different
LynchI want this meme to stop
no
he's an ok director, but he is extremely one-note and gimmicky, or, if you'd like "specialized"I get physically angry whenever I hear people who don't watch film namedrop him like he's some sort of master, and funnily enough it's more often than not people suggesting he do adaptations or remakes of shit his style is not at all compatible withhe does his faux-soap opera, intentionally bad acting, intentionally cheap looking, nightmarish surrealism well, but it's shallow, and would contribute nothing to other works like inherent viceim actually cringing that you wrote that
people who don't watch film But I do.
what an illuminating treatment and unpacking of lynch's philosophical implications, mr. ebert. you're a fucking cretin dude.
lynch doesn't have philosophical implicationshe is absolute base level entertainmentagain I don't think he's terrible. I enjoy most of what he does, I just have no delusions about it
he is absolute base level entertainment You can't be this detached from reality
if you simply haven't thought about it, you shouldn't be speaking. go back to /tv/ you god damn pseud. his films have many great psychological and philosophical implications. most his films involve a quest for the reparation of the psyche, non-linear burroughs-esque structure, unsolvable narratives that resemble rhizomatic metaphysical clearings, feedback loops of unresolved lacanian desire, existential/absurdist repetitiveness, the nietzschean flux of the self with the 21st century pomo twist of hyperreality. those are just some broad themes he deals with, not even going into depth of any of the meanings packed into each scene. he is the postmodern director par excellence.you're like a hurr hurr retarded new atheist "i have no delusions". fuck off. i don't even find his films very entertaining, he's unabashedly self-indulgent like fellini or bergman.
There is literally nothing wrong with self indulgent art. Fellini and Bergman are great.
The book is better. I liked the movie but it only adapted about 2/3 of the book and axed a lot of the most thematically interesting stuff. There are huge plots in the book about ARPAnet and a colony of "zomes" that I like better than anything that made it into the movie.
Coen brothers were allegedly supposed to adapt Mason and Dixon but apparently dropped it. Having just finished the book, it would've been a perfect match.
 Sorry, man. I can't agree. The Master is as good as cinema gets. It's one of the least shallow films I can think of.
No fucking way. Source? I can't believe I haven't heard about that before - my favorite filmmakers and my favorite author's best book.
I wouldn't talk about cinema if I were you, you sound like an amateur. Bunuel and Pynchon are absolutely nothing alike
I wouldn't talk about cinema if I were you, you sound like a complete amateur. Bunuel and lynch are nothing like Pynchon in sensibility
good job not readin the post, bonkhead
tfw lynch will never direct a version of gravity's rainbow
But he is, he is shit.
He's not shit. He's just not as good as those other directors. The Master is a good film.
The film is better because film is an inherently superior narrative medium, surpassed only by the likes of video games.
The argument is too wordy to be directed by Lynch, thats for sure
FFFFFFFUUUUUUUUUCKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKKK YYYYYYYYYOOOOOOOOOOOUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUUAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAA
I'm probably alone on this, but I think Cronenberg would be a better fit for Pinecone.
he did pretty well with DeLillo. if you're keeping score, by the way, that means that Bloom's "four great contemporary authors" have all been claimed by major filmmakersMcCarthy - Coen BrosPynchon - PTADeLillo - CroenenbergRoth - ????Roth's my least favorite of the four but I think maybe Spike Jonze or Alexander Payne could do him well
Monte Hellman could direct a hell of a McCarthy film
The narrator is supremely important in the novel. The choice of using Sortilege for the role of the "narrator" throws any interpretation of the novel away from the film. The film is simply an adaptation and the two works of Inherent Vice stand for themselves. Also, there are plenty of things missing from the film that I found great in the novel.
but i saw the master and it wasn't a good film.
MMMMMMEEEEEEEEEEEEEMMMMMMMMMEEEEEEEESSSSSS
The Coen brothers would make an enjoyable flick out of Pynchon material. Lynch could make a solid movie if he applied himself. But I think only Bunuel could make proper cinéma out of Pynchon book.
what are you implying about based Lynch?that scene from WaH is the creepiest lynch maymay
Lynch is all about that stuff.I bet you don't like Jackson Pollock either. I bet you think he's a 'hack'.
no mate. Paul Thomas Anderson was the only one who could have pulled it off.Brunel certainly not. Lynch neither. Lynch is to dark, too psychographical - Pynchon cannot be heavy, it is light and flitting.Coen Bros maybe but then again not - they were far more suited to McCarthy and it shows in how brilliant NCFOM was. Their sense of pacing is too delicate for a Pynchon adaptation.I was expecting PTA to adapt Pynchon after I watched the Master - the film's schizophrenic metre was just crying out "let me realise Pynchon". I knew that inherent vice was going to be good when Phoenix was standing there looking all squiffy and the multicoloured shadows dancing on the walls to vitamin C by can. It was just like - boom. that's Pynchon.
mulholland drive
Pynchon cannot be heavyHave you read V.? Gravity's Rainbow? He does "heavy" too. Pinecone isn't all fun and games.
the film's schizophrenic metre was just crying out "let me realise Pynchon".It's embarrassing; I think I was writing sentences like this not even 10 years ago.
reading a film novelizationever
not realizing the novel came first and they just used one of the movie posters as a cover to promote it.
Bad advice. Start with V.
I've read v, lot 49 and rainbow.yeah it's noir, but like all good noir it's irreverent and self conscious. wow good 4 u
Portnoy's Complaint was adapted in '72 by Ernest Lehman..
this got made into a movieand it wasn't directed by the Coen'sI will never get over this despair.
oh god kill yourself as soon as possible please
What does /lit/ think of the following authors?Cesar AiraEnrique Vila-MatasHarry MulischMircea CartarescuCees NooteboomAntonio TabucchiAntonio Munoz MolinaClaudio MagrisDubravka UgresicAndre Shwarz-BartJosef SkvoreckyAssia DjebarNuruddin FarahRohinton MistryYan LiankeIvan KlimaPer PettersonJon FosseErri De LucaDrago JancarDacia MariniF. Sionil JoseHoracio Castellanos MoyaMikhail ShishkinAndrei MakinePer Olov EnquistOlga TokarczukAmin MaaloufBernardo AtxagaElena FerrantePavel Kohout
I only know Bernardo Atxaga and just because I remember his name from spanish literature.
cunts
Why do you think they're cunts?
Read Nooteboom, Ferrante and Mistry. Nooteboom is pretty shit, the latter two are good.
What's wrong with Nooteboom?
very trite writings about 'grand' concepts, which end up half-baked without any concern for character, plot, structure, i.e. he can't write for shit
I wonder why he seems to be so highly regarded in that case.
never heard of any of them lol
Yeah, I mainly chose famous authors that /lit/ doesn't talk about much.
I enjoyed the bit of Elena Ferrante I read, very well written and not quite what anybody else is writing nowadays.
Guess I'll read Ferrante at some point.
What should I read by them?
google
Bump.
,
Cesar Airakind of fun. he claims that he never corrects his manuscripts and i sort of believe him because the majority of his texts have several flaws, inconsistencies or just something wrong going on. he knows how to construct a text but he can't write an ending worth shit, they always feel rushed and inadequate for what he worked in the rest of the book, which is ok for some of his texts i guess.Enrique Vila-Matasread him in spanish, there's lots of baroque sensibilities and a particular sense of rhythm in his works. if you read him in english it's just gonna be a catalogue of names and names and names.Antonio Tabucchii hope you're into portuguese food, italian food and fernando pessoa if you're planning to read him.Claudio Magrisa better essayist than a novelist, even though danubio is clearly his best work. check out marisa madieri too.Horacio Castellanos Moyaflavor of the month. just read the early works of rodrigo rey rosa instead.
Thanks. I appreciate this post.
Cesar AiraInsipid.Enrique Vila-MatasBrain dead.Harry MulischDerivative.Mircea CartarescuChloroform.Cees NooteboomHave not read.Antonio TabucchiHysterically fictional.Antonio Munoz MolinaEpically named for epic nap times. Claudio MagrisHave not read.Dubravka UgresicCloudy.Andre Shwarz-BartHave not read.Josef SkvoreckyWill not read.Assia DjebarWandering.Nuruddin FarahEven more lost.Rohinton MistryBlindingly dull.Yan LiankeHave not read.Ivan KlimaEngaging.Per PettersonMore chloroform.Jon FosseVaried and brilliant.Erri De LucaNeeds to spend more time at being bombed. Passé décennie. Drago JancarPassable essayist. He's no Gore Vidal.Dacia MariniNever even heard of.F. Sionil JoseHave been referred to, and would recommend based on these referrals. Sadly, have not read.Horacio Castellanos MoyaDecent journalist.Mikhail ShishkinAvoid until you're bored with Tolstoy and Dostoevsky.Andrei MakineMore chloroform.Per Olov EnquistHas a rep with some weight. Haven't read. Probably worth investigating.Olga TokarczukPeddler in archetypes.Amin MaaloufHaven't heard of / read.Bernardo AtxagaHopelessly provincial.Elena FerranteBooks needless of authors are needless of readers as well. Inspires decent films.Pavel KohoutHave not read.
OK.
Bernardo Atxaga writes in Basque, correct?
Cesar AiraFun stories, but not much more.Enrique VIla-MatasVery nice. One of my favourite contemporary authors. Doctor Pasavento is amazing.Don't really know anyone else.
final chapter's name is the book's title
chapters have names other than 'chapter'
There isn't a single book that does this.
Chapter has a excerpt of a in-fiction book or encyclopedia or a picture before the chapter starts
MmmmLike when a poetry collection's title poem is the last one. That build up feels better than BDSM.
each first letter of every chapter reveals the plot twist
NICOLE IS DEAD
tfw the book has pictures
Moby-Dick does this.
book has no chapters or page numbers
book has no chaptersFuck you too, frank.
chapter 1 starts on page 16
each chapter has dot points summarising what happens before you read the main text
the foreword, preface, editor's note, translators note, afterword, appendix make up more content of the book than the book itself.
book is a translation
reading books with chapter names
What book does this?
This shit annoyed me too
tfw want to do this in my novel but people will think it's either childish or a Blood Meridian ripoffjdimsa
later chapter is a retelling of a previous chapter from another characters pov
books published before 1880Also Blood Meridian
the book starts in the end of the storythe rest of the book explains how you got there
some dickensblood meridian
character appears in another novel by the author  character appears in another novel by another author
And the Eddie Dickens Trilogy
which book
genre fiction
hill #218: 4 pagesbattle against agents of Mordor: 1/2 page
book has no pages
characters have long russian namescharacters have multiple terms of address used interchangably
author uses no quotation marks when writing dialogue There's something about this that makes it look and feel so damn good. It's aesthetically pleasing to look at and it's a pleasure to read once you very quickly get the hang of it.
The King James Bible in its original format does this. I think that's where Blood Meridian got it.
What book?
A few authors do this. Cormac McCarthy, Jose Saramago, Cynan Jones, etc. It's a woefully underused literary device, imo. A quarter mile down the road he stopped and looked back. We're not thinking, he said. We have to go back. He pushed the cart off the road and tilted it over where it could not be seen and they left their packs and went back to the station. In the service bay he dragged out the steel trashdrum and tipped it over and pawed out all the quart plastic oilbottles. Then they sat in the floor decanting them of their dregs one by one, leaving the bottles to stand upside down draining into a pan until at the end they had almost a half quart of motor oil. He screwed down the plastic cap and wiped the bottle off with a rag and hefted it in his hand. Oil for their little slutlamp to light the long gray dusks, the long gray dawns. You can read me a story, the boy said. Cant you, Papa? Yes, he said. I can.
What book?Every book ever in French or Russian, for example.
Cormac McCarthy is well known for it, so is Tim Winton in Australia at least and Cynan Jones as well. Personally, I love it. In most books I've read which use the device I've found it greatly added to the atmosphere and tone of the work. Not saying it can't be done badly, but I enjoy seeing it done well.
chapters and book pages count in reverseI love Chuck Palahniuk.
Absolutely fucking disgusting.I'm here for a story, not to be forced to do your formatting for you in my head as I read. Stop being lazy and set out your work legibly you fucking faggot.
If dubs I write this comment on a postcard and mail it to Tim Winton.
Reroll
rerolling for justice.
Gulliver's Travels.
Dubs get
 GET
book has no capitalization or punctuation./lit/ eats it up because "muh art"
 The salt is real
What book?
Book is chronologically out of order for no good reason.
le sierpinsky gasket
It was a critique of determinism.
dmitry mitya fyodorovich karamazov
The book is a diary as an excuse for being a written story
I'm currently reading a novel based on a game series
What possesses these people to make threads like this?
What game series is it?
Shitposting.
Good for you, OP. I'm glad you're reading at all. It's not what I enjoy reading, but I realize the world would be a dull place if everyone liked what I like. If you ever want some literature recommendations, I'd be happy to help you out. Have a good day.
From someone who has made fedora threads in the past, it's a nice bit of catharsis.
Halo ;
the best video game is mario kart on wii
gross
Anon, do you often use these type of gifs around here? If so, I love you. Stay gold.
B-b-but they were written at the same time!
+ s
it's an artform, anon
What is it with chinks and liking incomprehensible bullshit?http://www.theguardian.com/books/2013/feb/05/finnegans-wake-china-james-joyce-hit?CMP=share_btn_twc
lrn2catalog
the guardian
They literally speak in ching-ching nonsense. What do you expect?
what are some books that contain no words, pictures, or letters?
toilet paper roll lol
a sketchbook
underrated post
Used notebooks contain virtually no words.
Those Ikea manuals qualify.

UnusedThey have pictures.Seriously.He did say books, not scrolls.
http://www.amazon.com/White-Hardcover-Blank-Pages-ASH10700/dp/B001SV2ISC
People OP Has Had Sex With, Volume II: Women
Composition notebooks.
I count the inked lines as pictures, boy
Aren't pictures representational?

whoa look at those repeating non-poster number digits
One of the steps in processing blubber used by 19th century whalers involved slicing blocks of fat into near paper thin sheets. These sheets would be left attached by a strip of fat that acted like the spine of a book. Sailors would refer to the blocks of sliced fat as "bibles". There probably weren't any words, pictures, or letters in these
was this in moby dick or somethingthis is highly specific whale knowledgeand i love it, thank you.best response in the thread
lol
i would know this if i fucking stuck with the dickmelville save me
Don't remember if it's mentioned inMoby Dick. I read a history of whaling earlier this year, it came up in the section on rendering
it's a sandbox bookyou can write your own stories....adventures...goty
Black Cocks OP's Mom Didn't Suck: a Memoir
Tip toppity kek
I'm about 60 pages from finishing Moby Dick. Almost certain this isn't mentioned in the book, unless it's in the part I haven't read yet, but I feel as though he's pretty much done with the cetology parts and is wrapping up the book at this point.
A book of matches
I'm reading Gravity's Rainbow at the moment - rather arrogant of myself that the main curiosity was how difficult I heard it was - and I'm curious: if I'm struggling to understand it and piece together the events and to find the meaning of certain passages, is it recommended that I continue reading? How was your experience with this behemoth?
There were passages that I loved re-reading over and over again because of how imaginative or intelligent they were. I also enjoyed a lot of the events and some of the characters I feel I understand are very interesting to read about, but there were certainly moments where the book went over my head for these extensively lengthy passages lasting multiple pages where I felt near to completely lost while reading it to the point where I zoned out at times.Unless if you have an annotated copy of the book that understands it more than you do, you're probably not going to understand it all in your first reading, but I'd say keep reading because there's plenty of wonderful nuggets in the book that'll make you glad you discovered them.
I see what you did there
Did you read V. first? Go back and do that if you haven't. It'll help.
Try to keep track of the plot on your first read, go back to find meaning in it all.I took notes on my second read, and there's no question it helped, but it's not at all necessary to understanding the book.I don't. What did he did?
I feel bad for people who don't understand memes.
nuggetsanon posted a nug
So "what [he] did there" was use a word with another connotation than he meant? That warrants a post?
Okay I'm going to mark myself a plebeian with this, but I use this resource whenever it gets a little too "metaphor intertwined with dialogue and second person narrative for pages at a time":http://www.math.harvard.edu/~ctm/links/culture/rainbow.bell.htmlIt helps understand the basic "point" page by page, and doesn't ruin any of the beauty I don't think. If anyone claims to have no problem with some of the wordier passages I'd either be deeply impressed or skeptical of their legitimacy. The book is ridiculous. Beautiful and fun to read, but a kick in the pants. Don't feel bad for needing some explanatory assistance. Good luck!
or just use the wiki
I read Lot 49 first so I knew what I was getting into, more or less, and I didn't worry too much if I didn't understand the "why," as long as I could follow the "what" and "how." It was massively fun, and the parts where I did understand some of the deeper ideas Pynchon was striking at were incredible.I'm sure I caught less than half of what he was trying for, but the half I caught was extremely fun, much more fun than what you have to work similarly hard for or harder in Ulysses. I owe it to myself to read GR again sometime soon, but I want to finish Pynchon's corpus first, I have Vineland and Against the Day still left.Anyway, OP, if you genuinely couldn't say what physically happened in the last ~30 pages you read, then it might be too advanced for you, come back when you've read more nonlinear literature. But if you're just struggling to figure out what it "means" when a man fights a giant adenoid...well, you're in the same boat as the rest of us.
 when a man fights a giant adenoidActually lol'd. Thanks for validating my confusion at that.
I don't see what I did, c'mon anon, not everything is a reference to something else
Will keep both of these in mind on my second read-through, thanks guys
The adenoid part I felt was actually simple - Pirate controls people's fantasies and the adenoid invasion of London was somebody's peculiar fantasy he was attempting to manipulate. I struggled a bit more with Slothrop falling down the toilet and escapin' a rapin' but that made sense to me more when I thought of it as Slothrop under the Visitation's truth serum, trying to recall events from his past, but the serum leaving him a sedated state meant that he kept mis-remembering and misunderstanding shit that actually happened.There's so many layers in this book that when I next re-visit it, I'm going to take notes on everything so I can understand it all.
The adenoid thing is literally just a pun on the dictator in The Dictator being called Adenoid.
Which "The Dictator"? Chaplin's or the one from 1935?
I meant The Great Dictator so Chaplin's
Or just be smart, and not a dumb cunt.
You don't need to be that smart. Just read up on shit like tarot, astrology, kabbalah, drugs, and read V. first. I already knew enough about those topics to understand what he was going for like 80% of it.
Are others in the same boat as me: that I can't read this book as frequently as I can others? Like, usually I can read about 150 pages a day or so but Gravity's Rainbow means after 50 pages in one sitting I really need a break.
Yes, dense literature is harder to read.
I feel ya, man. I thought it'd be worth reading over the summer as, y'know, summer break from college, and shit I struggle to get 20 pages read in one sitting. I need to put the book down, watch something light-hearted, get something to eat, and maybe I'll go back to it later in the day.
yeah, because you're just plain ignorant if you have to look up what the Kenosha kid is in reference to, or don't know going in what portions of the book are drawn from Pynchon's own family history, etc.
Pynchon was on drugs when he wrote most of it, he has stated that even he didn't understand what he was getting at most of the time when he reread it.
I highly recommend the use of supplementary material. The pynchon wiki + A Gravity's Rainbow Companion: Sources and Contexts for Pynchon's Novel are both great resources.There's nothing shameful about taking some assistance when tackling GR.
This is false and I wholeheartedly believe anyone who actually reads the book to its conclusion will find a sprawling, but complete plot with clear themes, meanings and indictments.Of course there are bizarre passages, digressions, jokes and side stories. Not every detail has to play into the larger picture.Personally one of the few passages that still confounds me is Pirate at the surreal ballroom party with Katje where everyone speaks cryptically and chews taffy. I'm fairly certain this is one of Pirate's borrowed dreams, but I do not know whose it might be or what it might mean. There is also extensive mention in that segment of people being double and triple agents and so on, which I don't -really- understand, outside of possibly Katje as she appeared to Blicero, but it's been a while since I've read the book and can't recall if Katje ever actually pretended to be on Blicero's side or was just an agent captured/planted as a sex slave.
dude he was high as fuck and if you dont think so, youre high too.
You really didn't understand that part after reading the rest? It was Pirate and Katje being recruited to the Counterforce, which is a metaphor for Counterculture and a reference to Newton's Third Law of motion.
I think I intend to read the book blind, without assistance, so I can try to understand it to the best of my own independent abilities which won't be much and then I plan on revisiting the book with some supplementary material as you had suggested.
I went to buy GR at a used bookstore. The owner looked at me with a small chuckle and said "you know what, you can just take that one for free". He's complimented me on my taste before, but I wasn't sure if he was mocking me or what... I just need to read this fucking book already.
I wish I was given GR for free. What edition was it?I assume he's just struggled to sell the book due to its infamy or he just likes you/your taste in literature.
It probably was something like no one buying it. Also describe the cover, I wanna know which edition you got.
Quick question:Does Penguin Classics edition with the blueprint cover have any issues with it?I tried to order a Vintage Classics copy, but the order got screwed up, and was wondering if it's necessary to return it.
I'm ~150 pages in. Reading very slowly. Maybe 10 pages/day.
Blueprint cover paperback is fine, same page count/content as the first edition as far as I know.
It's the one in the op, a hard cover, pages are all yellowed and a lot of them dog-eared
Seriously? He gave you the fucking first edition hardcover? Damn. You must be the fucker's favorite customer or something.
what's with people caring about editions here? do some of them have major typos or something? i have pic related is that bad? are there like serious typos in it or something or is it just for the swag factor?
Blueprint anon here.All I know is that this image made me nervous.
A couple are really bad for various reasons. Most of them are fine. But the first edition is rare and expensive probably not in a really used up condition like that guy's though so it is a bit of a swag factor thing too I guess.
"On the writing of Gravity's Rainbow, Pynchon reportedly told Siegel, "I was so fucked up while I was writing it . . . that now I go back over some of those sequences and I can't figure out what I could have meant."
Because everything anyone ever says is 100% serious all the time.
because if something that I dont agree with is mentioned I have to call its validity into question because it conflicts my perception of the novel.Grow up you fuckwit. Pynchon was high and a lot of it doesn't make sense. Dont be mad just because you wasted your time on a meme book.
Grow upAs opposed to you whose mission in life is shitposting about said meme book that you don't like? Sure is summer here.
The novel is fine, people just take it way too seriously and place way too much emphasis on its meaning instead of just seeing it for what it is: A document of the drug use and paranoid culture surrounding the period in which it was written. If you want to understand the main themes of the novel you can find the important quotes organized on fucking goodreads.
If you honestly think there's no meaning to the book beyond the influence of drugs and paranoia, on the basis of that one quote, and don't see the problem with that train of thought, you should just stop reading, stop posting, and stop talking about things you've read altogether because you're just wasting your time and everyone else's.
reportedly
Muh meme book, nobody get's it but me, just stop reading pleb, you can't appreciate fine literature about people eating shit and falling down toilets like me.Babbys mad the Pinch trolled them: The thread. I'm not discrediting the work, or pynchon, I'm a fan of his writing, people just take gravitys rainbow way too seriously. He has stated a lot of it was drug addled ramblings he can't seem to understand anymore. Get the fuck over it. The guy has other books.
Do you also take books like Naked Lunch as seriously as GR? because that's essentially what GR is, a document written by a man on drugs with a few lucid and revealing passages.
There is obviously meaning, but the illuminating paragraphs are few and far between, the garbage in between obfuscates a lot of the content that is more lucid and concise, whether this is intentional and a part of the texts funtion to parallel the noise and static we deal with on day to day life, is up for debate. People become like Oed's from Tcol49 when they start reading too far into GR. It's fucking hilarious.
Naked Lunch is also a great book. Whether or not an artist took drugs shouldn't factor in to your potential enjoyment of something.
You're the only one who's mad though. Because you base all your thoughts about the book on one thing he "reportedly" said to someone about it and have a pathological need to feel like you're right to think about it this way. Seek help before you DFW.Not really. There's a meaning to most, if not all of it, and it's not even usually that hard to see. If you find yourself not understanding a lot of it you're just not reading it right or lacking in some bit of background knowledge particular to that part to understand what's going on. There certainly are segments that are far more difficult to make sense of than the rest but those are far outnumbered by the ones that do make sense.The exact opposite extreme of reading into it too deeply is taking on this reductionist attitude that most of it doesn't mean much becuz he wuz on acid lel. You don't have to obsess over it, but just because you couldn't figure it out doesn't mean there's nothing there to figure out. At that point all you're doing is making a sad attempt at salvaging your self-esteem.
My sidesFuck, have fun with life m8. Pull your thumb out of your arse, I'd love to hear your self indulgent analysis of the text.
you guys obviously Gravitys Rainbow is awesome and 1000x more meaningful because pynchon WAS whacked out on drugs while writing it. why are these things in conflict
 want to buy V and Crying Of Lot 49 only editions available in the UK are the Where's Wally/Waldo coversAm I eternally damned, /lit/? Is the print really that badly smudged to the extent where you can't read it or will I be fine?
ITT people that don't know how to readlol at that one guy recommending to read quotes from goodread, what kind of sparknotes faggotry do you have in store for us next?
So, I don't get it, was Slothrop real?
I'd say if you're struggling don't bother. I read stuff like GR on trains because it gets my 100% attention. But if I were at home struggling with it, why would I want to keep pushing through? Seems like a waste of time.
Some people like being challenged and if they don't understand something, they're likely to research it to understand and appreciate what they've just read. I struggled with Gravity's Rainbow but I'm glad I did because it was filled with fascinating layers I wouldn't find in other author's works.
tbh i have the penguin deluxe and its not that bad, although certainly should be avoided vs. other editions if possible.
I've said this before, but again:I had heard about Gravity's Rainbow for some time as this excellent, challenging book so full of references, etc. that it was hard to understand but funny.I got a copy, sat down on a Friday evening and started. I finished it Sunday evening and was completely non-plussed. I thought about it, assumed I must have missed something, and started it again Tuesday and took my time re-reading it.I finished Friday with the same conclusion.I found it boring, trite, unfunny, and cluttered, not complex. One of the biggest three disappointments of genre fiction I have encountered, the other two being The Stars my Destination awful and Dune terrible.
you're a pompous fellow aren't you?
Why? For disagreeing with people?
I highly doubt you read the entire thing in just one weekend
nah, just your general tone
 One of the biggest three disappointments of genre fiction I have encounteredyou went too far with that b8 m8 :
It's under 800 pages....
Not bait.It did not live up to the hype. Maybe it was over-hyped to me, but that is what happened.
what did you find so problematic with it?
MOTHERFUCKING BOOKDEPOSITORY YOU CUNT
http://www.bookdepository.com/V-Thomas-Pynchon/9780060930219http://www.bookdepository.com/Crying-Lot-49-Thomas-Pynchon/9780060913076Crying is on sale.Thank me later.
" people that don't know how to read"Nigga learn 2 grammar you filthy pleb."People who", it's fucking "people who don't know how to read", which you clearly don't. I would also love to hear your thoughts and analysis of the text faggot.
only subhuman shitskins don't know how to read so it's technically correct
I have both Gravity's Rainbow and Lot in Waldo covers, the printing seems fine, they're just pretty uglyIt's what they had in local bookstores so I just bought them, seems fine
It's only the Wally V. that has the terrible text.
Lot49 of the waldo covers is fine, mine has perfect print and heaps of blank pages at the back for making notes.
Mason and Dixon too.
Oh alright then. I got the original Henry Holt & Company hardback. It's fucking huge.
I'm about 200 pages into the penguin deluxe. Should I stop and pick up the vintage edition or does it really matter that much? I'd rather not buy another copy. A few small errors don't bug me.
No worries dude. Just keep going.
I didn't think it was that complicated; just cluttered. I found the humor juvenile.That's all.
k
thanks, anon 3
wowrude
live in uk and not know how to buy books
I usually just use Amazon honestly, I didn't know of websites that specialised in selling books
Are you making a joke right now?
https://stallman.org/amazon.htmlRead this.
Stallmanno thanks
Got bored and bailed somewhere around page 50. Why isn't this book considered sci-fi?
Because it isn't. It's a World War II novel.
But it isn't. It's a sci-fi Cold War novel.
Just finished it. It really feels like a weight has been lifted from my shoulders
iktf. I had to read a bunch of short and easy novels and novellas after GR. I just unwound with a bunch of Brother Grimm stuff, some Lovecraft imo a great but very easily accessible and immersive author and Doyle's Sherlock Holmes which was basically the YA fiction of its day.
So Katje is a sex worker/double agent who has kinda been forced to manipulate Slothrop against his will, right?
Doyle's Sherlock Holmes which was basically the YA fiction of its day.thanks for confirming pynchon readers are retards
probably
 implying it isn'tHow's your break from school?
He's right, though.
Do you read to become wiser or to be entertained?
reading to become wiseyou arent divine inspiration'ing right. wisdom comes from living life and observing reality, and forming your own ideas about the world. You cant expand your wisdom by reading words from another person. You can get ideas and see things from someone elses perspective, but all that matters is your own perspective.
To learn. The expand my life. And yes, I find it entertaining.
To become so wise that everything entertains me.
wisdom comes from living life and observing reality, and forming your own ideas about the worldSo, it from comes from books?You cant expand your wisdom by reading words from another person.but you just said you can
The=toHorrible tweet typos
entertainedyou do not learn, since there is nothing to outside the feeling through your senses. When you listen to somebody's predicament, when you listen to hem whining day after day, they will tell that you cannot understand, because you do not live it.
I write to become wiser. I read to see what the competition is doing.
Nice. Books are in fact a part of reality, but unless you derive a solid understanding of your personal environment, books arent going to help you achieve any sort of wisdom by themselves. But lets just say for instance, you read ayn rand.. you're in fact removing yourself from reality. Not all books are meant to increase your understanding of the world.
Prove what you just said
that cancer picture
I read to be entertained by wisdom.
you cant BE wise until you use your wisdom in the real world. You literally cant. And if your entire reality is based on 4chan and books, you arent wise. You're secluded. Contrary to this, seclusion does grant wisdom, however seclusion from the world means you still have to live in the world to some extent. But when all you do is read and browse 4chan, you are secluding yourself from the world to a degree that you dont even have to Live in the world at all in any form, even solitarily. Granted, the internet is a part of the real world, and its a part of your real life.. but when you only know what you know, thats all you'll ever know. And from this perspective, its not really that much.
I want to beat whoever made the picture to death
it is not me
to pass the time
fictionmakes you wiserkek
Is wisdom a goal unto itself or just means to another end?
Depends on the book
both and sometimes neither. whatever I'm in the mood for or sometimes stuff for work thus neither.
implying they're mutually exclusiveimplying the process of "becoming wise" is not entertaining
I'm reading this book like the /lit/ philosophy guide suggests and I'm not retaining a single thing. I'm about 10% of the way through the book and I feel like hundreds of Gods, titans and fairies or whatever the fuck is being thrown at me and I can't remember a single one or their traits. Should I be taking notes or something?
read the percy jackson seriesnot a joke
I really wanted to get that book but I had to settle with Mythology of the Ancient Greeks by Richard Martin.
being this autistici guess that is the purpose of promulgating stupid memes like that, to trick retards like you.
It's not really meant to be taken in all at once. It's more of a reference guide, or a set of stories to read out loud to children. I recommend you go slow and/or read it alongside actual works of Greek literature such as Homer's epics.Although if you can't even remember a single God or Goddess, you're probably a pleb who just doesn't have the reading skills to read serious /lit/erature anyway.
Possibly this. Also, watch Disney's Hercules.I for one found a copy of this when I was like 5 and memorized all of it, so I just always assumed it was super easy.Meme? That book is great, I was happy to see lit recommending it.
I remember the basic olympians and vaguely what they do. Zeus, sits in Mt Olympus or w/e. Hades in the underworld. Poseison is doing stuff in the sea. I think most of my knowledge stems from the animated Disney show though.
You don't have to remember all their traits, just the stories and relationships.
Maybe you can't retain what you read because you're dumb or a bad reader? work on reading shitty genre fiction and once you get good at that try again and like this guy said go slowly and read at your own pace. if you still can't get it work on accepting that you are a pleb.
Dude i'm in literally the exact same position. I skimmed ahead and a lot of it is just the plot of the Iliad/Odyssey so just pick and chose what you read and absorb Hamilton's commentary; the patchwork and transitionary nature of the mythology etc.
 I read PJ as a teen and it helped tons honestlybasics of the pantheon, some of the mythical creatures, basic greek morals, god arguments,
The introduction is amazing and sets up why the Greeks were so important so well. But the rest is a reference guide so take it slow.
And yes, it helps to have a pen and journal handy, not only for this book but for any serious reading you do.
I have to assume you're an inexperienced reader. Mythology is a best-seller, the goodreads audience can even understand it.
Learning about the classical gods isnt something you can get in a onner.Dont be mad.Download an Anki set if you must, but really this is an intro to the world of the greeks and norse.
I'm also reading it right now. I skipped most of that part and started reading about the actually stories involving them. You generally get to know them more in a context of a story
At least read the Demeter and Dionysus chapter showing why they're the great gods of Earth, if you haven't, best part of the book for me
I felt that it was a good introduction. I didn't remember everything, but when I started getting into the actual stories, I could remember just enough from Mythology to make it easier.Also, try listening to the audiobook while you read so that you can pick up the pronunciations. That's what I did.
And upon her forehead was a name written, MYSTERY, BABYLON THE GREAT, THE MOTHER OF HARLOTS AND ABOMINATIONS OF THE EARTH.Is Revelations the best literature ever written? How can you have so many powerful words one after another? What would you give to write like that?
Revelations is incoherent drivel that only Christfags can take seriously
implying I'm affiliated with any shitty jew cult nope
Revelations GOAT along with Genesis and psalmsBLAKE GOAT
plebAnd the four living creatures, each of them with six wings, are full of eyes all round and within, and day and night they never cease to sing,“Holy, holy, holy, is the Lord God Almighty,who was and is and is to come!”
That's literally just words with no meaning behind them, I can do that tooAnd the LORD Almighty said, He who shall work the fields of Injustice shall only harvest the fruits of discontent. On their fields will rain down the spoken thoughts of histories undone, of hostless hosts and of the works of those who set aside their mighty pains in favor of the wills of those who shall never see the Glory of the LORD See? Bullshit, made up to sound spooky
pathetic, no respect for math or the stars, or even mere metaphor. You're over your element friendThen I saw another mighty angel coming down from heaven, wrapped in a cloud, with a rainbow over his head, and his face was like the sun, and his legs like pillars of fire. He had a little scroll open in his hand. And he set his right foot on the sea, and his left foot on the land, and called out with a loud voice, like a lion roaring; when he called out, the seven thunders sounded. And when the seven thunders had sounded, I was about to write, but I heard a voice from heaven saying, “Seal up what the seven thunders have said, and do not write it down.”now that is actual writing
the bible is so based
Job is the best book, but Revelations is up there.
This is fucking retardedMuh bronze age spooksMuh "cultural value"Read the passage you just posted. It is pure autism.
his legs like pillars of firetopkek
one of the best parts in the Bible15 However, if you do not obey the Lord your God and do not carefully follow all his commands and decrees I am giving you today, all these curses will come on you and overtake you:16 You will be cursed in the city and cursed in the country.17 Your basket and your kneading trough will be cursed.18 The fruit of your womb will be cursed, and the crops of your land, and the calves of your herds and the lambs of your flocks.19 You will be cursed when you come in and cursed when you go out.20 The Lord will send on you curses, confusion and rebuke in everything you put your hand to, until you are destroyed and come to sudden ruin because of the evil you have done in forsaking him.[a] 21 The Lord will plague you with diseases until he has destroyed you from the land you are entering to possess. 22 The Lord will strike you with wasting disease, with fever and inflammation, with scorching heat and drought, with blight and mildew, which will plague you until you perish. 23 The sky over your head will be bronze, the ground beneath you iron. 24 The Lord will turn the rain of your country into dust and powder; it will come down from the skies until you are destroyed.25 The Lord will cause you to be defeated before your enemies. You will come at them from one direction but flee from them in seven, and you will become a thing of horror to all the kingdoms on earth. 26 Your carcasses will be food for all the birds and the wild animals, and there will be no one to frighten them away. 27 The Lord will afflict you with the boils of Egypt and with tumors, festering sores and the itch, from which you cannot be cured. 28 The Lord will afflict you with madness, blindness and confusion of mind. 29 At midday you will grope about like a blind person in the dark. You will be unsuccessful in everything you do; day after day you will be oppressed and robbed, with no one to rescue you.
it's fucking based no matter what you believeAnd a great portent appeared in heaven, a woman clothed with the sun, with the moon under her feet, and on her head a crown of twelve stars; she was with child and she cried out in her pangs of birth, in anguish for delivery. And another portent appeared in heaven; behold, a great red dragon, with seven heads and ten horns, and seven diadems upon his heads. His tail swept down a third of the stars of heaven, and cast them to the earth. And the dragon stood before the woman who was about to bear a child, that he might devour her child when she brought it forth; she brought forth a male child, one who is to rule all the nations with a rod of iron, but her child was caught up to God and to his throne, and the woman fled into the wilderness, where she has a place prepared by God, in which to be nourished for one thousand two hundred and sixty days.
30 You will be pledged to be married to a woman, but another will take her and rape her. You will build a house, but you will not live in it. You will plant a vineyard, but you will not even begin to enjoy its fruit. 31 Your ox will be slaughtered before your eyes, but you will eat none of it. Your donkey will be forcibly taken from you and will not be returned. Your sheep will be given to your enemies, and no one will rescue them. 32 Your sons and daughters will be given to another nation, and you will wear out your eyes watching for them day after day, powerless to lift a hand. 33 A people that you do not know will eat what your land and labor produce, and you will have nothing but cruel oppression all your days. 34 The sights you see will drive you mad. 35 The Lord will afflict your knees and legs with painful boils that cannot be cured, spreading from the soles of your feet to the top of your head.36 The Lord will drive you and the king you set over you to a nation unknown to you or your ancestors. There you will worship other gods, gods of wood and stone. 37 You will become a thing of horror, a byword and an object of ridicule among all the peoples where the Lord will drive you.38 You will sow much seed in the field but you will harvest little, because locusts will devour it. 39 You will plant vineyards and cultivate them but you will not drink the wine or gather the grapes, because worms will eat them. 40 You will have olive trees throughout your country but you will not use the oil, because the olives will drop off. 41 You will have sons and daughters but you will not keep them, because they will go into captivity. 42 Swarms of locusts will take over all your trees and the crops of your land.43 The foreigners who reside among you will rise above you higher and higher, but you will sink lower and lower. 44 They will lend to you, but you will not lend to them. They will be the head, but you will be the tail.45 All these curses will come on you. They will pursue you and overtake you until you are destroyed, because you did not obey the Lord your God and observe the commands and decrees he gave you. 46 They will be a sign and a wonder to you and your descendants forever. 47 Because you did not serve the Lord your God joyfully and gladly in the time of prosperity, 48 therefore in hunger and thirst, in nakedness and dire poverty, you will serve the enemies the Lord sends against you. He will put an iron yoke on your neck until he has destroyed you.
49 The Lord will bring a nation against you from far away, from the ends of the earth, like an eagle swooping down, a nation whose language you will not understand, 50 a fierce-looking nation without respect for the old or pity for the young. 51 They will devour the young of your livestock and the crops of your land until you are destroyed. They will leave you no grain, new wine or olive oil, nor any calves of your herds or lambs of your flocks until you are ruined. 52 They will lay siege to all the cities throughout your land until the high fortified walls in which you trust fall down. They will besiege all the cities throughout the land the Lord your God is giving you.53 Because of the suffering your enemy will inflict on you during the siege, you will eat the fruit of the womb, the flesh of the sons and daughters the Lord your God has given you. 54 Even the most gentle and sensitive man among you will have no compassion on his own brother or the wife he loves or his surviving children, 55 and he will not give to one of them any of the flesh of his children that he is eating. It will be all he has left because of the suffering your enemy will inflict on you during the siege of all your cities. 56 The most gentle and sensitive woman among you—so sensitive and gentle that she would not venture to touch the ground with the sole of her foot—will begrudge the husband she loves and her own son or daughter 57 the afterbirth from her womb and the children she bears. For in her dire need she intends to eat them secretly because of the suffering your enemy will inflict on you during the siege of your cities.58 If you do not carefully follow all the words of this law, which are written in this book, and do not revere this glorious and awesome name—the Lord your God— 59 the Lord will send fearful plagues on you and your descendants, harsh and prolonged disasters, and severe and lingering illnesses. 60 He will bring on you all the diseases of Egypt that you dreaded, and they will cling to you. 61 The Lord will also bring on you every kind of sickness and disaster not recorded in this Book of the Law, until you are destroyed. 62 You who were as numerous as the stars in the sky will be left but few in number, because you did not obey the Lord your God. 63 Just as it pleased the Lord to make you prosper and increase in number, so it will please him to ruin and destroy you. You will be uprooted from the land you are entering to possess.
This is a Revelations thread, not muh stolen Egyptian religion
64 Then the Lord will scatter you among all nations, from one end of the earth to the other. There you will worship other gods—gods of wood and stone, which neither you nor your ancestors have known. 65 Among those nations you will find no repose, no resting place for the sole of your foot. There the Lord will give you an anxious mind, eyes weary with longing, and a despairing heart. 66 You will live in constant suspense, filled with dread both night and day, never sure of your life. 67 In the morning you will say, “If only it were evening!” and in the evening, “If only it were morning!”—because of the terror that will fill your hearts and the sights that your eyes will see. 68 The Lord will send you back in ships to Egypt on a journey I said you should never make again. There you will offer yourselves for sale to your enemies as male and female slaves, but no one will buy you.
I can't read that without thinking of that lewd track on 666
i thought it was stolen from assyrian treaties not egyptian religion
jews claim they were slaves who built the pyramids. then they were freed.Free Masons
oh you were talking about judaism in general not the vassal treaty section of deuteronomynvm
yeah plus I don't know the particulars of every book, why what's the deal?
Walden is superior to any book of The Bible.However mean your life is, meet it and live it; do not shun it and call it hard names. It is not so bad as you are. It looks poorest when you are richest. The fault-finder will find faults even in paradise. Love your life, poor as it is. You may perhaps have some pleasant, thrilling, glorious hours, even in a poorhouse. The setting sun is reflected from the windows of the almshouse as brightly as from the rich man's abode; the snow melts before its door as early in the spring. I do not see but a quiet mind may live as contentedly there, and have as cheering thoughts, as in a palace. The town's poor seem to me often to live the most independent lives of any. Maybe they are simply great enough to receive without misgiving. Most think that they are above being supported by the town; but it oftener happens that they are not above supporting themselves by dishonest means, which should be more disreputable. Cultivate poverty like a garden herb, like sage. Do not trouble yourself much to get new things, whether clothes or friends. Turn the old; return to them. Things do not change; we change. Sell your clothes and keep your thoughts. God will see that you do not want society. If I were confined to a corner of a garret all my days, like a spider, the world would be just as large to me while I had my thoughts about me. The philosopher said: "From an army of three divisions one can take away its general, and put it in disorder; from the man the most abject and vulgar one cannot take away his thought." Do not seek so anxiously to be developed, to subject yourself to many influences to be played on; it is all dissipation. Humility like darkness reveals the heavenly lights.
I do not see but a quiet mind may live as contentedly there,obviously that has changed because your neighbours are very likely to blast dindu music all day
one important aspect of Deuteronomy is that the covenant between God and Israel is based off Assyrian vassal treaties. it's cool because1 the treaties are badass and have tons of cool curses2 le jews utilizing the literary forms associated with earthly authority to describe their commitment to their god3 offers cool insight into how israel's understanding of its relation to god evolves when compared with earlier and later books
all that can be summed up with one quote from JesusHe said to them, "But now if you have a purse, take it, and also a bag; and if you don't have a sword, sell your cloak and buy one.
this is the most sentimental, "self-help book" tier schlock
I mean this nicely, but please everyone, it's Revelation, not Revelations. The Book of Revelation.
not even the kjvAre you fucking stupid or what

lel, no not even once would I use that corrupted book
This image doesn't even make sense. It's like when people post fedoras at christians. Your atupid death cult is irrelevant anywhere in the west save for the appalachias and is otherwise propped up by niggers. Stay eternally mad. I know you will. By the way jesus never existed.
by the way Jesus never existedle /lit/ pseudo intellectual misinterpreting nicaea council face :DDD
Revelations isn't even the best book in the New Testament, ya goof. I bet you unironically enjoy Hollywood disaster movies too.
Really? That's what Christfags consider "powerful?" That sounds like something I would've wrote in high school
I just ended up deleting all of cd2 :'
Ecclesiastes is by far the best book in the bible if you take out the obviously added on Afterword by some religious shakey-knee dumbfuck
Jesus never existedMight as well ignore the evidence for evolution while you're at it.
i bet he unironically enjoys the art of john martin too what a pleb
The phrase is "OUT of your element" you repulsive drooling subhuman
forgetting BASED Daniel for more apocalyptic literature
that picStop the fuckin pressesmy picWhich is fake and which is real?
If someone wrote that today they'd be called edgy.
ooga booga you'll go to heck
Only if you don't believe in Gosh
"That's literally just words with no meaning behind them"Its a fucking description you dolt.
By the way Jesus never existed Damn, you have to be pretty stupid as an atheist to fuck up an argument against religion like this. You just did, how does it feel Anon?It's pretty much universal consensus amongst historians that Jesus existed. His divinity? That's obviously up for question, but the dude himself is a fairly well-established historical figure.
It's pretty much universal consensus amongst historians that Jesus existedIt was actually this statement from some christtrip on /x/ that lead to me discovering there are effectively no contemporary sources for his existence and that tacitus/josephus' writings are anything but explicit. Also you're statement "everyone believes xDDD" is apparently not relevant as even a cursory glance of wikipedia will tell you people in europe have been suggesting he is an amalgamation of doomsday prophets of the time.
Kek. Not the other anon, but I have done quite a bit of biblical work in college and the academic consensus is that he definitely existed. If you doubt jesus existed then you would also need to doubt the existence of several other ancient people. For instance, The Anabasis of Alexander by Arrian was written in the 2nd century AD and it is the most important source on Alexander the Great; however, it was written some 400 years after his death. On the other hand, Jesus' life is accounted for at the earliest with Paul's 1st epistle to the Thessalonians in about 52 AD less than 20 years after his purported death in 33 AD; moreover, he is obviously mentioned by the 3 synoptic gospels before the end of the 1st century AD. Stop watching garbage like the Zeitgeist movies and open a scholarly book.
oh my god this is shit
why are you faggots so incapable of selecting genuinely aesthetically pleasing writing? There are far better parts than this shit
Thus Spoke Zarathustra is completely superior to the Bible in terms of its ideas and its prose
Arrian used sources contemporary to Alexander that do not exist today like Ptolemy's history. Jesus of Nazareth was a real person. Jesus Christ is a fictional character based on him.
I know his is real because I've actually seen LoGH
I like the part where jesus hangs around with hookers and is all like "screw The Man, dude!"
How do I get rid of the old book smell?
Spray Windex on your books.
This board really is the most tryhard edgy shit-board on 4chan, holy fuck.
Wow you should spray stone windex down your throat then maybe it wouldn't bother you so much
cut thread here and preserve for all eternity
cut off your nose
he doesn't love that smellhe doesn't sniff every book he buys
Talk about bad taste in book smells
Have you ever had a discussion about a book with someone you don't know? How did it go?
Once I saw a guy reading Infinite Jest on the train and I burted out 'Start with the Greeks' and he looked me blankly.
haha that was me
thats so dumb dude you should be ashamed
thats so smart dudeyou should be proud
once i talked about steven kings with some kids in a bookstore.Man i feel old.
tfw nobody irl wants to talk about books n stuff
tfw you have to resort to strangerstfw you just come off as a sperg
Should I read on a physical book or an e-book? I find myself unable to concentrate while reading books on my computers/tablets, and nothing beats the feeling of a physical book. On the other hand, I could pirate classics if I go with an e-book which saves me some bucks.I can't go with both because I don't like inconsistent.
I could pirate classics if I go with an e-book which saves me some bucks.Find decent second hand book stores and you won't complain about the price of books again.
Physical book of coursehaving electricityFilthy peasantbtw I'm at the library
But I wanna smell new books. Sure old books have distinctive smell too but I can't jack off to it.
having eyesThat's just disgusting, normal people only should read books with Braille font.I told my servant to post in this thread
That's not a nice thing to call one's little brother. What else is he making you do?Anything saucy?
For books that I really care about reading and I want to really mull over, digest, and analyze I buy a physical copy. For stuff that I just want to read for entertainment I get them on my ereader.

I like my Kindle quite a bit. Looking up definitions without whipping my phone for the dictionary app. You can highlight, leave notes, etc. And like you mentioned, we can easily download epubs or whatever format from the internet. I'd say get a Kindle, see how you like it, and like  said, maybe buy physical copies of those books you really care about.
If you read a lot, an e-reader is a godsend, otherwise you'll run out of space for physical books. If you're interested in classics then a lot of them are completely free on Amazon or iTunes because they are no longer under copyright.
When I discovered the free section of the iTunes ebook store I think I jizzed my pants
Why is /lit/ so opposed to worldbuilding/outlining? Is it because these terms are associated with genre fiction? Is it because people brag about their work when they never write anything and only have ideas or the outlining?
something great that was unplanned is thoroughly more impressive than something plannedby adhering to such and such and this and that, this and then that, and this again, it's boring
You think any 500 pages novel has no kind of planning? Just coming up with random shit that serve your themes is much simpler.
he believes that all novels are written like a beat-generation stream-of-conscious piece-of-shitkek
"Worldbuilding" just means creating an autistically elaborate setting for your shitty singleplayer fully railroaded D&D campaign. I dont' see why anyone would have a problem with outlining the structure of a narrative before actually putting it into words though
Do you think there is no worldbuillding in a realistic setting? Take just the houses of the characters, there village/town/city. Characters don't just float around in the air, they have to be somewhere and sometimes the place is important.
unnecessary
No one uses the word to mean that, though.
At least you have to outline the characters. Their relations/motivation/inner conflicts.
I do.
If you are capable of creating genuine personalities, then you already possess them by heart, and require no outlining.
You think the most impressive part of a good book is how it was written?
But a novel has 10 - 250 characters. Won't they seem pretty one-dimensional when you don't outline them.
Not necessarily, but only a few hundred characters in the entire history of literature manage to go beyond one dimension anyway
Because most of it is used to create generic fantasy worlds with dragons, dwarfs, elves, an evil empire and a bunch of irrelevant "sers".
I didn't realize the busboy with 2 lines, or the coworker who called out sick, needed to be fleshed out.
At least the main characters and their families need to be fleshed out. If the busboy had three lines he should be fleshed out too.
kek
it's because those things happen in books, and /lit/ hates book, especially popular ones./lit/ has some peculiar idea that the authors they idolise managed to somehow create their magnum opus without any kind of planning whatsoever
Have read pic related, Population Zero, and Yurop: the American Invasion. Strongly recommend the first two.
fffff didn't finish my post. Meant to say bizzare lit discussion and recommendation thread.
Apple! Apple!
I thought Ass Goblins was okay but a bit too mindless. Anything with more substance in the bizarro genre?
the best Bizarro is really only OK fiction. I read Mellick's Menstruating Mall, which is as stupid as it sounds. childish writing riddled with errors, tries too hard to be irreverent. on the other hand, Andersen Prunty is OK. Bury the Children in the Yard is decent.a couple of the writers in the Starter Kits showed promise, but I don't remember their names. some good stuff in there, anyway.
genre shit
Ulysses
not reading his complete works
Way ahead a'ya, pardner.On Troilus and Cressida now.
reading shitty plays because it's done by a meme authorspook'd
living your life under a spook by being a contrarian faggot le spook'd bruh
Whom are you quoting?
Is it worthwhile to read the plays he didn't completely write or the reconstructed plays?Ie Pericles, measure for measure, Timon, All is true, two noble kinsmen, et al
Sure, read em for the laughs anon.
Absolutely not, in fact I'd skip about 3/4 of the plays. Do read Titus though.
I am.
what are the ESSENTIAL shakespeare reeds
You tell us to skip 3/4 of his plays but recommend his le edgy violent meme play?I bet you like The Game of the Thrones books.
all of it you lazy pleb
I bet you like cock.
all of them
Memes. They're quoting memes.
See justice done on Aaron, that damn'd Moor,By whom our heavy haps had their beginning:Then, afterwards, to order well the state,That like events may ne'er it ruinate.
absolutely essential:Hamlet OthelloMacbethKing LearHenriadTwelfth NightA Midsummer Night's DreamWouldn't hurt to read Julius Caesar, Romeo and Juliet, Much Ado About Nothing, The Taming of The Shrew, and Antony and Cleopatra.
Richard III?
That too.
And all the sonnets. They're just a couple hundred pages, you can manage it.
It's Who Saved Whom, anon
Is it pleb to read him with a translation guide?
Yes. Just get a copy with footnotes, like the Oxford version if you need help with some of the meanings, but a full translated version is pleb.
confirmed for retarded.
shit opinions. titus lovers are horrible hipster fucks, but doubly hipster fucks are those that think titus is better than 3/4 of his plays.
reading a play instead of watching itLITERALLYDOING IT WRONG
the tempest is indisputably essential. i would say at least one of julius and A&C is essential. romeo and juliet should probably be there.
"with" a guide? no. but reading a translation instead of the original when you speak english is pleb. whatever helps you get into him is worthwhile though. eventually you'll get used to it and just be able to read it
I'm on Henry VI part 2. Gonna be on the Tragedies in a month. I honestly don't recommend the complete works, it's like eating pizza every day for months. I was glad it got me to read Measure for Measure though, that shit was great and I would never have thought to read it if I wasn't going through all the works.
oh also I feel this  nigga hard. Most of the plays it feels you're missing out by not seeing it and plays like Merry Wives of Windsor are complete dogshit with the slapstick and accent humor neutered.
not reading his complete works
he thinks you have to see a play to understand itMassivekek
not reading his complete works
Just finished King Henry IV, Part I today - found it underwhelming. The monarchical landscape is so divorced from my own that I find it hard to get into his historical plays. I found most of the characters in King Henry IV to be contradictory beyond when they were deliberately meant to be contradictory in nature. Unlike a more universally applicable play like Hamlet, the human element wasn't convincing enough for me to find any appeal in it really. Some pretty verse, but other than that... not going to read the second part which is apparently worse in any case.
not reading his complete works
Probably true, but less so with Shakespeare. His productions involved very little 'direction' and most of its meaning can be gleamed from reading the script alone.For something like Brecht which is wholly dependent on its direction however, there is little point in reading the script in isolation.
reading or watching a Brecht play O I AM LAUFFIN
not shagging OP's mum
he thinks you have to watch a movie to understand it when you can just read the scriptbrekekkekkek
I don't read the œuvres of hacks, much less well known ones tyvm kthxbai
, 
Where does your lap go when you stand up?
in ur mom
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-1yzoiUIGGs
Lap is not an anatomical descriptor, it is a functional one
Reflexhammerspace.
Where does your fist go when you open your hand?See, I can do it, too.
Yeah Philomena Cunk is pretty funny.
Just finished the The Nightside of the Long Sun. What should I expect further on and what to keep in mind? This novel is much simpler in terms of language compared to the New Sun since it wasn't written in the voice of a self absorbed king of the world, but it still had some powerful scenes, I especially liked the confession. Silk is as the novel goes on more and more interesting with all the subtle changes.
Why would one follow a charismatic person, /lit/? What motive could one have?
I know /lit/ hates Russell's history of western philosophy, but what about his Problems of Philosophy? I see it recommended a lot as a great introduction to philosophy. Is it?
no. read windelband, you pleb.
ive heard good things about kenny anthony's brief history of western philosophy
obviously. /lit/ is retarded when it comes to russell
Muslim here. Ask anything pertaining to the religion of Islam. In regards to its' literary and/or philosophy.
/lit/ is for the discussion of literature. If you want to talk about unfounded beliefs, scientific ignorance, sexism, homophobia, or the perpetuation of archaic and useless ideologies, go to /pol/.
Actually it's well known that /lit/ is open to theological, philosophical and even certain scientific and mathematical discussions, especially since these things often come into direct contact with excellent literature!Perhaps you should be less of a bigot, my /pol/ friend :^
ignoring all religious literary, philosophical and historical merits
Fine I'll bite.What's the best fantasy the Muslim world has produced?
the Quran
What is your opinion on Turkish poetry?Did any good literature ever come out of Islamic Spain?
advocates book that explicitly preaches bigotry. advocates book that explicitly makes claims which can't and will never be proved. if you point this out then you're actually the bigot. mudslime logic.
There's tons. Ibn Tufail's The Self Taught Philosopher is an acclaimed one.
Qu'ran does not preach bigotry.
Why do you guys love blowing yourselves up so much?
That's actually a good question. Suicide bombing has nothing to do with Islam nor self-sacrifice for that matter. Suicide bombing is simply the product of oppressed and deranged folks against developed powers and whatever is in relation to the "evil" behind their oppression.
Why do so many western scholars think the Quran is a composite text and not the direct speech of Mo?
Muslim scholars are more credible. The Qu'uran has an even higher credibility than the Isnad of the Hadith.In other words, many people from different locations and times recited the Qu'uran WORD FOR WORD.All of it traces back to Muhammad. PBUH
Would you be so kind as to recommend me some Arabic/Muslim literature? Not necessarily religious, I mean, just whatever you think are among the greatest works produced.
How does it feel to be led astray by a heresiarch?
Why do women have to cover up and not men? Seems unfair.
arabic /lit/:Elephants by GhanemSeasons of Migration to the North by Tayeb SalihMetamorphosis by KhairyMiramar by Naguib Mafhouzislami /lit/any work by Ghazaliany work by Tim Winter
Thanks Anon. Question though, correct me if I'm wrong, but wasn't Al Ghazali the guy mostly responsible for the "radicalisation" of Islam and going back to the "let's slaughter some infidels" roots?Not that that'd stop me from reading him, I'm just curious.
Some nice architecture, not op btw
no it preaches ignorance and denial :^
there's "ikhtilaf" when it comes to the wearing of the veil. meaning, scholars have differing views. However, what is OBLIGATED, is men lowering their gaze while women are around. There is no "check dat out tho!" in Islam.
Not at all. Ghazali is closely related to Sufism, a concept that the 'extremist' and/or Salafi abhor.
either bring forth evidences or leave the petty back/forth
Arabic literature is mostly poetry.Al-KhansaIbn al-FaridMahmoud DarwishNizar QabbaniAdunisAs for fiction I only know Naguib Mahfouz, Tasha Hussein, and of course the Arabian Nights Nights.This is just Arabic stuff, there's also a large corpus of Persian literature.
Who was the Andalusian guy who made extensive commentaries on Aristotle? And is there another Arab guy who made extensive commentaries on Plato because I'm planning to start with the Greeks?
Yeah we wouldn't want to acknowledge basic human urges, would we!
that's all religions m8you don't see this level of fedora shit on christfag threads
you don't see this level of fedora shit on christfag threadsIt's usually much worse in christthreads tbh,
Averroes m8.Islamic Spain is a really fascinating period, I'd recomnd leading into it.
most religions have a martyr complex and a culture of religious warIslamism is the consequence of religious doctrine in the era of imperialism in a land where foreign domination is commonplace
*reading into itFucking phone.
Al ghazalis' philosophers work highly takes on the Greeks
??? Lowering the gaze helps the youth with their lust, helps against voyeurism, etc It's not about ignoring humans urges, it's about dealing with human urges without destroying the self and submitting to worldly pleasures, a concept that's very foreign to current times
Why are the followers of Islam so violent and murderous? Why are they so intolerant of other beliefs? Why do they treat women so brutally?
So, you think suicide bombing is justified then? Suicide bombing is simply the product of oppressed and deranged folks against developed powers and whatever is in relation to the "evil" behind their oppression.Basically, as a Muslim, you say suicide bombing is unrelated to Islam though Muslims make up the vast majority of suicide bombers, yet you go on to justify it as the product of "oppressed people" that are "rebelling" against developed nations.So, as a Muslim, you think suicide bombing is unfortunate but perfectly justified.
That's not true at all. A female friend that lived in Yemen described how men would stare at her whenever she went outside.
You are referring to Al-khawarij. The Prophet Muhammad already has warned us against these extremist self acclaimed Muslims. Muhammad PBUH describes them as "hardcore" Muslims. They are, according to Muhammad, people who do not understand the faith.
Not at all. I'm answering from an Islamic basis, which is that Islam does not pertain to suicide bombing, not even implicit such type of self sacrifice. Martyrdom is through battle, not suicide.
Yes, there's a difference between what Islam says, and what Muslims do.
It's usually much worse in christthreads tbhYeah, but the fedorafags tend not to portray the christfags as being violent sociopaths like they do the mudslimes
there's nothing wrong with lust. Looking at a woman isn't the same as voyeurism. Your religion is shit, please stay away from civilized countries.
So you believe the developed nations oppress Muslim nations?
nothing wrong with lustYou're reminding me of Michael Scott saying: "whatever happened to sex without consequences?" Topkekcan't even diagnose the trouble society is going through due to lust
Why are there so many of them?Also, why is the majority of the Muslim world so radical?
In some cases, yes. In most cases, Muslim societies are themselves to blame.
Why are Mohammedans so violent and evil?
Not that anon, but it's kind of undeniable how much power foreign political entities have held over the Middle East and how both the US and USSR's invasions and subsequent occupations radicalized already existing discontent.
It's how Arabs are running their societies. They are claiming Islam but run a Jahiliya system pre-Islamic system.A combination of traditional Arab ignorance and greed. Exactly what Islam countered when it first came up - but ignorant traditions still rebirthedBigger problem is; these ignorant traditions are being the plate where Islam is being served.
If you define Mohammedanism as 'perfect and fair for everyone' then nobody will ever be 'true Mohammedans'.
What do you think about Quranists, OP?
That's more of a fact than an opnion, historically at least. The US has been using Middle Eastern nations as pawns in its political chessboard for many decades now, not to mention French Algeria, the creation of Israel & the backstabbing Sykes-Picot agreement all off which which created a lot of resentment.
gives Jews some British owned land, which they were the majority in after they left the Germanic states to escape persecution under fascism, is oppressing Arabs?
There can be no such thing. The Quran itself states that Muhammad PBUH should be followed and used as an example of great human manners and characteristics. Without the Hadith, Quranists wouldn't even know how many Rukooh in 1 sajda. Basic praying principles
But wasn't Muhammad piss be upon him a paedophile and a warlord?
Most religious leaders back then were political leaders, and almost every tribal leader would have been a warlord. As for pedophilia, it was a commonplace for child-marriages in Arab tribal society back then.Not to say that these things are excusable, especially if someone today would do such a thing, but don't project contemporary moral values in a time and place where none such existed.
Muh 6 gorillion
I do Islamic studies at the Catholic university of America, your post is a farce. I'll respond to it when I'm home
Israel was created because Jews terrorised the British to the point where they pulled out due to a lack of motivation to continue with another conflict right after ww2.But yes, I agree that proxy wars during the Cold War has fucked many ME nations over. Then again though, I don't see how the West can have anything to do with the poor living standards in ME countries that have gotten filthy rich, mainly due to oil. I think that's due to the political and social systems in Muslim countries. I'm from Norway and we experienced a similar economic growth as ME nations due to oil, but we always had the system to implement a fair distribution of the profits from those resources. The ME nations did not. Also, many Muslim nations were under the Ottoman Empire. All nations that experience a collapsed empire go to shit right after before building themselves up again from scratch.
Not at all. PBUH was offered all the wealth + leading status in Mecca and turned it down. His marriage to Aisha RA was just another regular marriage to bring big families together, in relation to Abu Bakr RAFunny thing is, Muhammad PBUH was insulted countless of times by the Meccans, yet was never insulted by "pedophile" - I hope you do realize that just in the last century, young marriage was very common?warlord Lol, his main enemy were the Meccans whom he fought for little over 2 decades, accumulating a few battles - the same people whom, before pushing him PBUH to exile, put sanctions on him and his followers, killed many of his followers, etcAt least read up on his PBUH life. There's many reasons on why he's regarded as the greatest human by Muslims and others
The British Land originally belonged to the Ottomans and they only were able to keep it because of the British betraying the rebels they supported. Zionist colonists took the land that people lived on for centuries and today Israel bombs the shit out of Gaza and continues to illegally occupy Palestinian land.Also, the British mandate and Jewish colonization started before the holocaust. The Holocaust just exacerbated preexisting colonization, not caused it.
So you dont find it disgusting when a group of poor niggers gaze and yell at a female civilian who just wants to cross the road
Yes, that's what I said, the Jews immigrated there to escape persecution. Do you have a problem with immigrants now? Fucking BNP UKIP racist scum.
What made the Meccans such bad guys? Sounds like they were doing their own thing when Mohamed came over and kicked their shit in
It was the secular LTTE that made suicide bombing into an artform.*tips fedora*
Don't even try to act like suicide bombing isn't a Muslim area of expertise in theory and practice
I don't hate immigrants, I just don't like them replacing the rule of the original land owners.
Like what's happening in England right now?
Indeed, those who disbelieve in Our verses - We will drive them into a Fire. Every time their skins are roasted through We will replace them with other skins so they may taste the punishment. Indeed, Allah is ever Exalted in Might and Wise.4:56
b-but Jews ORIGINALLY owned the land 3000 years ago.
It's different when we do it kafir. Why are you so racist?
lol really bad shitpostingdid you read anything I just wrote?My point was that the people who lived on the land for centuries were forcibly displaced by colonists, and this continues to this day, with much of Palestine being illegally occupied and Gaza being continually bombed.
I'm sure that's what the Spainiards, Indians, North Africans, and Persians thought as well.
The Jews, at the start of the second world war, were the majority in 'Palestine'. Are you against democracy, too? Are you a Moslem supremacist?
Are you implying that immigrants are forcibly taking the homes of people living in England, backed by a foreign political power, and harshly suppressing any resistance. If so, you're a delusional fucking idiot.samefag falseflaggingwhy the fuck do /pol/tards love falseflagging so fucking muchAre you retarded?
Didn't I just say what made them the bad guys? They put sanctions on Muhammad, tortured his handful of followers, in some cases killed them, isolated them, etc Muhammad and his followers were exiled and left to Medina. Fun fact: Even after all their doing, they still trusted Muhammad with their trusted goods, for he was known as the Al-Amin before preaching Islam. Al Amin = The Trustworthy War started between Muhammad PBUH and the Meccans due to many variables. Them sending spies, assassins, stealing the followers belongings in Mecca, etcFun fact: When PBUH entered Mecca triumphantly after 2 decades of war, he did not look around with vengeance nor pride, rather his head was bowed very low on his horseWhen he asked the Meccans what he should do with them, they replied "you are our nephew, the generous and kind" - no Meccan was killed when Muhammad conquered his own hometown who tortured him.As a matter of fact, Muhammad personally ordered that Abu Sufyan vicious and main commander of the Meccans NOT to be harmed
The Jews aren't colonists, they are immigrants and always have been. Do you just hate them because they're different to you?
What is the verse before thatWhat is the verse after thatWhat is the context of the verseWhat is the majmoua interpretation of the verseIf you cannot answer those questions, then you are unable to understand the verse
Every Muslims duty is to serve the Quran and subvert the laws of the host nation until they are in power. Any attempt to obscure these facts is taquiya, which is a Muslim principle in which lying to unbelievers is justified to push their religion.
You can't insult your way out of this. The state of Israel exists because Jewish immigrants became the majority in that land. You have to realise that Palestinians are the problem there. They are too intolerant of the Jews in that country.
Taqqiya is not Islamic. It's, according to some, a Shiite concoction Do you guys just read headlines about Islam? Verily your knowledge on the matter is dim and infinitesimaly low
I was the one who made the kafir comment as a joke, but I see it got you pretty worked up
t-t-that's not true Pisslam!!!my pisslam is totally perfect and infallible!!
 A similar concept in Sunni Islam is known as idtirar إضطرار "coercion". A related concept is known as kitman "concealment; dissimulation by omission". Also related is the concept of ḥiyal, legalistic deception practiced not necessarily in a religious context but to gain political or legalistic advantage.
? Shiites do not believe in Hadiths. There is no such thing as Taqiya in Sunni Islam
Why do you try so hard to make Islam into a religion of peace when it is clearly warlike? Why not just accept the very clear meaning of the passages? You people are kind of like Christians that deny hell because they don't want their God to have a spine.
Then what are you doing right now?
None of those permit lying. What is permitted is concealing of an individuals' sins, and not to shame himself in the community. This has absolutely nothing to do with revealing Islam to non Muslims. You will need much more than a wiki or anti theist website to have a legitimate argument
that comicSeirosly considering leaving /lit/, this place has been turning into /pol/ ever since that 'Catholic' survey
Zionists advocating for taking away people's homes and repressing any resistance isn't colonialism? Not to say that the Jews as a people as a whole are colonizing Israel. I'm not the one implying that the Palestinians don't exist.A people acting in self defense is intolerance? If someone went into your home, shot your relatives, and started squatting, would picking up a shotgun and shooting back be considered "intolerance"?Intolerant? The Palestinians at least the secular factions not in Gaza have been open for peace for years. How am I using insults any different than you are? You accused me of being against democracy and of being a 'Moslem supremacist'. I don't particularly care for Islam as a religion, or any religion in particular. I just dislike the idea of bombing the shit out of a people that don't deserve it. If you genuinely believe that I want the world to be an Islamic theocracy, you've gotta see a shrink or something, man.
You might feel more comfortable on tumblr, they love your white guilt there.
Islam is not peace, it is a journey to peace. Muslims have to take a stand in this day and age for obvious reasonsFunny thing is, when Muslims don't speak loudly, it's the "see? They're not saying anything about ISIS! They believe in that stuff too'
I posted it as a joke, calm your tits
The Jews were immigrants seeking a better life, I would allow immigrants to steal my home and rape my family, as that is simply their culture. Stop being such a fucking bigot and let the poor Jewish immigrants settle in peace. You are their host, so please accommodate them.
I don't know why people are saying that the new mod sticky banning political discussion means getting rid of /pol/. Most of the political threads were by Marxists and Anarchists, who tend not to go to far-right hugboxes like /pol/
what did you think of Hay bin Yakzan? did you read the Ibn-i Sina version too?
I'm going to say this again.Are you retarded?
if you disagree with Islamic oppression of Jews you are retardedYou sure can debate.
You've been baited.This whole prove youre not intolerant thing is all just him fucking with you man.
Why does /lit/ turn into /pol whenever Islam gets brought up? the Buddhism and Christianity threads are for the most part well informed and have some interesting discussion. Whenever an Islam thread appears it's just /pol/ infographics and MUH WARLORD PEDOPHILE
Because Islam is a barbaric and destructive political ideology for stupid people. There is no literary value in anything Islamic.
And some among them believed in it, and some among them were averse to it. And sufficient is Hell as a blaze.4:55But those who believe and do righteous deeds - We will admit them to gardens beneath which rivers flow, wherein they abide forever. For them therein are purified spouses, and We will admit them to deepening shade.4:57The section is talking about people who have seen part of "the Scripture" and are unbelievers.majmoua interpretationI don't know what that is.
MUH WARLORD PEDOOHILEHow intolerant of people to bring up
 back to the "let's slaughter some infidels" roots?There is no such root. The sluaghters that were done were politic, not religious. Don't mistake the two. Although of course, Islam is probably the most politic religion.About Gazalî, he did change the course of Islam, but he didn't 'radicalise' it. At the time the intellectuals valued mind and logic as much as the word of God, and Gazalî opposed it. It isn't this simple, but this is a good summarisation I think.Turk here. Turkish poetry is divided into many phases and categories and they are all so different from each other, so I could be more helpful if you told me which period you are most interested in.Men do have a dress code as well. They most cover their body from the knee to the ribs.There is Farabî who made commentaries on both Aristo and Plato, check him out.
There are quite a lot of Marxists and Anarchists on /pol/. I think the biggest common denominators on that board as far as politics goes is extreme views and disdain for consumerism + the gubmint
You've been baited.This whole prove youre not intolerant thing is all just him fucking with you man.He was trying to make me prove that I was intolerant? huh. Never really cared for tolerance. I didn't realize I responded to the same post twice. Woops.I just want to practice my writing or rhetoric or whatever.
I know, stopping pedophobia is one of the most important issues of our generation.
Well, I'm a Marxist, and almost every single leftist I've seen that's ever been to /pol/ thinks it's garbage.I wish /leftypol/ wasn't filled with illiterates.
They most covermust*
Just be a moralising, political cunt like Muhammad, then. Remember, if you can't support a claim just say it's god's will.
There is no literary value in anything IslamicFuck off pleb.
Islam contains some disturbing messages. Also /pol/ probably includes a fair amount of Christians and so is tired of discussing that. Buddhism probably isn't considered as relevant to many.
You know, you don't have to pretend to like non-white literature just to seem worldly or left wing, or what ever image you wish to project. Mohammedan literature is primitive and offers nothing new to the more advanced western European literature.
Okay, Islam sympathisers, I have a question for you. If a Muslim immigrant, in western Europe, has a gay son and wants to kill him to save his honour would you allow him to do so, tolerating his culture, or refuse to let the gay boy be killed, thus oppressing the Muslim father?
Not sure if I get what you mean. Why the sharp decline in quality? I wasn't talking about discussion on /pol/ in and of itself, just how similar the Islam threads on /lit/ are to just about every /pol/ thread on the topic i.e., completely shit and uninformative. Christianity teaches some very disturbing things, as does Buddhism. And yet you rarely see insipid discussion and shit-flinging in those threads besides the occasional fedoraposting
Not enough trigger warnings cupcake?
Because contemporary Christianity is benign compared to the barbaric Mohammedans.
making fun of r*pe survivors*tips fedora* m'white boi.
Christanity and Buddhism aren't responsible for the lion's share of religious violence today that Islam is. It's understandable that people would approach the subject with a negative taste in their mouths.
I'm actually azn/white master raceFill out Form 27-B to officially submit your apology and we will send back a notarized copy of your checked privilege in 4-6 weeks
No, /pol/ is just objectively shit. The only people who deny this are dumbasses.I know one socialist that posts on /pol/. When I asked him why, he said he didn't know why he does. I suspect that other socialists who do are the same.
That's why they are uninformed. They hate some Muslims who use Islam to justify evil. Would you hate James Joyce if someone used Finnegans Wake to justify terrorism? True Islam is peaceful and tolerant.
asianwhitechose one faggot
Isn't /pol/ full of National Socialists?
Christianity teaches some very disturbing things, as does Buddhism.Yeah, but Islam is worse.There's probably also a few dedicated trolls.Muslim terrorists and conflict in the middle east are often featured in the news so there's probably a decent number of people who dislike the religion due to association.
I'm telling you why Islam gets this reaction, I don't hate discussion of Islam
Yeah, leftist and think /pol/ is garbage. I never saw this "disdain for consumerism" anon speak of as well. But maybe cause I just open, read the 1st page and close it because it always seems like total garbage.
If by "National Socialists" you mean edgy teenagers pretending to be Hitler, than yes.
That shouldn't get in the way of quality discussion and study though. It'd be like letting fedorafags get away with shitposting because they had bad experiences growing up under ChristianityAlso127 posts, 29 posterskek
Maybe your friend is just an edgy teen pretending to be Peter Kropotkin.
The majority of /pol/ already left to their exodus site long ago. The people left are the ones who have always been here. Stop using /pol/ as a boogey man.
And don't have pretend to be literate or have any understanding of eastern history, theology, philosophy or literature when you're obviously only here to score cheap political points you dumb /pol/tard.Daily reminder that China, Persia and the near east were far ahead of the semi-iliterate backwater that was Europe for many centuries in the middle ages.
I go on there now and see threads calling Mike Brown jr a criminal and the n-word. It hasn't changed a bit.
and your sources are pro-theistthe problem with these arguments is that the sources tend to be on one wing or the other, and thus the cycle of shit continuesAnyway I was a muslim for most of my childhood up until my late teens, then I realized that such a demarcation on anyone's life for the soul purpose of pleasing something as amorphous as a deity was so fucking ludicrous and strenuous that I just had to leave.Yeah sure justify all the other crap, debate all the other crap, butin the end, it doesn't even matter
I agree that discussions could be better, I'm just explaining why it isn't.
he bought the 'dark ages' mythKill yourself, you ignorant cunt.
Are you that Moroccan dude who BTFO'd Hamza Tzortzis on here a while ago?
I'm whatever it's more convenient to be at the time
Nazis, starting with Hitler, have just used 'socialism' as a demogogary. They don't advocate for the abolishment of class or the socialization of private property.A lot of the right is an inverted leftism. Fascists want to deal with consumerism, but the way they do it doesn't deal with the root cause of it all because to do so would be materialist.How am I using /pol/ as a boogyman? After the exodus, the /pol/acks have been leaking out of their containment board.
no, i'm Australian :^
Mike Brown was a criminal though, that fact was never up for debate in the caseAnyway maybe /pol/ bounced back some, but most of them are gone to that other website
The Nazis were socialist, just get over it. You don't need to protect your ideology all the time.
Oh, so being black is a crime now?
National socialism did in fact have socialist elements for German citizens, stop with this "hurr durr it's not ackshual socialism shit"
Assaulting a store owner and stealing is
must be hard to accept that not everyone is an aryan supremacist.
He didn't do that, though, you stupid /pol/tard. He was 'suspected' of it because of his skin color and the police officer shot him illegally. Don't let /pol/ tell you the 'facts', son. They're a bunch of closeted racist teenagers who would never say the shit they spout to black man's face.
I wasn't that anon, I was the other guy that responded.Nazis don't believe in the abolishment of class or the socialization of private property, and both are key components of what makes a socialist ideology. And those that did were purged in the Knight of Long Knives, and even the Strasserites were still anti-communist, just like the rest of the Nazi party. The Nazis borrowed the tactics and organization etc from the socialists and inverted their purpose for the opposite ends. It doesn't matter anyways being that the word socialist has been corrupted and bastardized to the point where anyone call himself a fucking socialist. The way I see it: socialists who refuse to call themselves communist are not socialists.
https://youtube.com/watch?v=mkOfqIXkBRE
How do you know he actually stole, though?
In the video he grabs a handful of Swisher Sweets, the store clerk that he assaulted verified this as well
Yep, a racist store clerk agreeing with the white police narrative. Remember Rubin Carter?
I've been baited for long enough
Go back to your hug box, white boi.
so how young is haram?nine...? eight? if I move to Saudi then can I buy an underage QT3.14 for cheap?
/pol/
Michael Brown would have had his hands cut off according to Sharia law
For being black?
And I know Christians who've had sex before marriage. Unbelievable, I know.
/ISIS/
For stealing
He didn't steal.
Try the group of merchant boys who sleep in a cave for 300 years and didt get any older it is implyed that the cave is a time machine
genre fiction
This is pretty common in Arab countries. I remember walking around Morocco with a female friend and seeing necks snap everywhere she went. Never happened in anywhere like Malaysia or Indonesia though, I wonder if it's a cultural thing
http://www.historyofphilosophy.net/islamic-worldJust dropping this while the retards are arguing about muh 21st century Middle East politics.
spending centuries trying to justify a dogmatic bookWhy didn't they just do away with Islam entirely?
Why does your kind in hordes invade the once beautiful great civilizations of the West and ruin them?
Istanbul  ConstantinopleThis is coming from an actual European, by the way.
It is a surah in the Quran, so.. not fiction
the Korannot fiction
If you're muslim you are not european.
says who?
Spain was a dirty visgoth shothole before the Moors arrived brought with then bathing, philosophy and art.Please learn some history before making such retarded statements, preferably from books rather than /pol/.
What a disgusting thread.Why can't we have a civilized thread on Islam like we do on Buddhism and Christianity.
that's jew propaganda; visigoths and other white tribes were actually keen seekers of wisdom and the arts, that's part of the reason that they went to rome, but the jews corrupted the leaders into sacking it
Because Islam isn't civilized.
Sam Harris pls.
The same can be said for the reconquista.The white catholic spaniards btfo the dirty backwards mudslimes out of Iberia and sailed off to conquer the new world.
What is it about Islam that makes it uncivilized?It's an old and diverse tradition, labeling it with one word is wrong.But even if we assume that it isn't civilized, that still doesn't excuse all the disgusting /pol/ shitposting. People on /pol/ haven't read anything since 'To Kill a Mockingbird' in high school and now they think everybody on everything from reloigion to science.
What is it about Islam that makes it uncivilized?It is very dogmatic and not open to interpretation.Its morals are very backwards. It advocates for violent behavior, and for abhorrant treatment of women.What makes me the most mad is how countless civilizations have been destroyed by the mudslimes.Christian mesopotamia, christian syria, the levant, armenia, the byzantine empire, coptic egypt, visigothic spain, greece, the balkans, motherfucking persia, afghanistan, and finally, india, have all been permanently damaged by the barbaric mudslime hordes.
Because Islam sucks
what is wrong with violent behavior, and for abhorrant treatment of women?
Modern Christians aren't blowing themselves up m80
what is wrong with violent behavior, and for abhorrant treatment of women?I didn't say it was wrong. I said it was uncivilized.
ah ok
What makes you an authority on Islam, more so than ISIS?
why does the concept of paradise sound like disneyland on steroids?
suggest criticism of a flagrantly violent ideologybigotryyyy ahhhh
It is very dogmatic and not open to interpretation.This is not true though, there are countless interpretations of Islam. This has always been the case.morals are very backwards. It advocates for violent behavior, and for abhorrant treatment of women.These are your opinions, your personal understanding and interpretation of Islam. Many Muslims who are not violent and treat women respectfully claim to be better Muslims, and they can back their claims with scripture as evidence, in the same way that you probably can.What makes me the most mad is how countless civilizations have been destroyed by the mudslimes.This proves that you hate Muslims and that you're innately biased against them and will never be convinced that they're not as bad as you think. It's pointless to argue with people who have already made up their mind.Christian mesopotamia, christian syria, the levant, armenia, the byzantine empire, coptic egypt, visigothic spain, greece, the balkans, motherfucking persia, afghanistan, and finally, india, have all been permanently damaged by the barbaric mudslime hordes.Hardly, many of these regions thrived under Muslims. Not necessarily because of Islam, but still.
Your comment offends me kuffarAccording to my religion I now have the right to kill you unless you convert to Islam.
This is not true though, there are countless interpretations of Islam. This has always been the case.The Qran is supposed to be the word of god and all that jazz, rendering interpretation impossible since it's needed to be taken literally.These are your opinions, your personal understanding and interpretation of Islam.No, these are the facts. The doctrines of Islam are incompatible with western civilization, which is built around the values of liberty and equality under the law.Many Muslims who are not violent and treat women respectfully claim to be better Muslims, and they can back their claims with scripture as evidence, in the same way that you probably can.I don't give a shit about your anecdotal evidence. I'm sure some guys from ISIS donate to charity. The fact remains that Islam is an incredibly violent and backwards religion. The most backwards, in fact, of all the major religions.This proves that you hate Muslims and that you're innately biased against them and will never be convinced that they're not as bad as you think. It's pointless to argue with people who have already made up their mind.Yes, I hate muslims for ruining everything, the same way I hate a plague of locusts.Hardly, many of these regions thrived under Muslims. Not necessarily because of Islam, but still.If by "thrived" you mean "became irrelevent shitholes".Egypt, Persia and Mesopotamia used to be the centers of civilization in the pre-islamic world. Now, not so much...
Islam is not at all closed to interpretation, you're only displaying how little know.Also history isn't some black & white narrative of "evil dirty mudslimes vs strong beautiful christians" in many cases they brought improvements to the quality of life like Spain, and encouraged scientific/philosophical endeavours - especially the Abbasid caliphate with Islamic Golden Age with its breakthroughs in medicine, science, math, and preservation of Greek philosophy.Again, read more books, you obviously have a lot biases against this particular religion. You're judging something very historically complex and hetergenous from the its modern state of violence and repression.
But...but...Muslim societies were the cradle of civilization 1,000 years ago. They banged rocks together and herded goats. This is a totally valid excuse for how shitty Muslim societies are today.Yeah guys. Islamic civilization was awesome a millennia ago. How come you guys don't accept that as a valid excuse for what Muslims are doing today?
it's literally an epic poem, it's not a literal text, you childtake a theology class for once. tired of these shitty straw man atheist arguments
I don't have time for this bullshit.Quran is open for interpretation, and it is. Otherwise you wouldn't see Muslims fighting over which interpretation is correct.Read up on Islamic history, I recommend 'The Venture of Islam'. Don't dismiss it because you think it's "politically correct" just because you don't agree with the all content.And the last statement is very wrong, Egypt, Persia and Mesopotamia all thrived under Muslims. Now, not so much...You're clearly then basing your views on Islam and Islamic history based on what you see today. That's like me dismissing the Tang dynasty of China as barbaric because of the Cultural Revolution. Read history objectively. Contemporary geo-political situations in the Middle East are on one thing and 9th century Middle East are another.Nice strawman, nobody used it as an excuse.
Drinking in Islam? I know a good number of instructors/exchange-students that drink.but only in private They hide this from their family/friends generally.Is there a stigma with drinking, or is it expressly forbidden?
Islam is not at all closed to interpretation, you're only displaying how little know.Yes it is. The Qran is the word of god. It is to be taken literally.Also history isn't some black & white narrative of "evil dirty mudslimes vs strong beautiful christians" in many cases they brought improvements to the quality of life like Spain, and encouraged scientific/philosophical endeavours - especially the Abbasid caliphate with Islamic Golden Age with its breakthroughs in medicine, science, math, and preservation of Greek philosophy.The importance of the Islamic golden age is extremely overrated. The intellectual contributions under the caliphate are smaller than the intellectual contributions of christian mesopotamia and egypt, and of zoroastrian persia.Again, read more books, you obviously have a lot biases against this particular religion."Read more books", hilarious coming from a mudslime who has only read a single book in his whole life, the Qran.You fucking faggot should read more books, perhaps you'll realize how much harm your barbaric pedophile cult has caused the world.
O you who have believed, indeed, intoxicants, gambling, [sacrificing on] stone alters [to other than Allah ], and divining arrows are but defilement from the work of Satan, so avoid it that you may be successful.
Quran is open for interpretation, and it isNope, it's the word of Allah. It's not supposed to be taken in a metaphorical sense.Read up on Islamic history, I recommend 'The Venture of Islam'.I'll check it out.And the last statement is very wrong, Egypt, Persia and Mesopotamia all thrived under Muslims. They were shadows of their former selves. You're clearly then basing your views on Islam and Islamic history based on what you see todayNo, I'm bashing it based on its historical record of destroying advanced civilizations.That's like me dismissing the Tang dynasty of China as barbaric because of the Cultural Revolution.No that would be like you saying that the mongols set back China hundreds of years, which you would be completely correct to claim. Read history objectivelyThat's rich coming from a mudslime, who are the most fanatic people on earth. Contemporary geo-political situations in the Middle East are on one thing and 9th century Middle East are another.I never mentioned contemporary middle eastern politics. I'm talking about the fucking tragedy of a bunch of bedouin camelfuckers destroying the birthplace of civilization.
I guess I could understand how some Muslims would drink considering how vague this is.
"They ask you about intoxicants and gambling: say, "In them there is a gross "ithm" sin, and some benefits for the people. But their sinfulness far outweighs their benefit." 2:219There are some other passages. If I were islamist, I wouldn't drink, seriously. The repetition makes it less vague, I think.
Has verses about how you should beat women who don't obey you."It's a poem, bro! It's not supposed to be taken literally. You're only supposed to figuratively beat women, duh."
Incapable of defending what the Quran says.Better say its open to interpretation so I don't have to explain anything or make excuses for anything.
Fucking kek'd
/pol/ is like King Midas, except everything it touches turns to shit rather than gold
You can say the exact same about what happened 2,000 years ago.But regardless, I don't support Israel in any way. I wouldn't say I support the Palestinians either though. It wouldn't surprise me if an internationally recognised Palestine turned into the same raghead regime like the rest of them. that cartoonYeah you're right. Now, that's simply because the Palestinians don't know how to build proper rockets. Hamas/Palestine would wish their rocket to have the same effect as the right picture, they just don't know how to create those rockets.
Let's talk about the creative process, what are some of the wilder writing rituals you've heard of? how do you get into the zone? what does your favorite author do? do you drink or smoke when you write? do you edit a lot?
I try to write in my room where there's no distractions, take notes on paper and type up the material itself on a laptop with no internet. No smoking in the house and I can't write for shit when I drink.My most idiosyncratic writing habit is that sometimes I try to jot down a note while Im driving. Wish I had more interesting rituals I guess but my current system lets me produce as well as I probably ever will
how do you get into the zone?Ask this guy.
bergmantarkovsky
They're pretty equal as directors. Bergman made better movies because he knew how to write.But in terms of directorial ability,KurosawaBergman=Tarkovsky
Which Bergman movie would you recommend? I watched Fanny and Alexander and it was ok, but nothing special. Should I watch the complete version?

Kurosawa, lol.
It's true
persona or wild strawberries
why are you so stupid you can't google and answer that for yourself?
Hey /lit/ i'm new to this board so sorry for probably beating a dead horse .Are Tolkien's Lord of the Rings trilogy a good read? Or are they just entry level garbage for dumb-dumb's?Also recommend some essential entry level books that aren't garbage. I got into heavy reading about a year ago but i don't really know where to go next.
A new general thread was just made for Fantasy&Sci FI~But yeah, it's really good.
fucking walden dude
entry level books that aren't garbageThe StrangerThe Crying of Lot 49Notes from Underground
Dubliners
Stoner - John Williams If on a Winters Night a Traveler - CalvinoDeath of Ivan Ilych - Tolstoy V - Pynchon The Tunnel - Sabado Some of my favorite entry-levels. Disregard all other posts and pursue these
V. isn't as entry level as The Crying of Lot 49 when it comes to Pinecone if only because it's longer.
Yeah but I'm not the biggest fan of TCoL49 and I think V is leagues better. It's also not a hard read
Which trilogy?
V. is one of my favorite Pinecones as well but if the threads here where people have tried reading it have shown me anything is that it's too complicated to really be considered entry-level by current standards.
Tokien practically invented a fucking genre, dudeAt the very least it's better than Neuromancer
Are you swriously making that question? G. Martin cleans his pillow with his tongue after Tolkien takes a shit on it.
better than Neuromancer
what's up with all of the nerd lit on here tonight
Mhm perhaps you're right. Well OP, if you're interested in post modernism, try the crying of lot 49 or inherent vice ehhh not my favorite or if you're feeling up for a challenge, try tackling V. If you like that, I highly recommend Mason & Dixon, my favorite of his works.
All books are for nerds.
oh yeah
What's up with you participating in every nerd lit on here tonight?
Movie poster covers
sorry for being a dick
All I've been seeing is /pol/ and /r9k/ shitposting.
There are two ways an unknown tripfag can garner attention - quality i.e. some gimmick or quantity
Cover might be shit, but these new revised editions are the best since Alan Lee's illustrated edtion from 1990.
did you forget that, friend?
Cover might be shit, butNo but's. It is shit.
How the fuck could you have not read The Lord of The Rings? What the duck are you?
No. Tolkien is not worth reading. Read Proust instead.
you can find another edition with Alan Lee's illustrations, but without the utter shit movie covers from the utter shit movies. I'd hate to be reminded of those fucking movies every time I wanted to sit down to enjoy the Hobbit book.
What advice would you give to a generation Z writer or poet? Is he to continue the post-postmodern tradition or advance literature in a new wave? If so, what kind?
You-Liss-IssYou-Liss-EezYou-Liss-Ess
huh? this was my fav album at one point. what part is that at?
What makes you think that is in the album? You think I just have pictures of Ulysses lying around on my computer?
You-li-seesAt least that's how Zadie Smith says it, which is good enough for me.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=f_uAav8L5EY
Grimes ultimate waifu
O-Dees-ee-us
you didnt say pic unrelated
As long as you ignore her music,physical appearance, and love of mayonnaise then maybe.
http://m.youtube.com/watch?v=-BGlFsf9DM8
youlessease
Holy shit she loves mayonnaise? I'm even more in love.
An-Tig-Uhn-Ee
when ultra pop sellout faggots emulate underground tape aesthetics I hate it
Please?
as like a way to troll new people? I like it. Approach Steven King like he is Dostoevsky
it's a fucking wiki. add it yourself
he's like a dostoevsky with more insight and wit
beat me to it.
inb4 this nigga dies and academia starts sucking his dick
d-don't say that. King and Cormac are the only two authors we that I'm actually dreading the day they croak.
not including any of his novellasincluding shit like Dreamcatcherusing the covers of the shittiest editionsimplying you need a big chart to understand an entry-level author like King implying you need to ask us permission to put your crappy flowchart in the wiki
I just vomited a little in my mouth.So good job.
I can never fucking tell when anyones being sarcastic anymore
DFW one day we'll no longer have a spry little baby-boomer goblin to delight us with spoopy stories;_;
Symptoms of the post-ironic age my friend
i don't know when i'm being sarcastic anymore
Too true, friend.
you could read thator you could read the same amount of other books and become a literal intellect.
thinks reading books recommended on /lit/ makes him a 'literal intellect"I come here less and less because ever time I do I read shit like that that makes me cringe.
Can we put this in the wiki too? I think it will be very valuable to new readers.
Yeah seriously. This whole thread is just a mess.Have a god damn feeling about something. PLEASE.
putting words in someone's mouth until you get mad
I see you've never read any Wolfe.
No ChristineNo MiseryNo novellasNot including the Tommy Knockers ironicallyIncluding anything from the post-drugs eraImplying you can't start with any book written before he was hit by the van.
Oh, academia.
Only SK book I've read was The Standit was total fucking garbageyou can tell that the guy was just making it up as he went along, from the fact that after 200 pages of characters having sex and accomplishing literally nothing, he decides to kill off half the cast to get things moving againmakes me cringeback to /v/
where the fuck is Insomnia? DeadZone? Christine? Different Seasons?
Same place as the rest of King's books.
Change it so all of them are under the "Start here with his most accessible novel:"
On Writing is really THAT good?I am in the first 20 or so pages and it seems just a biography and how he pagiarized his real life to make books.
If you guys like Steven King you should check out Cell. It's about telepathic/telekinetic cell phone zombies :}
plagiarized his real life
shitting on stand by meget your pleb taste out of here
How exactly do I start with the Greeks? How do I start with literature?Got really into film a little over a year ago, and understanding the film canon was easy, knowing to start with Melies and Lumiere - even specific movements - all of film history was easy to understand.Trying to get into literature now and the lit canon is overwhelming, where do I start? Is there some chart with all texts in chronological order?
start with the odyssey
The Bacchae is great, promise me you'll read it anon?
Will do.Started Brothers Karamazov a while ago before deciding I want to fully delve into the lit canon. After I finish it I'll start with the Greeks.
To expand on my request. What's a good book to help me understand the history of literature and it's canon?
This graphic pisses me off everytime because they put Aristophanes as the first playwright to read. This couldn't be more incorrect, Aristophanes frequently references Euripedes and it happens in The Acharnians. It is foolish to read him before at least some familiarity with the tragedians.
Go through the canon in chronological order like you did with film? It's not exactly hard.
And what would chronological order be? As I said before, what's a good book on the history of literature?
Don't follow that flowchart; follow this one, it's far superior. Also read what the guy has wrote at the bottom.
Thanks
The Mynott translation of Thucydides is GOAT
So after the Greeks where do I go?
Wherever you like. You could follow Bloom's canon, find a period of history you like and research it and read its literature, do what you like really
http://sonic.net/~rteeter/greatbks.html#indexesThere you go
What's the RedLetterMedia of literature?Are there any funny podcasts or whatever shitting on bad books?
If there is then it's probably just as dumb and boring
Can someone recommend some fiction novels that take place in the 50s/60s involving men in black, aliums, government involvement in UFOs, etc?
Majestic-Whitley StrieberI'm not quite sure since I haven't read it
What books does /lit/ recommend on the war of the roses?
You're welcome goddamnit
heh
le ned stark is Richard Plantagenet and le robb stark is Edward the 4th XDOP check out Dan Jones.
As Christine Carpenter has written, the Wars of the Roses “have been a problem to historians almost from the moment they occurred,” not least because contemporary accounts tended to be “devoid of any explanation for what happened.” Nineteenth-century historians tended to view the age itself as one of transition before the “victorious reign” of the Tudors—later amended—which made the wars a reflection of feudalist chaos and governmental weakness. With the revision of this picture, the nobility of the period has been redeemed, and the violence of the wars minimized—or at least, as Carpenter 1997 puts it, “no one is now pressing for a return to the picture of wholesale destruction over a thirty-year period” p. 21. Though books on the subject are plentiful, for a reflection of these newer views, see Carpenter 1997 and, particularly regarding the military perspective, Goodman 1981.Carpenter, Christine. The Wars of the Roses: Politics and the Constitution in England, c.1437–1509. Cambridge, UK: Cambridge University Press, 1997.Drawing on the legacy of K. B. McFarlane, Carpenter focuses not on the wars themselves but the interaction between the court and the provinces, the reign of Henry VI and the role of monarchy in the polity and constitution, and the impact of wars on the nobility, gentry, commoners, and church.Goodman, Anthony. The Wars of the Roses: Military Activity and English Society, 1452–97. London: Routledge and Kegan Paul, 1981.An immensely detailed and researched work that illuminates the interplay of politics and military affairs, as well as the logistics of the wars. Though weaker on the political dimension of the conflict, the military narrative constitutes one of the best overviews of the subject.Davies, C. S. L. Peace, Print, and Protestantism, 1450–1558. London: Hart-Davis MacGibbon, 1976.A good survey of the period, though stronger on the 15th century. Argues against distinctions between “medieval” and “early modern,” with continuities exceeding any hard disruption. Among other points of emphasis are the fluidities of allegiance in the Wars of the Roses, and the illusion of power, rather than the reality, created by the Tudor governments.Hicks, Michael A. English Political Culture in the Fifteenth Century. London: Routledge, 2002.Examines the Wars of the Roses through the prism of what Hicks argues was an essentially stable English political culture in the 15th century. Useful discussions of political governance and machinery, perceptions of the law, class, and corruption, and the interactions of various estates across the realm.
English Political Culture is the only one on lib genhttp://gen.lib.rus.ec/book/index.php?md5=A12DA022D739F97060C977B58360D79D
The Sunne in Splendour.There's so much stuff based on Shakespeare's pro-Tudor propaganda, it's actually pretty sad.No, Richard wasn't an ugly, evil hunchback.
You're doing God's work, Anon.Loyaulté me lie
Dawkins does a lot of debates, but does he ever engage more serious theologians? I'd like to see him engage John Milbank, but I doubt that would happen.
milbank would probably get wrecked because he's too thoughtfuli mean is milbank good at making snarky quips and saying offensive things?
No, he doesn't do that sort of thing, but he would know his subject extremely well. I imagine his answers would be quick if the questions were shallow.
professional theologiansCan we just look past the fedoras for a second and acknowledge that there's no getting past the common sense arguments against belief in Christianity? Srsly, it's like some types of intellectualism are just ways of dancing and flying about a core of pure bullshit a fallacy
Several Apostles died for something they made up just so they could live in poverty and be persecutedPaul left a position of considerably authority, joining the people whom he persecuted, so he could be persecuted himself and die for it...all for shits and gigglesEbin, m80
well delusion is a strong word...
we can't look past fedoras this time because underlying your comment is an implicit scientismthere's no reason why theism would be pure bullshit when you look at human understanding as a wholeonly if you have a strictly scientistic view admittedly, the default view of most today does it seem that way
what are cultsYeah the moonies are sure devoted that means their religion is true
Except cults have a particular leader. The cult around Christ was strongly tied to him having come back from the dead. So the Apostles made all made that up together in a conspiracy? And then were willing to die for it?
Dawkins doesn't debate fundamentalists or extremistsAlso, he's always said that he despises theologiansscientismplease kill yourself
Dawkins doesn't debate fundamentalists or extremistsRight, we're talking about John Milbank, bruh
HOW
DARE
Milbank is pretty much responsible for the adoption of the made up word "scientism". he can get in the fucking sack
YOU
The term scientism frequently implies a critique of the more extreme expressions of logical positivism[3][4] and has been used by social scientists such as Friedrich Hayek,[5] philosophers of science such as Karl Popper,[6] and philosophers such as Hilary Putnam[7] and Tzvetan Todorov[8] to describe the dogmatic endorsement of scientific methodology and the reduction of all knowledge to only that which is measurable.[9]
the dogmatic endorsement of scientific methodology and the reduction of all knowledge to only that which is measurable.this isn't even what it isthis is being kind by making it sound like logical positivismbut really it's a kind of unreflective naive realist metaphysics about any literally any kind of object a scientist might posit in his theories
they can all get in the sack, too.you too anon. get in.
Paul literally fell from a horse and saw Jesus.If that were to happen today, we would put him in a mental institute.
Also, why is it that /lit/ get this fixations about certain meme philosophers so easily? Milbank? really?
zizek mentions him a lot and wrote at least one book with him
not knowing how cults functionsKek
And to persecute women. I've heard that Christian persecution in that time period is exaggerated. Romans did create wastelands and call it peace, but they didn't persecute people of different faiths unless they didn't pay their taxes, include the emperor in their prayers, or were general rabblerousers. Christians and Jews, incidentally, were prone to these because of the belief in one true God, whereas their polytheistic peers had a much easier time living with people of other religion. tl;dr Christians didn't get persecuted because they were Christian, they got persecuted because they were rabblerousers. Or so I've heard. Anyone have any insight or books they'd care to share on the topic?
didn't pay their taxesRender unto Caesar.include the emperor in their prayersbecause they weren't wishy washy pagans who worshiped pantries and sticksgeneral rabblerousersonly because of the above
because they weren't wishy washy pagans who worshiped pantries and sticksHaha, just people nailed to them. Because of what exactly? I'm not sure that a pejorative characterization of pagans really answers any question I had.
arent you supposed to be dead?
Christians didn't get persecuted because they were Christian, they got persecuted because they were rabblerousers.A significant part of Christ's teachings involved nonviolent resistance of the oppressive Roman authority. They weren't "rabblerousers" who happened to be Christians; they were rabblerousers BECAUSE they were Christians.
, 
ITT: we describe a fantasy book or series in 10 words or less.I'll start, Pic relatedeveryone dies
Wow thanks for spoiling the ending.
Any fantasy book or series in 10 wordsRead real literature and leave this board forever, subhuman scum
tripfagthinking he isn't worst than subhuman scumYou are the reason we have all those Tumblgay and redshit invaders
Fantasy and genre fiction and all that shit is caused by Tumblr and Reddit. It has nothing to do with literature and needs to get off this board.
just saw this Let us report this tripfag on sight please.
it's one guy spamming fantasy threads because he too assmad to be confined to a general thread
I was here for 5 years and all the books I read from then to now has been recommended by /lit/. You just arrived with your pretentious trip and think you can "Lord" it over us?Fuck offbtw they are all fantasy"tips"
This is the first thread I made for the week, pray tell, who can one be "spamming" something if it was his first attempt?I didn't see a General Thread, but this isn't for "general discussion". It's just a game to see how well you can condense a large body of work in the smallest amount of words as possible.I don't see DFW, Prose, Greeks, Zizek, Hedonist, Marx, Atheism, etc etc etc get General threads.You fags just spam them kicking other threads off the board
saw piccame expecting a malazan threadgets spoiled?sees thisRead real literature and leave this board forever, subhuman scum
just don't open the thread, you faggot
nothing to do with literatureLiterature, in its broadest sense, is any written workThis is the fucking books board, not the "Flexing how smart I am" board.
Ite, imma do oneThe Magician by Lev Grossman Harry Potter travels to Narinania to defeat voldemort.
Lolita by Humble HumbertTo Do: Damage vagina, commit murder. Check, check.
OP asks for fantasy sperg lord posts lolitaDo you have a comprehension problem?
Just start reading Gardens of the moon, is it any good?
not fantasizing about banging underage poon2015 common erashig.mobi
Nobody knows the true ramifications of the ending events
Malazanutter dogshit
It's iffy, you get dropped in the middle of everything it only takes finishing the book for everything done to make sense, which I enjoy.... the OCD-Autistic readers however can't handle things not being set out in a straight foward order.
nothing says "d-do i fit in guys" like the genre fiction meme and the cuck meme
We do know how it will end.Mortals will ascend to take the place of the shards, or all the shards will be rejoined making the "one true God"
 Ninja Bump
To page 15 I go.
This looks like the tile of my bathroom in the house I grew up in. I've used them in a story, too. In third grade.
I had meant the ending of Hero of Ages, specifically, since not everyone knows the significance of Ruin and Preservation.Also it would probably make more sense for Adonalsium to be "put back together" but remember there is the group that opposes Adonalsium and they have a weapon created specifically for defeating Adonalsium, which may or may not still be in existence.
AdonalsiumWtf is that?
here's a template: ______ tries to be tolkien
muh tumblrmuh reddit
:-
he thinks literature means "pretentious poetry and philosophy"
I'm serious, I don't know what it is.Smiley face aside, that map doesn't answer the question either.
against fantasy and genre fictionhas a fantasy online name such as "tallis"I have to screenshot this pseudo-intellectual who thinks not discovering books that increase creativity and visualization are not literature.
turns of tripcode Hur dur I agreeIf you agree you are insecure, insignificant and belong on r9k. Seriously, if your narrow minds are only confined to books that you don't even enjoy, what is the point of reading? Don't tell me you actually think it makes you "smarter" because you regurgitate others thesis and interpretations of books and don't actually come up with your own.inb4 "I had just happened to have the same belief when I read it"
Google it?apparently there are 16 of the shards like Ruin and Preservation, they call came from some place called Adonalsium or something. I've only read the Mistborn books so I'm not sure how the others tie into it.
The end of Hero of Ages is the first instance in which Adonalsium was mentioned. Cosmere is his meta. Stormlight is the only other one so far in terms of importance in which its series is the most Cosmerically vital as of now.
This is me faggot  If I said came expecting a malazan threadDoesn't that mean I like fantasy and came in this thread to discuss it?I was just pointing out the shit pretentious e/lit/ist say.
Aren't the Shards suppose to join up to make a one true God?Wasn't it one being and when it was shattered his personalities/emotions shattered alongside it?
dubsbump
one true GodI'm more curious as to where you get your info from.Adonalsium wasn't a 'being' but we don't yet know if Adonalsium was man-made vs. natural, or if anyone was a 'Sliver' of Adonalsium.
Maybe I'm getting mixed up, but I remember when I started Warbreaker years ago, and was just getting into Sanderson. Their was talk about the shards being part of a whole/being or something to that extent ....I've read literally hundreds of fantasy books since then so.... maybe I'm mixing it up with something else?
No, that's right, but your first post was assumptuous.'God' would not be a term Adonalsium should be defined by.
Abusive father convinces schizo bastard son to an hero for love.
What would it be defined by?What is the most loose definition of a God?I'm sure with all the abilities each shard has shownespecially the one that affects only worms, who then allow birds to see the future, when they are combined that being/thing, would be a very power omnipotent bastard with the power to created life from nothing, and destroy whole civilizations .fantasy posts the bibleIf the bible is indeed fantasy, that means most of the world's population, millions if not billions, believes in magic and the practices it on a daily basisprays and chants empowers their magically God.This would also mean that the Christians are the biggest Hippocrates in the world. The killed thousands if not millions for believing or practicing in the occult.... while practicing it themselves....
If the bible is indeed fantasy, that means most of the world's population, millions if not billions, believes in magic and the practices it on a daily basisprays and chants empowers their magically God.This would also mean that the Christians are the biggest Hippocrates in the world. The killed thousands if not millions for believing or practicing in the occult.... while practicing it themselves....Yes, I'm glad you understand.
I retract my previous statement.It's not a 'God' in the traditional Christian sense but it's easily 'Godlike'. However, remember that we do not know if Adonalsium is natural or artificialwe do not know if the opposition's weapon succeeded in whatever its purpose may have beenIIRC, the worm deal on First of the Sun was natural, and I do remember that there was no Shard on the planet at the time the story took place.Also remember that Shards affect their Shardholder's personality over time. A good example is Sazed who can barely act due to the opposing Shards combined into Harmony. If Adonalsium broke off different ways, different Shards would have been created.
Fantasy and genre fiction and all that shit is caused by Tumblr and Reddit.You heard it here first. Tolkien used Tumblr every day.
Is this worth reading for an atheist? How much Hegel do I need to know?
Is this worth reading for an atheist? Depending on your fedora.How much Hegel do I need to know?None at all if you get a version with footnotes.
If you want to understand existentialism, then yeah it's pretty essential
Is this worth reading for an atheist?I wasn't at all convinced by the conclusion of his argument but it's nicely written and follows a certain logic. The book can actually be read as a novel and fare pretty well in that regard.
It's Friday night again, at least for us Americans.What are you reading, and what are you drinking?
Obviously I'm on 4chan.I'm drinking Smirnoff Vodka with ice, fuck my life.
drinking alonereading portrait of a lady.
Drinking Infinite Jest, reading pic related.
Inb4 buttblasted microbrew geeks
lick me
Reading pic related and enjoying a nice tall glass of water
Drinking Riesling. Reading Thus Spoke Zarathustra.
Drinking rum and coke and working on a short story, might smoke some grass later if I hit a wall, then I'll edit it when I'm sober again.
Drinking coffee and reading Trollslayer, a Warhammer novel.
Love, by StendhalMaybe some coffee
Man, I really would like some weed right now and listen to the Inherent Vice audiobook.
Maybe some coffeeHow are you "maybe" drinking "some" "coffee"?

Glass of vodka and The Trial by Kafka
Inherent Vice is the bomb dude. Audiobooks and weed is a killer combo.
What kind of vodka? I'm interested in trying pic related, but I haven't really explored vodka yet.
The Golden Bowl for me.Drinking Diet Dr. Pepper.
Just make sure it isn't too cheap. With Vodka I've found that the price actually matters a lot. Anything below 10 bucks is pure shit. It starts to get decent at 15 bucks.
Portrait of the ArtistDat chapter where he walks along the beach
It's a Henry James love-fest in here.
Drinking pic related. Just finished reading a short story, "The Day Before the Revolution." You are what you drink :^
you're a faggot?
drinking tap waterreading The Man Without Qualities
DeLillo, LIBRAFanta grape soda
I'm reading Proust while drinking chocolate milk.
reading this book of bob dylan critdrinking pbr21 / chicago
Sounds comfy.
Drinking Carlo Rossi sangria and reading Capital in the 21st Century.
Smoking hash and drinking red wine whilst reading V.
gertrude stein and kantwater
Smoking anything
Zizek will explain this to you.Drinking water and reading Nietzsche
what stein m8?
Not enjoying the occasional cigar with bourbon
Drinking some tea and reading The Book of Disquiet.Pessoa really finds new way to match the weather with his mood, it's interesting.
Drinking Eye of the Hawk, smoking low-grade spliffs and reading The Painted Bird in between French grammar drills.Cheers.
what?
I'm drinking coffee and trying to decide what to read.
The Painted Bird is one of the most banal books I've ever read. Hopefully you enjoy it more. 👨❤️💋👨
which gertrude stein you reading?
I want to lick your pink grapefruit. I'd rim it all night while you breathe heavy.
Don QuixoteChocolate Milk
Drank some Trader Joe's shiraz not as good as their merlot honestly and some Guinness earlier. Read a bit of a collection of DFW essays and some of Stranger in a Strange Land
tender buttons
Whatever you do, just make sure you cork it and keep it in the freezer otherwise it goes to shit.
not telling
Keystone Light and Mason & Dixon. AMIRITE?!?!?!
Water All the pretty horses
Applying UML and Patterns by LarmanWater
My father makes it, it tastes like paint stripper and feels like a kick from an ox in your throat as you swallow it but I wouldn't pass it up for some commercial piss
I was waiting for it to pick up plus #significance and such, but you might have killed it for me.I like Polish postwar drabness, fucking sue me
White rum + ginger ale + lime + Jakob von Gunten
Same book. Where are you at in it?Drinking a vanilla protein shake... : what the fuck...
Drinking tea and reading Harry Potter fan fiction Lily and the Art of Being Sisyphus, it's a great surreal work.
6pm in Melbourne. About to smash some beugs and start part 6 of Crime & Punishment. Trying to decide what next, I kind of want to read One day in the life of Ivan but also want to read The Stranger. Dead souls is appealing as well though...pic related, shit I'm choofing is this dank. I am a happy Canadian.
nvm this shit isn't even that koota
Diet Dr. Pepper and on the last 20 pages or so of The StrangerGood book so far but don't quite get how it's so prestigious. i read the Myth of Sisyphus so I understand absurdism fairly well. The Stranger's prose somewhat reminds me of Less than Zero, kind of blatant and simple. Every once in awhile there's a line that really stands out wonderfully but aside from that it's pretty much straightforward storytelling to me.
Some of it may be lost in the translation you have but I think the simplicity and straight-forwardness was intentional.
kek you actually have that cover.
Y kek?
cause it's cheesy
it was $3 I can't complain
i've only seen it in "terrible cover" threads here.
not being a cool guy degenerateGet hip, dude.
, 
Milbank suggests that when the secular tried to take the "divine nature" out of man, they were still thinking from a theological point-of-view, and so ended up with just his "sinful nature", which is what influenced Hobbes' idea of human nature and the importance of a big stick, and that is why le self interest became the big motivator everyone assumed with the advent of modernism and political economy. And that "self-interest" had to be used to explain how people could still care about each other and form communities and do things outside of state coercion, since suggesting they did it for reasons outside of self-interest would be a heresy to the secular viewpoint.Pretty interesting.
Alizee's ass is pretty interesting.
No one cares mate, we're not going back to a Christian society.
Is this a social experiment conducted by some mega-corporation intent on marketing 4chan?
if you make him into a meme like stirner you'll ruin it. although thats probably your intention all along isn't it. fuck you.
I don't think Milbank has meme potential, not like Zizek or Stirner does. He doesn't have memeable pictures like they do, and he doesn't have a memeable catchphrase like "spooks" or "pure ideology".
This. Just fuck random girls until you get old ugly and then kill yourself.
Who?
John "Zizek made me famous on /lit/" Milbank
You both will be dead before you get to live in your ideal world
That's not Alizee, you moran
Dat Nintendo back is pretty rad doe, not gonna lie. Never played video games, but the NES is an aesthetically pleasing piece of hardware.
Christfags are insufferable
Reading that made me cringe so hard I shat myself
I thought you were Christian?
And yet not that long ago you were defending Milbank as a top notch thinkerWhat gives?
None of that follows.
You must be rusing. Alizee has a small French butt. This is obviously a Latin American booty.
Might want to read Milbank and see his argument
nvm that OP. Now for the love of god, the sauce?
weak, man. just searched up "latina booty game show" on youtube and found sauce.
this is correct
Her nickname is Mulher Melancia, which literally translates as "watermelon woman"For some reason I can't help but feel a bit of pride when one aspect of our rich glorious culture finds an international audience. Valesca Popozuda still #1 though
she is brazilian funk dancer and "singer"search for "Mulher Melancia" means watermelon woman lolalso sauce on the origins of it: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=WMbzrfA6mTA you might wanna skip to 3:20
 For some reason I can't help but feel a bit of pride when one aspect of our rich glorious culture finds an international audienceFor some reason I can't help but feel a bit of pride when one aspect of our rich glorious culture finds an international audienceHUE
Shut up, I've already told them thatI'm filling the quota of brazilian anon here today so you might want to just leave
Have you seen that clip of mexican TV where one of the guys on the show unzips this girls dress and she is completely naked underneath it on live tv.Pretty great.
edgy atheists itt
stop doing this
you are insufferableFTFY
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zfXBNQMj2SEhere, maybe next time you won't forge what her legs, ass and face actually look like
Ah yes, Andressa Soaresthe secular tried to take the "divine nature" out of manWhen the facts dismissed such a "divine nature"Kindness for it's own sake *is* self satisfying, but I honestly do good, on my own, for mutual benefits.But the fun question now is; will I go before or at the same time as my world?
Should I read a 616 page long Mayakovsky biography?
Dunno, do you like the guy? Do you like the author who penned the biography?Also, any recs about Mayakovsky himself?
I'd read it if it were 200 pages, but 600. Probably quite a bit about Russia in there I wouldn't know, but if he's a self promoting narcissist I won't last long.
If you're not going to send it to me
There is nothing interesting about it. Some of his poetry is pretty good, though, fine rhythms
Oh, you've read it?
I did, but the one in the OP. I just dont like biographies, maybe that was the reason for my opinion.Why are you interested in it?
Where can a nigga pirate some e-books, /litl?
right from the motherfucking sticky, you illustrious coprophage
/lit/, where we still call you a shit-eating moron but with it's a little more eloquent.
sorry am drunk
I use what.CD
libgen.inaaaaarg.orgbibliotik.org
Can I have invite, pls?
fuck off
Are Kantian ethics and Utilitarianism really incompatible theories? Is there a reasonable hyrbid theory that marries elements of both to form some new, superior third school of thought?
From my understanding they're distinct.For Mill ethics lies outside the mind of the subject and for Kant is lies within. it comes down to a materialist/idealist distinction which still separates philosophy.A reconciliation seems inconceivable but most philosophical arguments do before their time.
Mills


Rule utilitarianism embraces some of the absolutes of kantian ethics, and isn't entirely based upon a numerical balancing act but takes into account the quality of constituents acted upon, which can only be conceivably arrived at from a human perspective through reason
Kantian ethicslol'd
Rule utilitarianismThis is probably the closest you'll get to a compromise. Good call.
" The consequences which Ockham drew from this empiricism were truly "radical". He argued that knowledge of one existent thing does not permit us to infer the existence of any other thing, since necessary connections cannot be assumed between contingent things, which, part from God, are the only kind of existents.Therefore, a fortiori, he could see no justification for inferences from experience towhat transcends experience. hence it would be futile to attempt to demonstrate God's existence from the order of natural existenceas perceived through the senses.....As a thoroughgoing empiricist, Ockham insisted that the basic premises of science be derived from experience. Since such premises could not involve necessary cause-effect relations, they had to be expressed as conditional or hypothetical statements....Ockham's influence on the intellectual currents of the fourteenth century was profound and lasting. It produced a widespread tendency to accept empiricism as the foundation of whatever true knowledge was attainable. Unobservable entities and forms were deemed unreal and lost their status as ontological explanatory devices. Empiricism and rejection of the reality of the unobservable came to be characteristic features of the nominalist mode of thought in science and philosophy. Among Ockham's followers who were theologians, there was a marked inclination to uphold, and pursue even further, the consequences of his critique of knowledge which had sought to narrow drastically the applicability of philosophical proof to the domain of theology....Nicholas of Autrecourt was the most prominent and perhaps the most radical. Nicholas, who has been called the medieval Hume, insisted that certitude of evidence of evidence could have no degrees. Arguing from the Ockhamist position that the existence of one thing does not allow us to infer the necessary existence of any other thing and that a cause cannot be logically inferred from its effect, Nicholas denied all the propositions of Aristotelean natural philosophy. In his view the multitude of conclusions in Aristotle's natural philosophy were indemonstrable and therefore inconclusive. He concluded that only probable knowledge was possible...."Edward Grant-"Physical Science in the Middle Ages". What are you reading ? What's an interesting Philosophical, Theological, or Scientific idea in the tradition that you've learned recently ? Have you finished the Summa yet ?
reading?Reading George, Anderson and Girgis on marriage. Their "new" natural law is a bit of an impediment to their case from my point of view, but it's enough of a descendant of proper natural law that it shows Scholastic ethics still has something to say even to this degenerate age.What's an interesting Philosophical, Theological, or Scientific idea in the tradition that you've learned recently ?Been thinking about St Thomas's Fifth Way recently, and his discussion in the ST on man's last end, and how they might be related. I'm trying to get clear how you derive all the divine attributes through the Fifth Way, since I think each of the Five Ways is an independently viable route to concluding the existence of God. Finished the Summa?Nope. :
I think you could do omniscience roughly like this: We know that for things that have no intellect, to tend towards the same ends consistently, they need something with intellect to make them do so, since it is not logically necessary for them to consistently act the way they do  my semi-contemporary reading of the fifth way. So we need God's intellect, and by doing all this God has knowledge of all the workings of things without will. As far as things with will go, I would argue that the foundation of the will works the same way as things without will do, no human will directly causes the establishment of another human will in the first place, nor it's own establishment, nor the persistence of it. So God directs the will's activity in the sense that his concurrent involvement gives us the capacity for the operation of our will at every moment it exists, with this any decision we make with it we making concurrently with God's power and thus with God. God powers our will and constitutes it as we direct it, "going along for the ride" so to speak, and has knowledge of all acts of will that way, and thus has omniscience.The terminology would have to be cleaned up a bit and the details filled in a bit more by who ever's general metaphysical system one is using, I argue for it in Scottist context generally, but I think a Thomist could easily make us of it.
what an utter waste of thyme
Post quotes you love by authors you can't stomach.I start:“Love binds, and it binds forever. Good binds while evil unravels. Separation is another word for evil; it is also another word for deceit.”― Michel HouellebecqI personally can't take Houellebecq seriously, with all that cynicism and edginess, and his stories are always about himself lamenting the fact that he can't have sex with hot girls, and the fact that he has sex as his only reason to live.
Houellebecq has undoubtedly had sex with a lot of hot girls. He's a fiction writer, not a memoirist, and his stories tend to be microcosmic representations of his wider sociological observations.
Houellebecq has undoubtedly had sex with a lot of hot girls
“The terrible predicament of a beautiful girl is that only an experienced womanizer, someone cynical and without scruple, feels up to the challenge. More often than not, she will lose her virginity to some filthy lowlife in what proves to be the first step in an irrevocable decline.” - himselfnot a memoiristHis wush-fulfilment novel platform as a protagonist named after him.
You underestimate the phenomenon of audience pussy.
and his stories tend to be microcosmic representations of his wider sociological observations. And Complete trite they are.
“The terrible predicament of a beautiful girl is that only an experienced womanizer, someone cynical and without scruple, feels up to the challenge. More often than not, she will lose her virginity to some filthy lowlife in what proves to be the first step in an irrevocable decline.”Absolutely true.Incidental question: are you a fan of DFW?
His observations can't be complete bunk considering the amount of people of both sexes who relate to them.
Not a fan. Read IJ, and it was reasonable. I have nothing against but I don't like him either.
I only asked because it occurred to me that DFW makes a similar observation when Orin meets Joelle.
Houellebecq has undoubtedly had sex with a lot of hot girls
Since he became a famous author and world-class edgemaster, he has definitely been knee-deep in pussy. That's just how the world works, Anon. Women in general love status, and edgy women love creative types - the more "tortured", the better.
The quote is from IJ you fucking moron
Ppl relate to The Alchemist too. Or they think they do. The void observations and indulgences are porn for the nihilistic minded. I am one of those, and I liked the indulgent part of it. The observations are incredibly juvenile though, his economic ones on particular are like copy paste out of The Economist but not even close to that quality. It's like the exposition Camus does in The Stranger -- any person with reasonable years under his belt and is even remotely self-conscious of life could AND SHOULDN'T make.
i get iti get your joke"lol"
Sartre was also ugly as sin yet was drowning in pussy thanks to his celebrity and manipulating underage girls. That's just how women are.
The Alchemist does not contain any social commentary. And Houellebecq is also rated highly by many critics, academics and generally smart people; Coelho, on the other hand...
jealous cucks detected. He's a financially successful french writer you think has any problems getting laid? even Bill maher fucks hot chicks consistently.
his economic ones on particular are like copy paste out of The EconomistParticularly poor comparison considering his are on the opposite ideologically. You should liken Link him closer to poor man's Marxism instead.
the fact that he has sex as his only reason to live.Honestly, it's one of the easiest for some ways to achieve some of kind happiness.for everyone else it's:hobbiesenlightenment drinkingOnly the middle is actually more significant in life improvement.
Okay bad example. Maybe that erotic novel Wetlands is a better match."Smart people" are subject to bad taste too, that's not really an argument you're making -- it's s step in the direction of objectification which is impossible.
Yes, wasn't a comparison of political or any other standing but saying it's like he PLAGIARIZED them from somewhere . Because they were _almost_ extraneous how they were included like newspaper clippings glued in between an inked novel.
It's funny that you guys are speaking about Coelho because I once saw a quote that I really liked from him although I think he is p shitty overrall. Can't remember what to search though.But idk, I guess everyone gotta say something good at least once. Like, just once is not that hard, even for people who are total hacks.
Setting some things straight here;Houellebeqc is an edgy nihilist who lacks the sense of marketing Palahniuk has to put at least what resembles a marketable ending to his stories, so he writes about the same repetitive themes as if they were a basis for a decent line of philosophies, when in fact everything is reduced to pessimist thoughts and sexual musings, as the protagonists just hangs there thinking about sex and masturbating, not very different than what any random virgin in a friday night would write about. If he's drowing in pussy or not, that's because of his acclaim, and wherever his acclaim goes, people calling him islamophopbic go right after him.Paulo Coelho is a hack who uses his name as some kind of brand, said "Ulysses" was just style without content, when his writings are as devoid of decent meaning as a novel written by a respected famous author can be. The man is so desensitized of his own persona's value he goes around saying he had gay sex as the passive three different times to know if he liked it.I'm not saying you can't be a pretentious fuck and be good. You can also be obsessed with sex and be good, which Joyce and Bukowski were, but at least be self-aware.
Wetlands is terrible. Just a bunch of gross-outs and sexual scenes put there to attract the media's attention as a daring novel, when in fact the character that has the obsessions about said things comes up with the lamest excuse for doing them possible in the fucking world, which comes as some kind of bullshit white-people problems.I mean, Patrick Bateman was a complete psycho and several passages of the book are hard to read, which gave it a lot of media, but at least the character is written in an unapologetic way, without justifications, and the whole collective of his insanity elements work well inside of him.
good, which Joyce and Bukowski were,Bukowskigood
What's wrong with my tastes?
I don't. Help /lit/
Sartre was a philosophical rockstar that women found deep and profound I seriously doubt they feel the same way about Houellebecq, and even then a lot of his conquests were Beauvoir's doing more than his.Bill Maher is a charismatic television icon.
I'm sure Ted Bundy was drowning in pussy too, but I don't see anyone jelly. But if you make a career you of "I can't have sexes and I want to sex" you're a target.
jelly.I know you're underage but I will respond anyway. Anyone who is famous and presents themselves as an intellectual gets to bang hot chicks. It's just how it works. I don't understand it but women seem to like fucking ugly old men when they know they have money and fame.Sartre was a philosophical rockstarphilosophicalkekrockstarno. Bill Maher is a charismatic television icon.charismaticDo you want to know how I know you're a pleb?
Do you want to know how I know you're a pleb?Because he likes things you don't like?
like Bill maherthinks Sartre is a "philosophical rockstar"whatever you have to tell your self subjective boy
There's one quote by that Decline of the West author, bald racist right winged nut job guy...been looking for it for a while.Something like..."There are times when certain men rise to power who simply, through conventional means, cannot be hindered."Or something to that effect. Been looking for it for a while now. No luck.
You do realize Sartre literally swam in pussy ?
Sartre was a hack who just reiterated great philosophers for people who weren't familiar with them.I personally find Maher to be very annoyingNone of this changes what I said
Why does he smoke that way?Does he just beg for attention? Isn't that a cheap trick? Am I missing something here?
A target for what? Obviously incorrect accusations by some anonymous nobody? I'm sure he's devastated. Everyone apart from you knows that he's drowning in vagina.
It's how french smoke when we don't have an ashtray around
Sartre was a hackAll philosophers are hacks, that's the definition of philosopher. Hack
He's an edgy Frenchman. That's just the sort of thing they do.
How does it help?See also 
women seem to like fuck rich old menyou a pleb because you watch Bill MaherI'm a fan of Houellebeqc because he, like myself, is a sexually frustrated frech nihilist who is treated as edgy by the media because he hates muslim people.Do you wear your fedora indoors or nah?
All hacks have a certain retarded pose. Pic related.
It simply stops the fucking ash from falling on your fucking book or paper. You pick it up like a bad habit. Most people hold their cigarette downards since they smoke outside but french people smoke everywhere
He was a paedophile tho.
You do realize Sartre literally swam in pussy ?yes and all I was saying was that he was a posturing charlatan.OK sorry I was triggered when I thought there were people on this board who unironically like Sartre and Maher. You can't be to careful you know.
He certainly was a fucking nigger also a disgusting leftist, but he did score girls.
Look, I know he was a lefty nutjob paedo, but how exactly was he a nigger?
and after all, isn't that the only thing that matters?
Even if you think all philosophers are hacks, Sartre was a hack among hacks. No serious philosophical work actually interfaces with him. Sartre was a pop philosopher. And I doubt he would have made ladies so wet otherwise.
liking bill "smug" mahercalling other people fedorasthinking women don't fuck ugly rich menYou're an idiot. go back to reddit and come back when you've graduated highschool you whitenight beta faggot.alsoimpyling I like le edgy frenchman who hates le mudslimesno
I was using an analogy anonLa poésie et le cul, anon, la poésie et le cul
I forgot. By your thought process, you don't gotta like someone to ride their dick.Also, I don't like Maher.
Looks like a selfie
Only if his left arm is two meters long
Hugh Hefner pays the women he fucks. If you want to go there, okay, maybe Houellebecq has indeed fucked a lot of hot girls.
Don't even know why but I keked
By your thought process, you don't gotta like someone to ride their dick.and by the thought process of the hundreds of women hugh hefner has fucked in the last 5 years you retard. Do you honestly think that the only people who fuck are adults who love each other and that pseudo intellectual frenchmen can't get laid? I bet you're underage or a woman who fucked some posturing faggot and is trying to convince herself she does't regret it.
I mean the pose, not the angle. Hitchens' pictures also often look like selfies.
it's frenchness, it's comes natural to thempic related, actual writer
I'm not Where did I imply Hollerback was at all talented?
"He's more famous than you, so you can't judge him"
It's like the exposition Camus does in The Stranger -- any person with reasonable years under his belt and is even remotely self-conscious of life could AND SHOULDN'T makeWhat is wrong with it?
Stop trying to make Proust a meme.
Where the cigarette at tho?
Gucci doesn't pay shit though. Do you think they fuck him for his good looks?
Welcome to the world of irony. Leave your aspengers at the entrance.
Reminded me of something:According to 50 Cent, Rick Ross can't even fuck prostitutes with his looks.
You're free to judge him, but if you think he doesn't get laid, you are simply wrong.
What amuses me about this whole thread is the fact that there are people defending and people trying to disprove the fact that some random frech man has sex.
not meming, and smoking is for fagshe could give himself a boobjob tho

No, I think it's more than he's a celebrity who has popularity among women, and because of his macho persona.I seriously doubt many young women are carrying books by Houellebecq around.
In 2015 writing an novel that highlights how an individual isn't welcome really in society as an expose in style is pleb. Might as well write a book about how politics is pandering to the masses during elections . It's tacky.
What about books by Gucci Maine?
you mean Deandre Otis Surrel
I don't know, I'm thinking of his music
Do you value literary merit, aesthetic, and patricianism over truth?
He is very popular among the university crowd. I think the totality of my female acquaintances have read him to an extent

Atomised was one of my ex's favourite books. He's popular with all the same people who like Bukowski, Miller, Nin, Sade, Sartre, etc.
A lot of women I know have read Stephen King as well.You need to understand the distinction between popularity of the writing, and a cult of personality.
This. Houellebecq is like /r9k/: the author.
Certainly, I'm just saying people have indeed read him.You can do it too, I believe
Are you french?
nigga you can have a dozen of Carlin rip-off edgemaster comedians, and maybe there is some grain of truth to their rambling about the government and institutions maaan, doesn't mean it isn't terribly painful to watch that sort of platitudinous tripe
Stephen king could probably fuck a lot of bad bitches too. Anyone famous gets to fuck above their weightclass
I have, I wasn't impressed. I thought it was maybe just because of translation, but his prose in French sucked too.
Generally not the sort who are writing about how meaningless and empty sex is, while simultaneously having their characters fuck more women than James Bond does. Houellebecq celebrates and fixates on sex as the ultimate, radical experience and expression of freedom, while at the same time saying it provides no happiness. Seems a lot like sour grapes.
ITT Virgins argue about which writers get pussy
you can infer that holleybeck didn't have as much sex as he would like during his adolescence , but he probably did fine in his 20s.source: I am someone who did not have any sexual experiences during highschool and I agree with all the '/r9k/'-ish things I've read by him and I'm doing well now.
I meant fuck bitches not read Welbeck lol he's a shit writer
In LITERATURE, yes. In thesis, no. After you -- how do I say this without coming off as a douche -- after you've realized the truth of the things generally you don't want to hear about sone bright teenage kid telling you the government is lying to you!life is meaningless; there is no morals!individuality in large douses is detrimental to most people's mental health in the long run!Style is underrated.
girls don't need to actually read what an author wrote to be groupies. If you're at a trendy party and you have a way with words and you get introduced as a published and acclaimed author women are quite likely to be interested.
That's because I'm attractive, have a good income, and because I can gain full sexual satisfaction from fucking men, and therefore never radiate desperation around women and never feel anxious or clingy.
Agreed. Why do authors still always put messages and meaning in there work? Have they not realized the truth?
Status trumps almost everything when it comes to banging women. If you are a famous writer who is regarded as significant in a high-culture sense by at least part of the intelligentsia, you will have more hot liberal arts college pussy on your hands than you can handle.
So according to what I learned today from /lit/:If you are edgy and "tortured", bitches be raining on youYou can be ugly as Lucifer's haemorrhoids and yet fuck mad bitches if you follow the aboveThe fact that Michel Houellebeqc's sex life is active is very important.Smoking like a faggot is a trend in France.If I follow the headlines can I be an edgy author fucking mad bitches, /lit/?
Might be true except his message about women and Muslims is not what that demographic likes, in fact I imagine they're hostile to it.
Yeah cool buddy but I didn't ask you any questionsGlad you're doing well though
The answer is: all of them.
fucking menwhat type tho
Houellebecq is literally /r9k/ the author
they right
I'm attracted to both masculine and feminine looking men, and I'm a switch.
Most haven't. Ppl be plebs you know. They still need the messages. Just like you and i when we were younger. The sad part is that some of these are the critically acclaimed ones. By so called experts. Vote for more education for all. Yada yada. I just want some witty prose man.
If you are edgy and "tortured", bitches be raining on youIt has nothing to do with your content, John Green could get mad pussy if he wanted to, all you have to do is be an author that hot girls will recognize or feel intellectual from reading your books and then you will have your pick of 8's and 9's.if Tao Lin the autistic gayboy can fuck some underage boipussy so can you.
I'm a switchWant me to tell you how I know you're an heterosexual virgin ?
see Also do you think liberal university girls never fuck guys who are chauvinistic? political leanings and ideology don't usually matter more than attraction. It's not like he's obliged to say the first time he meets someone "I wish I took a 14 year old girl's virginity ; keep france white"
mah nigga, partlygeneral question, what about them boipussies, does writing unlock those?
Sure, go ahead.
You don't have to write to get boipussy, gay men of all ages are extremely slutty. Hardly any gay couples I've known were monogamous.
Actually I forgot you aren't french nvmselect all street signsFuck you Google I'm not helping you develop your fucking pattern recognizing algorythms
So the capcha is actively trying to create software that will make capchas obsolete
Stuck up liberal arts bitches love it when a man holds their opinions in disdain and forcefully disagrees with them.
Yes, if he's handsome and masculine.
Nah, Google is using the captcha so people create of database of what image represents whatThey are slowly pushing more and more complex shit, like the street signs. We indentify google street's street signs for them so they can build a database and a pattern recognitionbut yeah ultimately it would defeat the purpose of the captchathey did the same shit with the old one and google booksonly one of the two words was the captcha, the other one was for database purposewiht the new captcha, you also have a margin of error; the margin they use to build the database
Have you ever met any women who have known the truth? Is it just the ones around me?
No. You must've hoarding all of them. Pls send me some young ones.
I'm sorry, I meant the ones around me don't.How do I deal with being attracted to them? Should I sneak books into their bags and hope they accidentally begin to think?
Ride the dick was some kind of metaphor there, as he used wordplay to mean that the other anon was riding michel's dick, and using the sex before mentioned as an allusion.7/10 to this wordplay
michel cant have a dick shes woman
STOP WITH THOSE FUCKING IMAGES ALREADY
Guaranteed never read Sartre. He grew out of Marxism pretty sharpish, but no one let him forget it. Probable you read half a page of Hegel and a short passage of Kierkegaard and concluded something unsound.
there aren't very many quotes I love by authors I hate in this thread...

"Author of post No.6609842 likes mandingo penises." - Me
Why so much self hate, anon?
never thought I'd see qt Regan being used to avatarfag.keep it up.
What should I read to get started with him?
Liberal women are idiots
I read his first book and it was fine. Sometimes he could be a bit subtler with his message but it was fun to read, some of the observations were interesting and I think the topics he writes about are only going to become more prevalent in our society as time goes on.
He broke his index when he was young
Bill Mahercharismatic
Is Californication/Hank Moody /lit/'s idea of a perfect life or what
hank is a stupid baby who has never reflected upon his life.He is the cliché of the 40 something who never took 5 minutes to do this basic task.And if he did, there would be no tv show dragged over so many fucking years over hot air...This show is about some stupid adolescent in a body of a 40 yo man supossedly handsome to insert the cliché of vapid sex who prefers to hang on to a retarded past due to a lack of reflection. Literally, the writters have cherry pick a phony situation to avoid any thinking and creativity from their part. the same hold for this film
I want to teach philosophy at a little liberal arts college in Colorado or Nevada and just live cheaply in a rural home, smoking weed with tenure, visiting friends across america in the summer, and writing short stories, philosophical pieces, and articles.
Not to be taken seriously. Its David Duchovny's star vehicle. In real life you can't go round having fist fights cause you die.
show about a hack
Has any moral philosopher talked about the morality of slurs? Or is that considered beneath philosophy?
Okay we typically have /lit/ art threads, and the mods seem okay with that, so can we have a /lit/ music thread? Please post things you universally feel appeal when reading. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9J2S4enmV4I
this is the mood i'm in most of the timehttps://youtu.be/F016NbHwszE
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zNgcYGgtf8M
Please stop posting her
How do I learn to enjoy classical music the "real" way? How it was meant to be enjoyed? I listen to a lot, but I can't say anything other than "I like this" or "I don't like this."
there's a yale class on youtube on listening to music but why take the mystery out of ithere's the link https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=5_yOVARO2Oc&list=PLGQlhWonA985PM36WWuHoFXtPWsGVD2qLgood taste
How do I learn to enjoy classical music the "real" way? How it was meant to be enjoyed? There is no 'way' to enjoy something. It often depends on your own cirumstances and point of view, which is completely dependent on your own life. If you want to enjoy classical because you see it as 'higher', then you are enjoying it for the wrong reasons. It's normal to see it as "I like this" or "I don't like this."There is plenty of classical I don't like. Enjoy what you do and if you don't enjoy something, it's up to you to see the beauty in it. Some stuff just doesn't click with certain people, and that's okay. Music appeals to different types of people for different reasons. It's a very grey medium.
Listen Beethoven, he's pretty easy to enjoy
You have to learn how to read a piece in a way we all learn how to read movies. Classical music adheres to strict principles eg; sections, development, resolutions etc which you can only make out if you study the sheet music of a piece or have a great ear and listen to it repeatedly. For example; Liszt's B minor piano sonata contains a smaller sonata inside it.
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HbktVzLDLXs
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=CdXucCVdCggalso qt
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=9WUA9gNfHUULiterally based on the writing of DFW
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=jX6kn9_U8qklistening to the rain reduces stress and facilitates recovery from stressful situations faster then other soundsalso helps you sleep even better than a lullabycomfy sound for when you are always bullied by your malaysian arm knitting pen pals
Symphony Fantastique - Berlioz is an interesting piece to analyse - romantic narrative.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sHI2xyyH-CU
based on the writing of DFWwhite suburbanites, dude
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=tG0laIxC0Lohttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-u7NHx5CP74https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=leXt4ilaPdAThe three greatest concertos.
Sibelius' violin concerto is fantastic. I like Shosty's 1st violin concerto best out of all his concertos tbh.
not brahms violin concert and piano concert n.1 and dvorak cello concert, jeez you damn americans
I am not that into classical music, but sacred minimalism really appeals to me.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mZKKzOLYcKghttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OcL4J0pzlAgI also want to recommend something pulpier, that is to say, a bit more lowbrow.https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=_Zdg-AMv8twhttps://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rqFpbo_K2Eg
https://youtu.be/QXFgHYk5NMchttps://youtu.be/JgSETyVs5GMhttps://youtu.be/HVmZjEJ03Rchttps://youtu.be/g5ozxVdBbmAhttps://youtu.be/EcR6j_JNwQsis this enough of a cliche?
, 
What does /lit/ think of new adult fiction? The genre is targeted towards late-teens to mid-twenties readers, kind-of like a bridge between young adult fiction and adult fiction. I never even knew this was a thing before discovering Goodreads.
A foul waste of trees.
Waste of time for people intimidated by adult literature. Just throw a copy of Infinite Jest at them and they'll figure out it's not so bad, and be better for it.
What books are in it? I've been sympathetic to YA in the past, but this really seems like a bad excuse for not reading adult books by the time you're 16
I just started with adult fiction because I'm not retarded
https://www.goodreads.com/shelf/show/new-adult-fictionhttp://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/New-adult_fiction
This.
yikes
Why would you need a "bridge" to adult literature? You've already started reading it in your high school courses. It's simply a matter of choosing whether or not you're going to be a pleb forever.https://www.goodreads.com/shelf/show/new-adult-fictionSo romance novels?
What makes shitty YA sell?What's the key to success?
Appeal to the lowest common denominatir. Duh.
Filling a niche market or capitalising on the success of a book that does that:Hunger Games leads to Divergent leads to whatever
I'm not retarded
Looks like it's just a new marketing term for harlequin romance that's trying to break the 40 year old Fabio-on-the-cover style romance.I don't necessarily hate the idea of it. But I don't necessarily hate the idea of YA either. I think the only real problem with YA is more of just a lazy follow the leader mentality which is pretty much inevitable when things like Hunger Games strike it big.
I think it's more of a marketing hole that's being filled with whatever. Like there's a large enough number of readers possibly a little more than in recant past with the proliferation of e-readers that are wanting to read but are too imitated/lazy/whatever by more "serious" lit like DFW, or the geeks, etc. So YA fills that entertainment void.
Be meAt Novelcorp HqBe CeoPeople aren't buying enough copies of Hunger Games and Divergent Realize it is because not everyone is a young adultTell all this to assistantHe suggests, "Why don't we make nice new publications of classic author's books like Dostoevksy and Camus?"Tell him noWe don't want them getting smart so they'll lap up our stupid shit that's easy to produceTell him, "We need to produce a new category of fiction so we can catch the older people too. A bridge between YA and Adult fiction."Assistant says, "That's a good idea. We can start weaving in some themes and more complex pro-"Tell him no."What we need to do," I tell him, "Is to take what we have and make it appeal to adults."Assistant listing off ideas like themes of growing responsibility and depression.Literally throw him out the windowGet 50 hack authors togetherThey are all YA authors but I have a planTell them to write softcore erotica with YA-esque proseOne objectsDrop hardcover copy of Summa Theologica on his headSay, "We want to wean them from YA to Softcore Erotica to EroticaTell them to start making trilogies or longer seriesRequirementsMary Sue protagonist with no defining traitsNumerous hunky guys who do shitNo danger at all other than bitchy parentsLong erotic scenesAuthors get to worksix month later start releasing three books a monthDFW it actually worked
I kinda hate these because all of them are self-insert / 'relatable' stuff where you can and are supposed to imagine yourself in the place of the protag -- it's so odd and wrong for there to be age range on the protags, as if that's relevant
I think Nabovko puts it best when he says 18 and whereafter
For a second I thought it was just normal lit with a retarded genre name tacked on to it, but now I see it's just romance novels for young people. I've seen shit like this for teenagers in the high school library. Nothing new really. Same shit different toilet.
Fuck literature.I want to make money, what do I write?
Smut.
people should read whatever they wantit's only a problem when they try to equate the books with classic literaturei read lots of fantasy genre fiction and i know it's shit. i just need some elves and sword fighting from time to time.
What is some successful smut I can get inspired by to make loads of doe?
I'm not going to do your work for you. Dig around bestellers lists. Pro-tip: Fifty Shades of Gray is the most successful.
I think this picture is great
Thanks my man.I have one last question.Can I write smut if I'm not a woman?I'm looking at the bestseller lists right now and they are all written by women, I might be done before I got started
DFWI Jested.
Who says you have to actually be a woman? Just use a pseudonym that sounds like a woman's name and pretend you're being "reclusive" to protect yourself from getting raped.
Infinitely?
Pretty good post, anon.
Well memed
It's a stupid way to further compartmentalize and market fiction, you can go even further by retroactively reclassifying classics, under the current definition of "new adult fiction", works like "billy budd", "bartleby the scrivener", "the great gatsby" and "the crying of lot 49" can be considered "new adult", as they deal with the startling realizations fairly young people come to discover about contemporary life. Dumb title. Fuck this planet. Even Ulysses can fall into the genre for fucks sake.
Under-appreciated post
Of course some classics are technically YA / NA. I don't know why this fact upsets /lit/ so much. It's not like a book suddenly becomes horrible when it's put in the YA / NA section.
and so, we come to the end of the Symposium by PlatoWhy is this allowed
There's a skeleton inside you right now.
, 
be a bad boydownloaded all the game of thrones bookswant to print themthey're so big it would cost me hundreds worth of printer inkWhat do, /lit/? I don't want to read all the bad boy bad books off a tiny screen or off a computer.
The box set's like 20 bucks.That's five dollars a book.It's fine, you can give GRRM more money.
Quit being such a Jew.
it's literally cheaper to purchase them than print them yourself. Your options are find a library, buy the books, or deal with eye strain.it might possibly even be cheaper to purchase an e-reader than print them yourself or is this what you meant by "tiny screen?"
pirating is evilNo it's not. Freedom of public information is not a bad thing.having a printer in this day and agePrinter ink prices are bumped up about 5000%. It's cheaper to buy both a gallon of crude oil and tree gallons of human blood than it is to buy one of printer ink. The Jews monopolized the business and turned it into an oligarchic circlejerk.tiny screen or off a computerKindles are $40 used and easily rooted.There is almost no reason for anybody strapped for cash to read physical books.
Why would you buy a box set for a series that isn't finished yet?
Because grrm will probably die before the next book releases
If you're just getting into the series and you want to read all the books published, this is the cheaper way to go. Why anyone would want to read all the books is beyond me. I read the first and it was garbage.
 this I'd bet my shiniest nickle that he collapses from a coronary within the year
To read it.It's not like it's not finished, actually. He already knows how it ends and the next one is already being prepared for publication, so he's probably already working on the last one.
Also, this.
he's probably already working on the last one.He's still working on book 6. Has been for 4 years now. Book 7 will never be finished.
He's publishing the sixth one before the sixth season; so if he's comfortable enough to say that, it's gotta be close to finished.
No it's not. Freedom of public information is not a bad thing.Explain. How is pirating not ripping off authors and publishers?
Fuck the publishers. I wish living authors used PayPal so people can pirate their books and still make them whole. I would pay 5-10 directly to the author of a novel I enjoyed happily.
go to the libraryget library cardask the librarian for GOT booksread the books free
/thread
Because any author worth his salt doesn't write for profit.Applying value to artistic works is an outdated concept thanks to the almost unlimited copying of files. Art is integral to a solid education and restricting it by setting up a paywall is favoring those who can pay for it. Envision a world in which you could actualize fruit by writing the fruit's name on a piece of paper. Writing 'pomegranate' on a piece of paper would cause a materialize right in front of your face. The fruit industry would obviously suffer as consequence. Pencils would be mechanized and automated as to prevent them from writing the name of any fruit. People would go malnourished and starve due to restrictions imposed on fruit.
identifying slavs on forumboards 101
You know if we don't pay people to write we'll be stuck reading 50 shades of grey tier shit. People will come up with all sorts of arcane justifications for illegally copying copyrighted material.
You know, there are writers who died because all they did was writing but nobody paid them for their work.
That's an honorable death. Probably better than what I'll get.
It's depressing to think about. You can't help but wonder how many more great works they could've produced if they were paid to write full time.
this is why /lit/ should support basic income guarantees. sorry to get all political
i read it off of a 5 inch mobile screen faggot
It lacks all the bureucratic humiliation of social security/neetbux so it doesn't swing with the slave mentality of everyone having to earn their living even though there aren't and thanks to automatisation never will be enough worthwhile jobs that require humans to go around.
It's probably the most honorable way to die. Money is nice, but i'd rather be a poor writer who produces good books than a rich celebrity who only inspires shallow people. Since I'll never be either, I will settle for a mediocre life and accept I'll be forgotten shortly after I die.
You can get one of those Toner-only laser printer things for like $30, which are supposed to be able to print 10k pages a cartridge.Your paper cost would probably spiral out of control.
aawwww poor neet wants the government to beg him to accept welfare
Freedom of public information is not a bad thing.Information is a good thing as well. It would be nice to pay some people to make some.
worth his saltshouldn't write for profitThat's an ironic use of that phrase. The artist won't be getting any of his salt if he doesn't get paid for what he does.
THIS IS BAIT THIS IS BAIT THIS IS BAIT THIS IS BAIT
I'm not him but I think money is what causes abominations like 50 shades of grey to appear.I don't think 50 shades would be logically possible under, say, feudalism or communism.
What's bait about what I said, anon?I explained my first statement.Printers are pretty much obsolete.Kindles and Kobus are both well-worth the money.
, 
Then if he thrive, and I be cast away,The worst was this: my love was my decaydamn...
I really, really, really dislike this picture.
You can't hate the face of the greatest writer ever
http://www.theguardian.com/books/2013/feb/05/finnegans-wake-china-james-joyce-hit?CMP=share_btn_twcI think the literary Anglosphere just got btfo. How does that make you feel, /lit/?
How did they translate it with any accuracy? I hope what so many Chinese are reading at least carries some of the same spirit as the English.
Impressed
This has been posted multiple times for the last 2 years. Where have you been?
only the first third of the bookI wonder how much futher she has gotten
It’s no wonder. Chinese people are among the most naturally intelligent in the world. They share with Japanese and Koreans the highest IQ scores: they are simply biologically smarter than most people on Earth yes, intelligence is a vague and still not definitive concept, and yes, IQ is not the only valid measurement of mental achievement, but still: if you compare IQ scores of children who have had the same opportunities and education the Chinese ones will score higher on average – that’s a fact.But that alone is not an explanation. If you look at Chinese culture, however, you will find more reasons for this phenomenon. They had civil servants and a great state machinery when Europe was still populated by a bunch of warring tribes people, and they value effort and achievement with great pride, even with a kind of fanaticism. But every single individual is an individual. I try to work to improve myself, and if a lot of Chinese students are doing the same, well: the more learned people in the world the better. Also, let’s not forget that the work in question was written by a Anglo-Saxon.
How would you even begin to translate Irish regional dialects, the multilingual wordplay, and general English mastery without rewriting the book? I bet the Chinese version is more accessible, it would have to be. You lose prose but not plot in translation, FW is the closest thing to purely prose that's ever been published.
eventually, the filthy barbarians stole their secret recipe for tea and got them all loaded on opium. i wonder how much less thuggery and degradation we would have if the east came out the victor of this resentful european attack.
Professor said so in the article, because of the translation, chinese version is easier than the english one, and that sometimes she just did literal translation ven if it was gramatically incorrect in chinese because there wasnt a good way To translate it
I don't agree with everything in this post, but it is worthwhile to note that for the vast majority of human history China had the highest living standard in the world. The last five hundred years or so have been a historical anomaly.
So my translation is more clear than the original book."DROPPEDwhat is this shit?
dfw i'm learning chinese and i have this to look forward tothanks for sharing, OP. liked and reblogged.
Reading translated JoyceWhy would you even do that in the first place?
Tell us how it compares when this gets reposted
Mfw u took the top post on reddit and thought it was something new instead of a 2 year old repost
Chinese people are among the most naturally intelligent in the world. They share with Japanese and Koreans the highest IQ scores:Complete nonsense. Certain US states, for example, have an IQ equivalent to that of Japan. Those states have one thing in common with Japan: they are relatively economically advanced.As for China, it's no coincidence that a culture in which schoolwork and conformity are so highly valued produces decent thinkers. I say decent, because, despite their monstrous population, there are still single European countries who have produced more artistically than they have. China's huge population also accounts for the high sales of Ulysses.
they're probably going to be up there again soon
Dubliners with notes it's good in Spanish I also read the english version in some parts.I don't know about the other books.
News to me, and amazing
Dubliners doesn't really rely on prose, not at all now that I think of it
2013
/r/books if anyone's wonderinggoddamn people from /r/books really do come herejesus christ
A few light taps upon the pane made him turn to the window. It had begun to snow again. He watched sleepily the flakes, silver and dark, falling obliquely against the lamplight. The time had come for him to set out on his journey westward. Yes, the newspapers were right: snow was general all over Ireland. It was falling on every part of the dark central plain, on the treeless hills, falling softly upon the Bog of Allen and, farther westward, softly falling into the dark mutinous Shannon waves. It was falling, too, upon every part of the lonely churchyard on the hill where Michael Furey lay buried. It lay thickly drifted on the crooked crosses and headstones, on the spears of the little gate, on the barren thorns. His soul swooned slowly as he heard the snow falling faintly through the universe and faintly falling, like the descent of their last end, upon all the living and the dead.
http://www.theguardian.com/books/gallery/2014/mar/26/finnegans-wake-james-joyce-in-pictures4. The Mookse and the GripesThis tale, told by Shaun, is based on the fable of The Fox and the Grapes. The Mookse is represented by Pope Adrian IV Nicholas Brakespear, or ‘Bragspear’, the only English Pope.https://warosu.org/lit/thread/S667543
Apart from the ending of the Dead of course
1.5 Billion in PopulationIf you can 30,000 copies of a book, it's considered amazing in China...And we're repeatedly told how intellectual these people are.
What would the Chinese think of Shakespeare's Ulysses?Oh, I forgot the Chinese don't read!
Then why are they also incredibly superstitious, ignorant, and corrupt?I wish we could bring the qing empire back and relegate China to being the backward it deserves to be.
"Tuesday 5 February 2013 08.45 EST "checks out.
you smelt it you dealt it/reddit/
"The things I lost are mostly the sentences, because Joyce's sentences are so different from common sentences," she says, adding that she often broke them up into shorter, simpler phrases – otherwise, the average reader "would think that I just mistranslated Joyce. So my translation is more clear than the original book."chinks confirmed for shit tier
Is this how Russians feel when they laugh at me for reading Pushkin or Lermontov in translation?
It's a country with over 1 billion people and they consider selling 8000 copies of a book a huge achievement...
Does anyone else not know what they want? Stirner has fucked my motivation's shit up.I have concrete goals e.g. learn enough programming to make an app or something worthwhile it's a creative outlet that appeals to the stem autist inside me, learn enough german to be able to enojy more stuff etc. But obviously I need to work hard to do those and I have the option for instant gratification from 4chan right now. And those options make me feel like a cuck because it involves contributing to the capitalism pie that venerates females and chews up males. Obviously getting rich is mutually beneficial to me and the system and i'm fortunately middle class enough to avoid complete exploitation like males in manual labour jobs that all women except the fat working class ones look down upon, but I still feel demoralised.Add to that the fact that we're related to monkeys in evolution terms, which complicates my view of what I "need" and what is "healthy". I sometimes see hard thinking as something that primitive humans never would've wanted to do.If I can unthinkingly and effortlessly go on 4chan all day, should I even bother trying to do anything that takes more effort if it may make me feel like a corporate cuck? 4chan is funnier than anyhting else, at the very least.
contributing to the capitalism pie that venerates females and chews up males./pol/ here but putting this in the OP and thinking it in the first place was a bad idea broIt looks like you've reasoned yourself into a corner. 4chan seems the more logical choice from your analysis, but you'll end up self-hating like everyone else. Do the self-improvement one.
are you studying computer science?i feel a lot of the same things as you to an uncanny degree.i have some pretty ambitious goals that i can say to myself, but whether or not they are close to happening depends entirely on my courage to make them happen or at least put in a real effort to bend the world to my will when i can barely bend my own will to my own will.
I'm not studying comp sci. I studied another stem degree that i regret choosing.
And those options make me feel like a cuck because it involves contributing to the capitalism pie that venerates females and chews up males.Ah, you want to suck a big fat cock. Trust me on this one.
I agree. A big juicy one would do you good.
absolutely feel ya.no solution here. went from best of my year in high school NEET to liberal arts student to stem student, working shitty weekend jobs, just fucking lost
lel. yea capitalism forcing women to unpaid labour of childrearing, household duties and poorly paid often part-time service industry jobs is such a veneration. makes me want to be a woman.
I feel like a bit of head clearing may do you well. Find a week where you ban yourself from internet, tv, vidya, newspaper and film. permit yourself music and literature onlyWhen you take away all the distractions and entertainment, see how your brain starts thinking, see how you start filling your time. I can't promise you anything, but in my own experience it really cleared up the 21st century brain fog that was plaguing me. I'm planning to do the whole month of July next.
lol that makes no sense! those are bad things.
I didn't want to add tonnes of stuff to the OP but I may be internet addicted but I think that's a symptom of no friends. I read that a guy who set up a clinic for internet or maybe vidya addiction stopped believing in the addiction because he said that it was a symptom of a lack of human communication.I normally browse the internet on my laptop during breakfast, derailing the day right from the start. I managed to force myself to eat breakfast without doing anything else during a recent morning and I was AMAZED that my mind could stay sane while I was just eating on my own, without being massaged by constant stimulation.
STEM degreeever
what's an idea for a worthwhile app?
irrelevantwhat you need to do is to CREATE a NEED for an app.
Yeah its definitely a complex relation between the two. I admittedly have friends and my best ones are those who ive recently started a band with, gives me something worthwhile to focus on. Without that though, i find media floods the downtime which is why that fast helped me a lot. I mean like with your breakfast story, I've found mindfulness helpful, just apprecoating whatever you're doing as opposed to constantly looking for more stimulation. Being ok with innaction is far better than engaging in crappy numbing action. At the risk of sounding like an old chinese dude, the idea of "move only with purpose" is one that resonates with me a lot and honesty enables me to better give life my own meaning instead of being overwhelmed by the sheer possibilities of things I can be doing only to squander it... Time is easy for me to waste when its an infinite resource
bump
lmao 'i wanna make apps!!'fuck off and actually /do/ something with your life
I want to afford a studio apartment purely from my writing.My dream?To adapt the book I'm writing into a screenplay and have it produced. Likely not going to happen but I can dream can't I
But it will happen anon. I won't be a hollywood blockbuster so you won't get THAT rich, but it will be an actually good adaptation by some skilled new indie director and producer that will be praised in cannes and shit like that and it will actually be more fulfilling than getting wicked rich. Trust me.
Thank you anon 3I don't even want it to be a blockbuster. One of my dreams is to win the Palme d'Or. It's more of an arthouse thing anyways.More than rich, I want to be respected
writing moviesrespectednothing about movies is respectableit started off as a circus sideshow and it still is
There's only one solution to not knowing what you want and that is to just try something. Not knowing what you want isn't the problem, the real problem is thinking you need to do the perfect thing the first time.Having made a number of apps/sites/games and this being a literature board I recommend SICP picrelated
 Not knowing what you want isn't the problem, the real problem is thinking you need to do the perfect thing the first time.Aw man, not OP but this hits hard in the feels.idk how to stop doing that thoughalso great book
idk how to stop doing that thoughme neither
i'm fortunately middle class enough to avoid complete exploitation like males in manual labour jobsWhat does this mean? I'm lower-middle class and my parents have still made me get low-income jobs to support myself. I've worked as a waiter, kitchen porter, store clerk, bar-man and I'm not even 21 yet. I eat like shit at University because I get the minimum maintenance loan and even the grocery money my parents send me still has me in a -£1500 overdraft.Absolutely no sympathy for you. Stirner is a fucking joke philosophically, though he's an entertaining read. Besides that I'm not sure why he would drain your motivation, even if you took him seriously; he was all about the individual against society. So start doing something where you can exploit society.PS. There's a dangerous train of thought among readers that should have died out years ago: That you just need to read the right philosophy to stop feeling so apathetic/depressed."/lit/, give me some happy philosophy to make me happy!"Depression/anxiety is a medical issue. Speak to your doctor, not some wikipedia scholars on an image-board
be mereading Book of SamuelWhy didn't /lit/ tell me King David was so based?david and goliath discussion threadalso daily reminder God is good.
Because no one here reads the Bible past Genesis and one of the Gospels.
Apostasy
So op, you plan on reading some Buddhist Theravada , Buddhist Mahayana, Brahmin, Hindu, Zoroastrian, Babylonian, Sumerian, Islamic, Mormon, Animist, Celtic, Greek, Roman, and Atheist literature next?
The snake on the tree was the only character I liked in that whole mythos.
MormonatheistI've never heard of any serious literature by either of these two religions. Could you recommend me some, my brother?
He's not a character you fucking moron
Why not? And don't pretend the Bible isn't more important to Western literature than any of those
The char God was the first anti-hero archetype.
Of course he's a character, he's the fucking catalyst! Without the snake, Eve wouldn't have tried the apple then given it to Adam. So, man would've never left the garden of boring vegetarianism. The snake is probably the most important character in The Bible. And he gets the best reveal, was actually the devil in disguise before it was cliche.
Not OP, but so far I've read:The BibleTao Te ChingThe DhammapadaThe God DelusionWhat should I read next?
And that's the gospel truuuuuth~
first anti-hero archetype.Care to elaborate on that dilettante level speculation?
Do you want to argue about what an antihero is and why God fits it it so you want to protest at me not praising Him as a pure soul even though he floods whole planets supposedly kek?
Do you want to argue about what an antihero is and why God fits it it so you want to protest at meI'm sorry is english your first language not being rude just wondering if you could reformat your assertion before we engage in friendly academic banter
And he gets the best reveal,It isn't actually revealed until the last book of the bible, when the dragon is named as the "ancient serpent, is it?That build-up and bookending though
Fuck off alter boy.
I take it from the fact that you posted anime that you are deeply unhappy with your life. I also assume you don't know enough about literary theory to justify your assertion. I hope one day you see God's light and realize you don't have to posture or watch bad cartoons.
look at this multicultural evangelistlike a dog you will eat anything given to you
How's that Bible expanding your mind?guess not
TK;DR LELGOD IS DEd mothafucka
This OP, it sure is important for you to be able to grasp all those allusions to Theravada Buddhism in Western lit.
alterSeriously?

lol, what?
It's so obvious that David was going to win. DexStr
No, if I read anything that isn't the HOLY BIBLE I would probably end up in heck.
Christposting moves essentially in the direction of shit.
end up in heckOnly if you don't believe in Gosh
the garden of boring vegetarianismtop kek
What does /lit/ think?Personally it's one of my favorites.
haven't read it, but I'm sure it's good. Pearl S Buck is excellent.
I recommend it, it's a great look at life in China during the final years of the Quing Dynasty
speaking of which, one of my personal favorites is emperor of china by Jonathan Spence. it's basically an autobiography collated from the emperor Kangxi's writings and correspondence. it also provides a fascinating look into life in China, but during the early Qing and from the perspective of the ruler.
That sounds really interesting, I'll have to look that up. Kind of reminds me of The Last Emperor which was a great movie.
